PSYCHO
by
Joseph Stefano
Based on the novel by
Robert Bloch
FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES ONLY
REVISED
December 1, 1959
Converted to PDF by ScreenTalk™ Online
http://www.screentalk.org
PPSSYYCCHHOO
FFAADDEE IINN::
EEXXTT.. PPHHOOEENNIIXX,, AARRIIZZOONNAA -- ((DDAAYY)) -- HHEELLIICCOOPPTTEERR SSHHOOTT
AAbboovvee MMiiddttoowwnn sseeccttiioonn ooff tthhee cciittyy.. IItt iiss eeaarrllyy
aafftteerrnnoooonn,, aa hhoott mmiidd--ssuummmmeerr ddaayy.. TThhee cciittyy iiss ssuunn--
bbllaanncchheedd wwhhiittee aanndd iittss ddrriifftteedd--uupp nnooiisseess aarree mmuutteedd iinn
tthheeiirr oowwnn eecchhooeess.. WWee ffllyy llooww,, hheeaaddiinngg iinn aa ddoowwnnttoowwnn
ddiirreeccttiioonn,, ppaassssiinngg oovveerr ttrraaffffiicc--ccllooggggeedd ssttrreeeettss,, ppaarrkkiinngg
lloottss,, wwhhiittee bbuussiinneessss bbuuiillddiinnggss,, nneeaattllyy ppaatttteerrnneedd
rreessiiddeennttiiaall ddiissttrriiccttss.. AAss wwee aapppprrooaacchh ddoowwnnttoowwnn sseeccttiioonn,,
tthhee cchhaarraacctteerr ooff tthhee cciittyy bbeeggiinnss ttoo cchhaannggee.. IItt iiss
ddaarrkkeerr aanndd sshhaabbbbyy wwiitthh aaggee aanndd iinndduussttrryy.. WWee sseeee
rraaiillrrooaadd ttrraacckkss,, ssmmookkeessttaacckkss,, wwhhoolleessaallee ffrruuiitt--aanndd--
vveeggeettaabbllee mmaarrkkeettss,, oolldd mmuunniicciippaall bbuuiillddiinnggss,, eemmppttyy lloottss..
TThhee vveerryy ggeeooggrraapphhyy sseeeemmss ttoo ggiivvee uuss aa cclliimmaattee ooff
nneeffaarriioouussnneessss,, ooff bbaacckk--ddoooorrnneessss,, ddaarrkk aanndd sshhaaddoowwyy.. AAnndd
sseeccrreett..
WWee ffllyy lloowweerr aanndd ffaasstteerr nnooww,, aass iiff sseeeekkiinngg oouutt aa
ssppeecciiffiicc llooccaattiioonn.. AA sskkiinnnnyy,, hhiigghh oolldd hhootteell ccoommeess iinnttoo
vviieeww.. OOnn iittss eexxppoosseedd bbrriicckk ssiiddee ggrreeaatt ppaaiinntteedd lleetttteerrss
aaddvveerrttiissee ""TTrraannssiieennttss--LLooww WWeeeekkllyy RRaatteess--RRaaddiioo iinn EEvveerryy
RRoooomm.."" WWee ppaauussee lloonngg eennoouugghh ttoo eessttaabblliisshh tthhee sshhooddddyy
cchhaarraacctteerr ooff tthhiiss hhootteell.. IIttss ooppeenn,, ccuurrttaaiinnlleessss wwiinnddoowwss,,
iittss ssiilleenntt rreessiiggnneedd llooookk ssoo cchhaarraacctteerriissttiicc ooff ssuucchh hhoollee--
aanndd--ccoorrnneerr hhootteellss.. WWee mmoovvee ffoorrwwaarrdd wwiitthh ppuurrppoosseeffuullnneessss
ttoowwaarrdd aa cceerrttaaiinn wwiinnddooww.. TThhee ssaasshh iiss rraaiisseedd aass hhiigghh aass
iitt ccaann ggoo,, bbuutt tthhee sshhaaddee iiss ppuulllleedd ddoowwnn ttoo tthhrreeee oorr ffoouurr
iinncchheess ooff tthhee iinnssiiddee ssiillll,, aass iiff tthhee ooccccuuppaannttss ooff tthhee
rroooomm wwiitthhiinn wwaanntteedd pprriivvaaccyy bbuutt nneeeeddeedd aaiirr.. WWee aarree cclloossee
nnooww,, ssoo tthhaatt oonnllyy tthhee lloowweerr hhaallff ooff tthhee wwiinnddooww ffrraammee iiss
iinn sshhoott.. NNoo ssoouunnddss ccoommee ffrroomm wwiitthhiinn tthhee rroooomm..
SSuuddddeennllyy,, wwee ttiipp ddoowwnnwwaarrdd,, ggoo ttoo tthhee nnaarrrrooww ssppaaccee
bbeettwweeeenn sshhaaddee aanndd ssiillll,, ppeeeepp iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm..
AA yyoouunngg wwoommaann iiss ssttrreettcchheedd oouutt oonn tthhee mmuusssseedd bbeedd.. SShhee
wweeaarrss aa ffuullll sslliipp,, ssttoocckkiinnggss,, nnoo sshhooeess.. SShhee lliieess iinn aanndd
aattttiittuuddee ooff pphhyyssiiccaall rreellaaxxaattiioonn,, bbuutt hheerr ffaaccee,, sseeeenn iinn
tthhee ddiimmnneessss ooff tthhee rroooomm,, bbeettrraayyss aa cceerrttaaiinn iinnnneerr--
tteennssiioonn,, wwoorrrriissoommee ccoonnfflliiccttss.. SShhee iiss MMAARRYY CCRRAANNEE,, aann
aattttrraaccttiivvee ggiirrll nneeaarriinngg tthhee eenndd ooff hheerr ttwweennttiieess aanndd hheerr
rrooppee..
AA mmaann ssttaannddss bbeessiiddee tthhee bbeedd,, oonnllyy tthhee lloowweerr hhaallff ooff hhiiss
ffiigguurree vviissiibbllee.. WWee hhoolldd oonn tthhiiss ttaabblleeaauu ffoorr aa lloonngg
mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ssttaarrtt ffoorrwwaarrdd.. AAss wwee ppaassss uunnddeerr tthhee wwiinnddooww
sshhaaddee,,
CCUUTT TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 22..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE HHOOTTEELL RROOOOMM -- ((DDAAYY))
AA ssmmaallll rroooomm,, aa ssllooww ffaann bbuuzzzziinngg oonn aa sshheellff aabboovvee tthhee
nnaarrrrooww bbeedd.. AA ccaarrdd ooff hhootteell rruulleess iiss ppaasstteedd oonn tthhee
mmiirrrroorr aabboovvee tthhee bbuurreeaauu.. AAnn uunnooppeenneedd ssuuiittccaassee aanndd aa
wwoommaann''ss llaarrggee,, ssttrraaww ooppeenn--ttoopp hhaannddbbaagg aarree oonn tthhee bbuurreeaauu..
OOnn tthhee ttaabbllee bbeessiiddee tthhee bbeedd tthheerree aarree aa ccoonnttaaiinneerr ooff
ccooccoo--ccoollaa aanndd aann uunnwwrraappppeedd,, uunnttoouucchheedd eegggg--ssaallaadd
ssaannddwwiicchh.. TThheerree iiss nnoo rraaddiioo..
TThhee mmaann ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee bbeedd,, wweeaarriinngg oonnllyy ttrroouusseerrss,, TT--
sshhiirrtt aanndd ssooxx,, iiss SSAAMM LLOOOOMMIISS,, aa ggoooodd--llooookkiinngg,, sseennssuuaall
mmaann wwiitthh wwaarrmm hhuummoorroouuss eeyyeess aanndd aa ccoommppeelllliinngg ssmmiillee.. HHee
iiss bblloottttiinngg hhiiss nneecckk aanndd ffaaccee wwiitthh aa tthhiinn ttoowweell,, aanndd iiss
ssttaarriinngg ddoowwnn aatt MMaarryy,, aa ssmmaallll sswweeeett ssmmiillee ppllaayyiinngg aabboouutt
hhiiss mmoouutthh.. MMaarryy kkeeeeppss hheerr ffaaccee ttuurrnneedd aawwaayy ffrroomm hhiimm..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, SSaamm ddrrooppss tthhee ttoowweell,, ssiittss oonn tthhee bbeedd,,
lleeaannss oovveerr aanndd ttaakkeess MMaarryy iinnttoo hhiiss aarrmmss,, kkiisssseess hheerr lloonngg
aanndd wwaarrmmllyy,, hhoollddss hheerr wwiitthh aa ffiirrmm ppoosssseessssiivveenneessss.. TThhee
kkiissss iiss ddiissttuurrbbeedd aanndd ffiinnaallllyy iinntteerrrruupptteedd bbyy tthhee bbuuzzzziinngg
cclloosseenneessss ooff aann iinnccoonnssiiddeerraattee ffllyy.. SSaamm ssmmiilleess,, ppuullllss
aawwaayy eennoouugghh ttoo aallllooww MMaarryy ttoo rreellaaxx aaggaaiinn aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee
ppiillllooww.. HHee ssttuuddiieess hheerr,, ffrroowwnnss aatt hheerr uunnrreessppoonnssiivveenneessss,,
tthheenn ssppeeaakkss iinn aa llooww,, iinnttiimmaattee,, ppllaayyffuull vvooiiccee..
SSAAMM
NNeevveerr ddiidd eeaatt yyoouurr lluunncchh,, ddiidd yyoouu..
MMaarryy llooookkss aatt hhiiss ssmmiillee,, hhaass ttoo rreessppoonndd,, ppuullllss hhiimm ttoo
hheerr,, kkiisssseess hhiimm.. TThheenn,, aanndd wwiitthhoouutt bbrreeaakkiinngg tthhee kkiissss,,
sshhee sswwiinnggss hheerr lleeggss oovveerr tthhee ssiiddee ooff tthhee bbeedd,, ttooee--
sseeaarrcchheess aarroouunndd,, ffiinnddss hheerr sshhooeess,, sslliippss hheerr ffeeeett iinnttoo
tthheemm.. AAnndd ffiinnaallllyy ppuullllss aawwaayy aanndd ssiittss uupp..
MMAARRYY
II bbeetttteerr ggeett bbaacckk ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee..
TThheessee eexxtteennddeedd lluunncchh hhoouurrss ggiivvee mmyy
bboossss eexxcceessss aacciidd..
SShhee rriisseess,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee bbuurreeaauu,, ttaakkeess aa ppaaiirr ooff ssmmaallll
eeaarrrriinnggss oouutt ooff hheerr bbaagg,, bbeeggiinnss ppuuttttiinngg tthheemm oonn,, nnoott
bbootthheerriinngg oorr ppeerrhhaappss nnoott wwaannttiinngg ttoo llooookk aatt hheerrsseellff iinn
tthhee mmiirrrroorr.. SSaamm wwaattcchheess hheerr,, ccoonncceerrnneedd bbuutt uunnaabbllee ttoo
iinnhhiibbiitt hhiiss cchheeeerryy,, hhuummoorroouuss ggoooodd mmoooodd.. TThhrroouugghhoouutt
rreemmaaiinnddeerr ooff tthhiiss sscceennee,, tthheeyy ooccccuuppyy tthheemmsseellvveess wwiitthh
ddrreessssiinngg,, hhaaiirr--ccoommbbiinngg,, eettcc..
SSAAMM
CCaallll yyoouurr bboossss aanndd tteellll hhiimm yyoouu''rree
ttaakkiinngg tthhee rreesstt ooff tthhee aafftteerrnnoooonn
ooffff.. IItt''ss FFrriiddaayy aannyywwaayy ...... aanndd
hhoott..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 33..
MMAARRYY
((ssoofftt ssaarrccaassmm))
WWhhaatt ddoo II ddoo wwiitthh mmyy ffrreeee
aafftteerrnnoooonn,, wwaallkk yyoouu ttoo tthhee aaiirrppoorrtt??
SSAAMM
((mmeeaanniinnggffuullllyy))
WWee ccoouulldd llaazzee aarroouunndd hheerree aa wwhhiillee
lloonnggeerr..
MMAARRYY
CChheecckkiinngg oouutt ttiimmee iiss tthhrreeee PP..MM..
HHootteellss ooff tthhiiss ssoorrtt aarreenn''tt
iinntteerreesstteedd iinn yyoouu wwhheenn yyoouu ccoommee iinn,,
bbuutt wwhheenn yyoouurr ttiimmee''ss uupp ........
((aa ssmmaallll aanngguuiisshh))
SSaamm,, II hhaattee hhaavviinngg ttoo bbee wwiitthh yyoouu
iinn aa ppllaaccee lliikkee tthhiiss..
SSAAMM
II''vvee hheeaarrdd ooff mmaarrrriieedd ccoouupplleess wwhhoo
ddeelliibbeerraatteellyy ssppeenndd ooccccaassiioonnaall
nniigghhttss iinn cchheeaapp hhootteellss.. TThheeyy ssaayy
iitt ......
MMAARRYY
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
WWhheenn yyoouu''rree mmaarrrriieedd yyoouu ccaann ddoo aa
lloott ooff tthhiinnggss ddeelliibbeerraatteellyy..
SSAAMM
YYoouu ssuurree ttaallkk lliikkee aa ggiirrll wwhhoo''ss
bbeeeenn mmaarrrriieedd..
MMAARRYY
SSaamm!!
SSAAMM
II''mm ssoorrrryy,, MMaarryy..
((aafftteerr aa mmoommeenntt))
MMyy oolldd DDaadd uusseedd ttoo ssaayy ''wwhheenn yyoouu
ccaann''tt cchhaannggee aa ssiittuuaattiioonn,, llaauugghh aatt
iitt..'' NNootthhiinngg rriiddiiccuulleess aa tthhiinngg
lliikkee llaauugghhiinngg aatt iitt..
MMAARRYY
II''vvee lloosstt mmyy ggiirrlliisshh llaauugghhtteerr..
SSAAMM
((oobbsseerrvviinngg))
TThhee oonnllyy ggiirrlliisshh tthhiinngg yyoouu hhaavvee
lloosstt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 44..
MMAARRYY
((aa mmeeaanniinnggffuull qquuiieett,,
tthheenn,, wwiitthh
ddiiffffiiccuullttyy::))
SSaamm.. TThhiiss iiss tthhee llaasstt ttiimmee..
SSAAMM
FFoorr wwhhaatt??
MMAARRYY
TThhiiss!! MMeeeettiinngg yyoouu iinn sseeccrreett ssoo wwee
ccaann bbee ...... sseeccrreettiivvee!! YYoouu ccoommee
ddoowwnn hheerree oonn bbuussiinneessss ttrriippss aanndd wwee
sstteeaall lluunncchh hhoouurrss aanndd ...... II wwiisshh
yyoouu wwoouullddnn''tt eevveenn ccoommee..
SSAAMM
OOkkaayy.. WWhhaatt ddoo wwee ddoo iinnsstteeaadd,, wwrriittee
eeaacchh ootthheerr lluurriidd lloovvee lleetttteerrss??
MMAARRYY
((aabboouutt ttoo aarrgguuee,, tthheenn
ttuurrnniinngg aawwaayy))
II hhaavveenn''tt ttiimmee ttoo aarrgguuee.. II''mm aa
wwoorrkkiinngg ggiirrll..
SSAAMM
AAnndd II''mm aa wwoorrkkiinngg mmaann!! WWee''rree aa
rreegguullaarr wwoorrkkiinngg--ccllaassss ttrraaggeeddyy!!
((hhee llaauugghhss))
MMAARRYY
IItt iiss ttrraaggiicc!! OOrr iitt wwiillll bbee...... iiff
wwee ggoo oonn mmeeeettiinngg iinn sshhaabbbbyy hhootteellss
wwhheenneevveerr yyoouu ccaann ffiinndd aa ttaaxx--
ddeedduuccttiibbllee eexxccuussee ffoorr ffllyyiinngg ddoowwnn
hheerree ........
SSAAMM
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg,,
sseerriioouussllyy))
YYoouu ccaann''tt llaauugghh aatt iitt,, hhuuhh??
MMAARRYY
CCaann yyoouu??
SSAAMM
SSuurree.. IItt''ss lliikkee llaauugghhiinngg tthhrroouugghh
aa bbrrookkeenn jjaaww,, bbuutt ........
HHee bbrreeaakkss ooffff,, hhiiss cchheeeerriinneessss ddiissssoollvveedd,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee
wwiinnddooww,, ttrriieess ttoo rraaiissee tthhee sshhaaddee.. IItt ssttiicckkss.. HHee ppuullllss
aatt iitt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 55..
IItt ccoommeess ddoowwnn eennttiirreellyy,, aanndd tthhee hhoott ssuunn ggllaarreess iinnttoo tthhee
rroooomm,, rreevveeaalliinngg iitt iinn aallll iittss sshhaabbbbiinneessss aanndd ssoorrddiiddnneessss
aass iiff ccoorrrroobboorraattiinngg MMaarryy''ss wwoorrddss aanndd aattttiittuuddee.. SSaamm
kkiicckkss aatt tthhee ffaalllleenn sshhaaddee,, llaauugghhss iinn ffrruussttrraattiioonn,, ggrraabbss
oonn ttoo hhiiss hhuummoorr aaggaaiinn..
SSAAMM
AAnndd bbeessiiddeess,, wwhheenn yyoouu ssaayy II mmaakkee
ttaaxx--ddeedduuccttiibbllee eexxccuusseess yyoouu mmaakkee mmee
oouutt aa ccrriimmiinnaall..
MMAARRYY
((hhaavviinngg ttoo ssmmiillee))
YYoouu ccoouullddnn''tt bbee aa ccrriimmiinnaall iiff yyoouu
ccoommmmiitttteedd aa mmaajjoorr ccrriimmee..
SSAAMM
II wwiisshh II wweerree.. NNoott aann aaccttiivvee
ccrriimmiinnaall bbuutt ...... aa nniiccee gguuyy wwiitthh
tthhee ccoonnsscciieennccee ooff aa ccrriimmiinnaall..
((ggooeess cclloossee ttoo mmaarryy,,
ttoouucchheess hheerr))
NNeexxtt bbeesstt tthhiinngg ttoo nnoo ccoonnsscciieennccee aatt
aallll..
MMAARRYY
((ppuulllliinngg aawwaayy))
II hhaavvee ttoo ggoo,, SSaamm..
SSAAMM
II ccaann ccoommee ddoowwnn nneexxtt wweeeekk..
MMAARRYY
NNoo..
SSAAMM
NNoott eevveenn jjuusstt ttoo sseeee yyoouu,, ttoo hhaavvee
lluunncchh ...... iinn ppuubblliicc??
MMAARRYY
WWee ccaann sseeee eeaacchh ootthheerr,, wwee ccaann eevveenn
hhaavvee ddiinnnneerr ...... bbuutt rreessppeeccttaabbllyy,, iinn
mmyy hhoouussee wwiitthh mmyy mmootthheerr''ss ppiiccttuurree
oonn tthhee mmaanntteell aanndd mmyy ssiisstteerr hheellppiinngg
mmee bbrrooiill aa bbiigg sstteeaakk ffoorr tthhrreeee!!
SSAAMM
AAnndd aafftteerr tthhee sstteeaakk ...... ddoo wwee sseenndd
SSiisstteerr ttoo tthhee mmoovviieess aanndd ttuurrnn
MMaammaa''ss ppiiccttuurree ttoo tthhee wwaallll??
MMAARRYY
SSaamm!! NNoo!!
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 66..
SSAAMM
((aafftteerr aa ppaauussee,, ssiimmppllyy))
AAllll rriigghhtt..
SShhee ssttaarreess aatt hhiimm,, ssuurrpprriisseedd aatt hhiiss wwiilllliinnggnneessss ttoo
ccoonnttiinnuuee tthhee aaffffaaiirr oonn hheerr tteerrmmss,, aass ggiirrllss aarree ssoo oofftteenn
ssuurrpprriisseedd wwhheenn tthheeyy ddiissccoovveerr mmeenn wwiillll ccoonnttiinnuuee ttoo wwaanntt
tthheemm eevveenn aafftteerr tthhee sseexxuuaall bbaaiitt hhaass bbeeeenn ppuulllleedd iinn.. SSaamm
ssmmiilleess rreeaassssuurriinnggllyy,, ppllaacceess hhiiss hhaannddss ggeennttllyy oonn hheerr
aarrmmss,, ssppeeaakkss wwiitthh ggeennttllee aanndd ssiimmppllee ssiinncceerriittyy..
SSAAMM
MMaarryy,, wwhheenneevveerr iitt''ss ppoossssiibbllee,, ttaaxx--
ddeedduuccttiibbllee oorr nnoott,, II wwaanntt ttoo sseeee
yyoouu.. AAnndd uunnddeerr aannyy ccoonnddiittiioonnss..
((aa ssmmiillee))
EEvveenn rreessppeeccttaabbiilliittyy..
MMAARRYY
YYoouu mmaakkee rreessppeeccttaabbiilliittyy ssoouunndd ......
ddiissrreessppeeccttffuull..
SSAAMM
((bbrriigghhttllyy))
II''mm aallll ffoorr iitt!! IItt rreeqquuiirreess
ppaattiieennccee aanndd tteemmppeerraannccee aanndd aa lloott
ooff sswweeaattiinngg--oouutt ...... ootthheerrwwiissee,,
tthhoouugghh,, iitt''ss oonnllyy hhaarrdd wwoorrkk..
((aa ppaauussee))
BBuutt iiff II ccaann sseeee yyoouu,, ttoouucchh yyoouu
eevveenn aass ssiimmppllyy aass tthhiiss ...... II wwoonn''tt
mmiinndd..
HHee mmoovveess aawwaayy aanndd aaggaaiinn tthhee wweeiigghhtt ooff hhiiss ppaaiinn aanndd
pprroobblleemmss ccrruusshheess aawwaayy hhiiss ggoooodd hhuummoorr.. TThheerree iiss aa qquuiieett
mmoommeenntt..
SSAAMM
II''mm ffeedd uupp wwiitthh sswweeaattiinngg ffoorr ppeeooppllee
wwhhoo aarreenn''tt tthheerree.. II sswweeaatt ttoo ppaayy
ooffff mmyy ffaatthheerr''ss ddeebbttss ...... aanndd hhee''ss
iinn hhiiss ggrraavvee ...... II sswweeaatt ttoo ppaayy mmyy
eexx--wwiiffee aalliimmoonnyy,, aanndd sshhee''ss lliivviinngg
oonn tthhee ootthheerr ssiiddee ooff tthhee wwoorrlldd
ssoommeewwhheerree..
MMAARRYY
((aa ssmmiillee))
II ppaayy,, ttoooo.. TThheeyy aallssoo ppaayy wwhhoo mmeeeett
iinn hhootteell rroooommss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 77..
SSAAMM
AA ccoouuppllee ooff yyeeaarrss aanndd tthhee ddeebbttss
wwiillll bbee ppaaiidd ooffff.. AAnndd iiff sshhee eevveerr
rree--mmaarrrriieess,, tthhee aalliimmoonnyy ssttooppss ......
aanndd tthheenn ......
MMAARRYY
II hhaavveenn''tt eevveenn bbeeeenn mmaarrrriieedd oonnccee
yyeett!!
SSAAMM
YYeeaahh,, bbuutt wwhheenn yyoouu ddoo ...... yyoouu''llll
sswwiinngg..
MMAARRYY
((ssmmiilliinngg,, tthheenn wwiitthh aa
tteerrrriibbllee uurrggeennccyy))
SSaamm,, lleett''ss ggoo ggeett mmaarrrriieedd..
SSAAMM
AAnndd lliivvee wwiitthh mmee iinn aa ssttoorreerroooomm
bbeehhiinndd aa hhaarrddwwaarree ssttoorree iinn
FFaaiirrvvaallee.. WWee''llll hhaavvee aa lloott ooff
llaauugghhss.. WWhheenn II sseenndd mmyy eexx--wwiiffee hheerr
mmoonneeyy,, yyoouu ccaann lliicckk tthhee ssttaammppss..
MMAARRYY
((aa ddeeeepp ddeessppeerraattiioonn))
II''llll lliicckk tthhee ssttaammppss..
HHee llooookkss aatt hheerr,, lloonngg,, ppuullllss hheerr cclloossee,, kkiisssseess hheerr
lliigghhttllyy,, llooookkss oouutt tthhee wwiinnddooww aanndd ssttaarreess aatt tthhee wwiiddee sskkyy..
SSAAMM
YYoouu kknnooww wwhhaatt II''dd lliikkee?? AA cclleeaarr,,
eemmppttyy sskkyy ...... aanndd aa ppllaannee,, aanndd uuss
iinn iitt ...... aanndd ssoommeewwhheerree aa pprriivvaattee
iissllaanndd ffoorr ssaallee,, wwhheerree wwee ccaann rruunn
aarroouunndd wwiitthhoouutt oouurr ...... sshhooeess oonn..
AAnndd tthhee wwhheerreewwiitthhaall ttoo bbuuyy wwhhaatt II''dd
lliikkee..
((hhee mmoovveess aawwaayy,,
ssuuddddeennllyy sseerriioouuss))
MMaarryy,, yyoouu wwaanntt ttoo ccuutt tthhiiss ooffff,, ggoo
oouutt aanndd ffiinndd yyoouurrsseellff ssoommeeoonnee
aavvaaiillaabbllee..
MMAARRYY
II''mm tthhiinnkkiinngg ooff iitt..
SSAAMM
((aa cchheeeerrffuull sshhoouutt))
HHooww ccaann yyoouu eevveenn tthhiinnkk aa tthhiinngg lliikkee
tthhaatt!!
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 88..
MMAARRYY
((ppiicckkiinngg uupp hhaannddbbaagg,,
ssttaarrttiinngg ffoorr ddoooorr))
DDoonn''tt mmiissss yyoouurr ppllaannee..
SSAAMM
HHeeyy,, wwee ccaann lleeaavvee ttooggeetthheerr ccaann''tt wwee??
MMAARRYY
((aatt ddoooorr))
II''mm llaattee ...... aanndd yyoouu hhaavvee ttoo ppuutt
yyoouurr sshhooeess oonn..
MMaarryy ggooeess oouutt qquuiicckkllyy,, cclloossiinngg ddoooorr bbeehhiinndd hheerr.. AAss SSaamm
ssttaarreess ddoowwnn aatt hhiiss sshhooeelleessss ffeeeett,,
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. DDOOWWNNTTOOWWNN SSTTRREEEETT -- ((DDAAYY)) -- HHIIGGHH AANNGGLLEE
SShhoooottiinngg ddoowwnn aatt hhootteell eennttrraannccee.. MMaarryy ccoommeess oouutt,, wwaallkkss
qquuiicckkllyy ttoo aa ppaarrkkeedd ccaabb,, ggeettss iinn.. TThhee ccaabb zzoooommss uupp tthhee
aawwffuull ssttrreeeett..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. LLOOWWEERRYY RREEAALL EESSTTAATTEE OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
AA ssmmaallll,, mmooddeerraatteellyy ssuucccceessssffuull ooffffiiccee ooffff tthhee mmaaiinn
ssttrreeeett.. AA ccaabb ppuullllss uupp aatt tthhee ccuurrbb.. WWee sseeee MMaarryy ggeett
oouutt ooff ccaabb,, ppaayy ddrriivveerr,, ccrroossss ppaavveemmeenntt ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee
ddoooorr..
IINNTT.. OOUUTTEERR OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy eenntteerrss ooffffiiccee,, ccrroosssseess ttoo hheerr ddeesskk,, ssiittss ddoowwnn,, rruubbss
hheerr tteemmpplleess,, ffiinnaallllyy llooookkss oovveerr aatt CCaarroolliinnee,, aa ggiirrll iinn
tthhee llaasstt ooff hheerr tteeeennss..
MMAARRYY
IIssnn''tt MMrr.. LLoowweerryy bbaacckk ffrroomm lluunncchh??
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
((aa hhiigghh,, bbrriigghhtt,, eeaaggeerr--
ttoo--ttaallkk vvooiiccee llaacceedd
wwiitthh aa vvaagguuee TTeexxaann
aacccceenntt))
HHee''ss lluunncchhiinngg wwiitthh tthhee mmaann wwhhoo''ss
bbuuyyiinngg tthhee HHaarrrriiss SSttrreeeett pprrooppeerrttyy,,
yyoouu kknnooww,, tthhaatt ooiill lleeaassee mmaann ......
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 99..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE ((ccoonntt''dd))
ssoo tthhaatt''ss wwhhyy hhee''ss llaattee..
((aa ppaauussee,, tthheenn,, aass
MMaarryy ddooeess nnoott rreessppoonndd
ttoo tthhee ppooiinntteedd tthhrruusstt))
YYoouu ggeettttiinngg aa hheeaaddaacchhee??
MMAARRYY
IItt''llll ppaassss.. HHeeaaddaacchheess aarree lliikkee
rreessoolluuttiioonnss ...... yyoouu ffoorrggeett tthheemm
ssoooonn aass tthheeyy ssttoopp hhuurrttiinngg..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
YYoouu ggoott aassppiirriinnss?? II hhaavvee ssoommeetthhiinngg
...... nnoott aassppiirriinnss,, bbuutt
((cchheeeerrffuullllyy ttaakkeess
bboottttllee ooff ppiillllss oouutt
ooff ddeesskk ddrraawweerr))
mmyy mmootthheerr''ss ddooccttoorr ggaavvee tthheessee ttoo mmee
tthhee ddaayy ooff mmyy wweeddddiinngg..
((llaauugghhss))
TTeeddddyy wwaass ffuurriioouuss wwhheenn hhee ffoouunndd oouutt
II''dd ttaakkeenn ttrraannqquuiilliizzeerrss!!
SShhee rriisseess,, ssttaarrttss ffoorr MMaarryy''ss ddeesskk,, ppiillllss iinn hhaanndd..
MMAARRYY
WWeerree tthheerree aannyy ccaallllss??
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
TTeeddddyy ccaalllleedd.. MMee ...... AAnndd mmyy mmootthheerr
ccaalllleedd ttoo sseeee iiff TTeeddddyy ccaalllleedd.. OOhh,,
aanndd yyoouurr ssiisstteerr ccaalllleedd ttoo ssaayy sshhee''ss
ggooiinngg ttoo TTuuccssoonn ttoo ddoo ssoommee bbuuyyiinngg
aanndd sshhee''llll bbee ggoonnee tthhee wwhhoollee
wweeeekkeenndd aanndd ......
SShhee bbrreeaakkss ooffff,, ddiissttrraacctteedd bbyy tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee ddoooorr
ooppeenniinngg.. MMRR.. LLOOWWEERRYY aanndd hhiiss ooiill--lleeaassee cclliieenntt,, TTOOMM
CCAASSSSIIDDYY eenntteerr tthhee ooffffiiccee.. LLoowweerryy iiss aa pplleeaassaanntt,, wwoorrrriieedd--
ffaacceedd mmaann,, bbiigg aanndd aa ttrriiffllee ppoommppoouuss.. CCaassssiiddyy iiss vveerryy
lloouudd aanndd hhaass aa lluunncchh--hhoouurr llooaadd oonn.. HHee iiss aa ggrroossss mmaann,,
eexxuuddiinngg aa kkiinndd ooff ppiittiiffuull vvuullggaarriittyy..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
WWooww!! HHoott aass ffrreesshh mmiillkk!! YYoouu ggiirrllss
sshhoouulldd ggeett yyoouurr bboossss ttoo aaiirr--
ccoonnddiittiioonn yyoouu uupp.. HHee ccaann aaffffoorrdd iitt
ttooddaayy..
LLoowweerryy ffllaasshheess aann eemmbbaarrrraasssseedd ssmmiillee aatt MMaarryy,, ttrriieess ttoo
lleeaadd CCaassssiiddyy ttoowwaarrdd tthhee pprriivvaattee ooffffiiccee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1100..
LLOOWWEERRYY
MMaarryy,, wwiillll yyoouu ggeett tthhoossee ccooppiieess ooff
tthhee ddeeeedd rreeaaddyy ffoorr MMrr.. CCaassssiiddyy..
CCaassssiiddyy ppaauusseess bbeessiiddee MMaarryy''ss ddeesskk,, hhooookkss aa hhaauunncchh oonnttoo
tthhee ddeesskkttoopp,, ssmmiilleess aa wweett ssmmiillee aatt MMaarryy..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
TToommoorrrrooww''ss tthhee ddaayy!! MMyy sswweeeett
lliittttllee ggiirrll ........
((llaauugghhss aass MMaarryy llooookkss
uupp aatt hhiimm))
NNoott yyoouu,, mmyy ddaauugghhtteerr!! AA bbaabbyy,, aanndd
ttoommoorrrrooww sshhee ssttaannddss uupp tthheerree aanndd
ggeettss hheerr sswweeeett sseellff mmaarrrriieedd aawwaayy
ffrroomm mmee!!
((ppuulllliinngg oouutt wwaalllleett))
II wwaanntt yyoouu ttoo llooookk aatt mmyy bbaabbyy..
EEiigghhtteeeenn yyeeaarrss oolldd ...... aanndd sshhee''ss
nneevveerr hhaadd aann uunnhhaappppyy ddaayy iinn aannyy oonnee
ooff tthhoossee yyeeaarrss!!
((ffllaasshheess pphhoottoo))
MMaarryy ggllaanncceess,, ccaannnnoott bbrriinngg hheerrsseellff ttoo ssmmiillee oorr mmaakkee ssoommee
rreemmaarrkk,, ccoonnttiinnuueess ssoorrttiinngg oouutt tthhee ddeeeedd ccooppiieess,, ttrriieess ttoo
iiggnnoorree tthhee mmaann''ss hhoott--bbrreeaatthh cclloosseenneessss..
LLOOWWEERRYY
CCoommee oonn,, TToomm,, mmyy ooffffiiccee iiss aaiirr--
ccoonnddiittiioonneedd..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
((iiggnnoorriinngg LLoowweerryy))
YYoouu kknnooww wwhhaatt II ddoo wwiitthh
uunnhhaappppiinneessss?? II bbuuyy iitt ooffff!! YYoouu
uunnhhaappppyy??
MMAARRYY
NNoott iinnoorrddiinnaatteellyy..
((ppuuttss ddeeeedd ccooppyy iinnttoo
CCaassssiiddyy''ss ttoooo--cclloossee
hhaanndd))
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
II''mm bbuuyyiinngg tthhiiss hhoouussee ffoorr mmyy bbaabbyy''ss
wweeddddiinngg pprreesseenntt.. FFoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd
ddoollllaarrss,, ccaasshh!! NNooww tthhaatt aaiinn''tt
bbuuyyiinngg hhaappppiinneessss,, tthhaatt''ss bbuuyyiinngg ooffff
uunnhhaappppiinneessss!! TThhaatt ppeennnniilleessss ppuunnkk
sshhee''ss mmaarrrryyiinn'' ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1111..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
((llaauugghhss))
PPrroobbaabbllyy aa ggoooodd kkiidd ...... iitt''ss jjuusstt
tthhaatt II hhaattee hhiimm..
((llooookkss aatt ddeeeedd))
YYuupp!! FFoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd,, ssaayyss hheerree ........
((ttoo LLoowweerryy))
CCaasshhaarroooonniiee!!
HHee ttaakkeess oouutt ooff hhiiss iinnssiiddee ppoocckkeett,, ttwwoo sseeppaarraattee bbuunnddlleess
ooff nneeww $$110000 bbiillllss aanndd tthhrroowwss tthheemm oonnttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, uunnddeerr
MMaarryy''ss nnoossee.. CCaarroolliinnee''ss eeyyeess ggoo wwiiddee aatt tthhee ssiigghhtt ooff
tthhee gglloorriioouuss ggrreeeenn bbuunnddlleess ooff bbiillllss,, aanndd sshhee ccoommeess cclloossee
ttoo tthhee ddeesskk.. CCaassssiiddyy lleeaannss tteerrrriibbllyy cclloossee ttoo MMaarryy,,
fflliicckkss tthhrroouugghh tthhee bbiillllss,, llaauugghhss wwiicckkeeddllyy..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
II nneevveerr ccaarrrryy mmoorree tthhaann II ccaann
aaffffoorrdd ttoo lloossee!!
((cclloosseerr ttoo MMaarryy))
CCoouunntt ''eemm!!
LLOOWWEERRYY
((sshhoocckkeedd,, wwoorrrriieedd))
TToomm ...... ccaasshh ttrraannssaaccttiioonnss ooff tthhiiss
ssiizzee!! MMoosstt iirrrreegguullaarr ........
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
SSoo wwhhaatt?? IItt''ss mmyy pprriivvaattee mmoonneeyy!!
((llaauugghhss,, wwiinnkkss,, eellbboowwss
LLoowweerryy))
AAnndd nnooww iitt''ss yyoouurrss..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
((ssttaarriinngg aatt tthhee mmoonneeyy))
II ddeeccllaarree!!
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
((wwhhiissppeerriinngg))
II ddoonn''tt!! TThhaatt''ss hhooww II''mm aabbllee ttoo
kkeeeepp iitt!!
((llaauugghhss))
LLOOWWEERRYY
((hhaassttiillyy iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
SSuuppppoossee wwee jjuusstt ppuutt tthhiiss iinn tthhee
ssaaffee aanndd tthheenn MMoonnddaayy mmoorrnniinngg wwhheenn
yyoouu''rree ffeeeelliinngg ggoooodd ........
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
SSppeeaakkiinn'' ooff ffeeeelliinngg ggoooodd,, wwhheerree''ss
tthhaatt bboottttllee yyoouu ssaaiidd yyoouu hhaadd iinn
yyoouurr ddeesskk ........
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1122..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY ((ccoonntt''dd))
((llaauugghhss,, aass iiff hhaavviinngg
ggiivveenn aawwaayy LLoowweerryy''ss
sseeccrreett))
OOooppss!!
((ttoo MMaarryy,, ppaattttiinngg hheerr
aarrmm))
UUssuuaallllyy II ccaann kkeeeepp mmyy mmoouutthh sshhuutt!!
HHee rriisseess,, rreeeellss ttoowwaarrdd LLoowweerryy''ss ooffffiiccee,, ppaauusseess,, ttuurrnnss,,
ssppeeaakkss ttoo MMaarryy,, mmeeaanniinnggffuullllyy..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
HHoonneesstt.. II ccaann kkeeeepp aannyy pprriivvaattee
ttrraannssaaccttiioonn aa sseeccrreett ...... aannyy pprrii........
((ssttooppppeedd bbyy MMaarryy''ss
ccoolldd ggaazzee))
LLoowweerryy!! II''mm ddyyiinn'' ooff tthhiirrssttaarroooonniiee!!
LLoowweerryy ssttaarrttss aafftteerr hhiimm,, ppaauusseess,, ttuurrnnss ttoo MMaarryy.. CCaassssiiddyy
hhaass ggoonnee iinnttoo LLoowweerr''ss ooffffiiccee..
LLOOWWEERRYY
((qquuiieettllyy))
II ddoonn''tt eevveenn wwaanntt iitt iinn tthhee ooffffiiccee
oovveerr tthhee wweeeekkeenndd.. PPuutt iitt iinn tthhee
ssaaffee ddeeppoossiitt bbooxx,, aatt tthhee bbaannkk,,
MMaarryy.. AAnndd wwee''llll ggeett hhiimm ttoo ggiivvee uuss
aa cchheecckk oonn MMoonnddaayy -- iinnsstteeaadd..
HHee ssttaarrttss qquuiicckkllyy aawwaayy wwhheenn iitt llooookkss lliikkee CCaassssiiddyy iiss
ggooiinngg ttoo ccoommee aanndd ppuullll hhiimm bbooddiillyy iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee.. WWhheenn
tthhee mmeenn aarree ggoonnee aanndd tthhee ddoooorr iiss cclloosseedd,, CCaarroolliinnee ppiicckkss
uupp aa bbuunnddllee,, ssmmiilleess aatt iitt..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
HHee wwaass fflliirrttiinngg wwiitthh yyoouu.. II gguueessss
hhee nnoottiicceedd mmyy wweeeeddiinngg rriinngg..
MMaarryy hhaass ppuutt oonnee bbuunnddllee iinnttoo aa llaarrggee eennvveellooppee aanndd ttaakkeess
tthhee ootthheerr ffrroomm CCaarroolliinnee.. WWhheenn tthhee bbiillllss aarree aawwaayy,, sshhee
ppuuttttss tthhee ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee iinn hheerr hhaannddbbaagg,, nnoottiicceess tthhee
rreemmaaiinniinngg ddeeeedd ccooppiieess oonn hheerr ddeesskk,, ppiicckkss tthheemm uupp,, ggooeess
ttoo tthhee pprriivvaattee ooffffiiccee ddoooorr,, kknnoocckkss,, ssttaarrttss ttoo ooppeenn ddoooorr
aass::
LLOOWWEERRYY ((OO..SS..))
CCoommee iinn..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1133..
IINNTT.. LLOOWWEERRYY''SS PPRRIIVVAATTEE OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy ooppeennss ddoooorr,, llooookkss iinn.. CCaassssiiddyy iiss ddrriinnkkiinngg ffrroomm aa
llaarrggee ttuummbblleerr,, wwiinnkkss aatt hheerr wwiitthhoouutt ppaauussiinngg iinn hhiiss
ddrriinnkkiinngg.. MMaarryy rreemmaaiinnss oonn ttrreesshhoolldd aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn
ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, ttaallkkiinngg aass sshhee ggooeess..
MMAARRYY
TThhee ccooppiieess.. MMrr.. LLoowweerryy,, iiff yyoouu
ddoonn''tt mmiinndd,, II''dd lliikkee ttoo ggoo rriigghhtt oonn
hhoommee aafftteerr tthhee bbaannkk.. II hhaavvee aa
sslliigghhtt........
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
YYoouu ggoo rriigghhtt hhoommee!! MMee aanndd yyoouurr
bboossss aarree ggooiinngg oouutt ttoo ggeett oouurrsseellvveess
aa lliittttllee ddrriinnkkiinn'' ddoonnee!!
((ttoo LLoowweerryy))
RRiigghhtt??
LLOOWWEERRYY
((ttoo MMaarryy))
OOff ccoouurrssee.. YYoouu ffeeeelliinngg iillll??
MMAARRYY
AA hheeaaddaacchhee..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
YYoouu nneeeedd aa wweeeekk--eenndd iinn LLaass VVeeggaass
...... ppllaayyggrroouunndd ooff tthhee wwoorrlldd!!
MMAARRYY
II''mm ggooiinngg ttoo ssppeenndd tthhiiss wweeeekk--eenndd iinn
bbeedd..
((ssttaarrttss oouutt))
CCAASSSSIIDDYY
((ttoo LLoowweerryy))
OOnnllyy ppllaayyggrroouunndd tthhaatt bbeeaattss LLaass
VVeeggaass!!
MMaarryy ggooeess bbaacckk oouutt iinnttoo tthhee oouutteerr ooffffiiccee,, cclloosseess ddoooorr..
IINNTT.. OOUUTTEERR OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy ggooeess ttoo hheerr ddeesskk,, ttaakkeess tthhee hhaannddbbaagg,, cchheecckkss ttoo mmaakkee
ssuurree tthhee mmoonneeyy--ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee iiss ttuucckkeedd wweellll ddoowwnn iinnttoo
iitt.. DDuurriinngg tthhiiss::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1144..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE
AArreenn''tt yyoouu ggooiinngg ttoo ttaakkee tthhee ppiillllss??
((aass MMaarryy sshhaakkeess hheerr
hheeaadd))
TThheeyy''llll kknnoocckk tthhaatt hheeaaddaacchhee oouutt..
MMAARRYY
II ddoonn''tt nneeeedd ppiillllss ...... jjuusstt sslleeeepp..
SShhee ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE::
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS BBEEDDRROOOOMM -- ((DDAAYY))
AA ddoouubbllee bbeedd iinn tthhee ffoorreeggrroouunndd.. WWee jjuusstt sseeee tthhee ffaarr
ssiiddee aass tthhee CCAAMMEERRAA SSHHOOOOTTSS aaccrroossss.. MMaarryy eenntteerrss tthhee
sscceennee,, ccllaadd oonnllyy iinn hheerr sslliipp.. PPeerrhhaappss sshhee iiss aabboouutt ttoo
ggeett iinnttoo bbeedd.. BBeehhiinndd hheerr iiss aann ooppeenn cclloosseett,, bbuutt ttoooo
ddaarrkk iinnssiiddee ffoorr uuss ttoo sseeee aannyy ccoonntteennttss.. AAss MMaarryy ttuurrnnss
ttoo tthhee cclloosseett tthhee CCAAMMEERRAA LLOOWWEERRSS ttoo sshhooww aa cclloossee vviieeww ooff
tthhee $$4400,,000000 iinn tthhee eennvveellooppee oonn oouurr ssiiddee ooff tthhee bbeedd..
MMaarryy ttaakkeess aa ddrreessss ffrroomm tthhee cclloosseett aanndd ssttaarrttss ttoo ppuutt iitt
oonn aass tthhee CCAAMMEERRAA RREETTRREEAATTSS ttoo rreevveeaall aa ppaacckkeedd bbuutt nnoott yyeett
cclloosseedd ssuuiittccaassee aallssoo oonn tthhee bbeedd.. MMaarryy zziippss uupp hheerr ddrreessss
aanndd tthheenn bbrriinnggss ssoommee ffiinnaall ggaarrmmeennttss ffrroomm tthhee cclloosseett..
SShhee ccoommeess aarroouunndd ttoo tthhee ssuuiittccaassee aanndd ppuuttss tthheemm oonn tthhee
ttoopp.. MMaarryy wwoorrkkss wwiitthh hhaassttee aanndd iinn tteennssiioonn,, aass iiff aaccttiinngg
oonn aann iimmppuullssee wwhhiicchh mmiigghhtt vvaanniisshh aass qquuiicckkllyy aass iitt ccaammee..
TThhee ssuuiittccaassee ffiilllleedd nnooww,, sshhee cchheecckkss aarroouunndd tthhee rroooomm,,
tthheenn ttaakkeess hheerr hhaannddbbaagg ttoo tthhee bbeedd,, ppuuttss iinn tthhee mmoonneeyy--
ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee,, aanndd tthheenn ssllaammss tthhee ssuuiittccaassee sshhuutt.. TThheenn
sshhee llooookkss aatt hheerr ssmmaallll bbeeddrroooomm ddeesskk,, ggooeess ttoo iitt,, rreemmoovveess
aa ssmmaallll ffiillee--eennvveellooppee ffrroomm oonnee ooff tthhee ddrraawweerrss.. IItt iiss
oonnee ooff tthhoossee bbrroowwnn eennvveellooppeess iinn wwhhiicchh oonnee kkeeeeppss
iimmppoorrttaanntt ppaappeerrss aanndd ppoolliicciieess aanndd cceerrttiiffiiccaatteess.. SShhee
cchheecckkss iittss ccoonntteennttss bbrriieeffllyy,, ppuuttss iitt oonn tthhee bbeedd,, ooppeennss
aannootthheerr ddeesskk ddrraawweerr,, ttaakkeess oouutt hheerr bbaannkk bbooookk,, ttoosssseess iitt
oonn tthhee bbeedd.. TThheenn sshhee ppaacckkss bbootthh tthhee ffiillee--eennvveellooppee aanndd
tthhee bbaannkk bbooookk,, iinnttoo hheerr hhaannddbbaagg,, ttaakkeess oonnee qquuiicckk llaasstt
llooookk aarroouunndd tthhee rroooomm,, ppiicckkss uupp tthhee hhaannddbbaagg aanndd tthhee
ssuuiittccaassee aanndd ggooeess oouutt ooff tthhee rroooomm..
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. MMAARRYY''SS GGAARRAAGGEE -- ((DDAAYY))
AA ttwwoo--ccaarr ggaarraaggee.. OOnnee ccaarr iiss ggoonnee.. MMaarryy''ss ccaarr iiss
ppaarrkkeedd iinn tthhee ddrriivveewwaayy.. TThhee CCAAMMEERRAA iiss llooww eennoouugghh ssoo
tthhaatt wwee ccaann eeaassiillyy rreeaadd tthhee AArriizzoonnaa nnuummbbeerr ppllaattee iinn tthhee
ffoorreeggrroouunndd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1155..
MMaarryy ccoommeess oouutt ooff hhoouussee,, ssttaarrttss ffoorr tthhee ttrruunnkk,, iinntteennddiinngg
ttoo ppuutt tthhee ssuuiittccaassee iinn,, cchhaannggeess hheerr mmiinndd,, ppllaacceess tthhee
ssuuiittccaassee aanndd hheerr hhaannddbbaagg oonn tthhee ffrroonntt sseeaatt,, ggeettss iinn,,
ssttaarrttss tthhee ccaarr,, bbeeggiinnss ttoo bbaacckk oouutt ooff ddrriivveewwaayy..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. MMAAIINN SSTTRREEEETT IINN MMIIDDTTOOWWNN PPHHOOEENNIIXX -- ((DDAAYY))
WWee aarree cclloossee oonn MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, sshhoooottiinngg iinn aatt hheerr ttrroouubblleedd,,
gguuiillttyy ffaaccee.. SShhee sseeeemmss ttoo bbee ddrriivviinngg wwiitthh tthhaatt eexxcceessss
ccaarree ooff oonnee wwhhoo ddooeess nnoott wwiisshh ttoo bbee ssttooppppeedd ffoorr aa mmiinnoorr
ttrraaffffiicc iirrrreegguullaarriittyy.. SShhee ssttooppss ffoorr aa rreedd lliigghhtt aatt aa
mmaaiinn iinntteerrsseeccttiioonn..
FFRROOMM MMAARRYY''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- ((DDAAYY))
WWee sseeee LLoowweerryy aanndd CCaassssiiddyy ccrroossssiinngg tthhee ssttrreeeett,, ppaassssiinngg
rriigghhtt iinn ffrroonntt ooff MMaarryy''ss ccaarr..
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy ffrreeeezzeess..
EEXXTT.. MMAAIINN SSTTRREEEETT IINN MMIIDDTTOOWWNN PPHHOOEENNIIXX -- ((DDAAYY))
CCaassssiiddyy,, ggllaanncciinngg iinnttoo ccaarr,, sseeeess MMaarryy,, lleettss oouutt aa cchheeeerryy
eexxccllaammaattiioonn,, eellbboowwss LLoowweerryy.. LLoowweerryy ttuurrnnss,, sseeeess MMaarryy,,
ssmmiilleess pplleeaassaannttllyy,, ppuullllss CCaassssiiddyy oonn..
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy wwaattcchheess tthhee eennttiirree eexxcchhaannggee wwiitthh aa llooookk ooff ssttoonnyy
hhoorrrroorr oonn hheerr ffaaccee..
EEXXTT.. MMAAIINN SSTTRREEEETT IINN MMIIDDTTOOWWNN PPHHOOEENNIIXX -- ((DDAAYY))
NNooww wwee llooookk cclloosseellyy aatt LLoowweerryy.. AAss hhee rreeaacchheess tthhee ccuurrbb,,
aa ssmmaallll ccoonnffuussiioonn bbrriigghhtteennss hhiiss ffaaccee.. HHee rreemmeemmbbeerrss tthhaatt
MMaarryy iinntteennddeedd ttoo ""ssppeenndd tthhee wweeeekkeenndd iinn bbeedd.."" HHee
ccoonnssiiddeerrss,, ccuurriioouussllyy,, ttuurrnnss,, llooookkss bbaacckk aatt hheerr,, aa sslliigghhtt
ffrroowwnn oonn hhiiss ffaaccee..
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy sseeeess tthhee ppaauussee aanndd tthhee llooookk..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1166..
EEXXTT.. MMAAIINN SSTTRREEEETT IINN MMIIDDTTOOWWNN PPHHOOEENNIIXX -- ((DDAAYY))
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt iitt eevveenn llooookkss aass iiff LLoowweerryy mmiigghhtt bbee mmeeaanniinngg
ttoo ccrroossss bbaacckk ttoo tthhee ccaarr..
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy''ss tteennssiioonn iiss uunnbbeeaarraabbllee.. AAnndd aatt tthhaatt mmoommeenntt wwee
hheeaarr tthhee sshhrriillll sshhrriieekk ooff tthhee ttrraaffffiicc ccoopp''ss wwhhiissttllee..
MMaarryy zzoooommss tthhee ccaarr aawwaayy..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy iinn ccaarr,, ddrriivviinngg,, ssaaffeellyy aawwaayy ffrroomm ttoowwnn.. HHeerr llooookk
iiss lleessss tteennssee nnooww,, aanndd mmoorree ppuurrppoosseeffuull.. AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,,
sshhee cchheecckkss tthhee ffuueell ggaauuggee,, ffrroowwnnss,, llooookkss aalloonngg hhiigghhwwaayy
ffoorr aa ggaass ssttaattiioonn..
FFAASSTT DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAYY))
AApppprrooaacchhiinngg aanndd lleeaavviinngg cciittyy lliimmiittss..
MMAARRYY -- ((DDAAYY))
LLooookkss aatt ggaass ggaauuggee..
CC.. UU.. GGAASS GGAAUUGGEE -- ((DDAAYY))
EEXXTT.. AA GGAASS SSTTAATTIIOONN -- ((DDAAYY))
WWee sseeee MMaarryy''ss ccaarr ddrriivvee iinn,, ccoommee ttoo aa ssttoopp.. TThheerree aarree
nnoo ootthheerr ccaarrss aabboouutt,, tthhiiss bbeeiinngg aa ggaass ssttaattiioonn ooffff tthhee
mmaaiinn hhiigghhwwaayy,, aanndd tthhee aatttteennddaanntt iiss oobbvviioouussllyy iinn tthhee
sshhaacckk.. MMaarryy llooookkss wwoorrrriieedd aabboouutt hhaavviinngg ttoo mmaakkee tthhiiss
ssttoopp,, kkeeeeppss hheerr ffaaccee ttuurrnneedd aawwaayy ffrroomm tthhee sshhaacckk,, nnoott
wwiisshhiinngg iitt ttoo bbee sseeeenn..
NNoo oonnee ccoommeess aanndd ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt MMaarryy ccoonnssiiddeerrss ddrriivviinngg oonn,,
aass iiff tthhee eemmppttiinneessss ooff tthhee ssttaattiioonn wweerree aa wwaarrnniinngg,, aann
oommeenn tthhaatt sshhee sshhoouulldd lliisstteenn ttoo.. BBuutt tthhee ggaass rreeggiisstteerrss
aallmmoosstt eemmppttyy.. SShhee hhaass ttoo bbllooww hheerr hhoorrnn..
AA YYOOUUNNGG MMAANN ccoommeess oouutt ooff tthhee sshhaacckk,, ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd hheerr
ccaarr..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1177..
AAtt tthhaatt mmoommeenntt,, wwee HHEEAARR tthhee RRIINNGGIINNGG ooff tthhee TTEELLEEPPHHOONNEE iinn
tthhee sshhaacckk.. TThhee AAtttteennddaanntt wwaallkkss aa ffeeww sstteeppss ffuurrtthheerr,,
ttoowwaarrdd MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, tthheenn ddeecciiddeess ttoo ggoo bbaacckk aanndd aannsswweerr
tthhee pphhoonnee.. TThhee pphhoonnee''ss iinnssiisstteenntt rriinnggiinngg uunnnneerrvveess MMaarryy..
SShhee ssttaarrttss hheerr ccaarr,, zzoooommss ooffff..
WWee sseeee tthhee AAtttteennddaanntt,, pphhoonnee iinn hhaanndd,, iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy ooff
sshhaacckk.. HHee llooookkss aafftteerr tthhee ddeeppaarrttiinngg ccaarr wwiitthh lliittttllee oorr
nnoo eexxpprreessssiioonn..
CCAARR
TThhee ccaarr ggrroowwss ssmmaalllleerr aass iitt rraacceess uupp tthhee rrooaadd.. TThhee ssuunn
iiss sseettttiinngg.. TThheerree iiss ssoommeetthhiinngg vvaagguueellyy oommiinnoouuss aabboouutt
tthhee ddaarrkkeenniinngg sskkyy iinnttoo wwhhiicchh tthhee ccaarr sseeeemmss ttoo bbee
ddiissaappppeeaarriinngg..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
MMAARRYY IINN CCAARR -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee oonnccoommiinngg hheeaaddlliigghhttss hhuurrtt MMaarryy''ss eeyyeess.. SShhee iiss
ggeettttiinngg sslleeeeppyy aanndd hheerr vviissiioonn iiss bblluurrrriinngg.. HHeerr eeyyeess
cclloossee,, iinnvvoolluunnttaarriillyy,, ssnnaapp ooppeenn aaggaaiinn.. SShhee ssttrreettcchheess
tthhaann wwiiddee,, aass iiff ffoorrcciinngg tthheemm ttoo ssttaayy ooppeenn.. TThhee
oonnccoommiinngg lliigghhttss sseeeemm ttoo ggllaarree ttoo aa ppooiinntt bbeeyyoonndd
eenndduurraannccee.. SShhee mmuurrmmeerrss ""SSaamm -- SSaamm..""
AA LLOONNGG LLAAPP DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE::
EEXXTT.. RROOAADD SSHHOOUULLDDEERR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
WWee sseeee MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, ddiimm iinn tthhee eeaarrllyy ddaawwnn,, ttiilltteedd oonn tthhee
ssoofftt sshhoouullddeerr ooff tthhee rrooaadd,, llooookkiinngg ssoommeehhooww ssaadd aanndd
ppaatthheettiicc,, lliikkee aa cchhiilldd''ss tthhrroowwnn--aawwaayy ttooyy.. AAnndd ffrroomm tthhiiss
aannggllee iitt wwoouulldd aappppeeaarr tthhaatt tthhee ccaarr iiss eemmppttyy..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, dduurriinngg wwhhiicchh tthheerree aarree nnoo ootthheerr vveehhiicclleess
ppaassssiinngg,, wwee sseeee,, ccoommiinngg ffrroomm tthhee ffaarr ddiissttaannccee,, aa HHIIGGHHWWAAYY
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN iinn aa ppaattrrooll ccaarr.. HHee ppaasssseess MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, nnootteess
iittss aappppaarreenntt eemmppttiinneessss,, UU--ttuurrnnss,, ccoommeess bbaacckk uupp bbeehhiinndd
tthhee ccaarr.. HHee ggeettss oouutt aanndd aapppprrooaacchheess tthhee ddrriivveerr''ss ssiiddee
wwiinnddooww..
EEXXTT.. MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann llooookkss ddoowwnn iinnttoo tthhee ccaarr..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1188..
IINNTT.. CCAARR ((DDAAWWNN)) FFRROOMM HHIISS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT
MMaarryy ttuurrnnss wwiitthh aa ssttaarrtt,, ssiittss uupp,, iiss ssttaarrttlleedd aanndd
uunnnneerrvvee bbyy tthhee ssiigghhtt ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann,, aanndd,, aass iiff bbyy
aauuttoommaattiicc rreefflleexx,, ttuurrnnss tthhee iiggnniittiioonn aanndd pprreesssseess ddoowwnn oonn
tthhee ssttaarrttee..
EEXXTT.. CCAARR ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann hhoollddss uupp hhiiss hhaanndd..
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
((ssttaarrttlleedd))
HHoolldd iitt tthheerree!!
MMaarryy ssllaammss ddoowwnn oonn tthhee bbrraakkee,, ttrriieess ttoo ppuullll hheerrsseellff
ttooggeetthheerr.. TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann rraappss aaggaaiinn,, lleessss ggeennttllyy..
RReelluuccttaannttllyy,, MMaarryy rroollllss ddoowwnn tthhee wwiinnddooww.. TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann
ssttuuddiiee hheerr ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt..
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
IInn qquuiittee aa hhuurrrryy..
MMAARRYY
YYeess..
((bbeeccaauussee hhee sseeeemmss ttoo
bbee aawwaaiittiinngg aann
eexxppllaannaattiioonn))
II ddiiddnn''tt mmeeaann ttoo sslleeeepp ssoo lloonngg.. II
wwaass aaffrraaiidd II''dd hhaavvee aann aacccciiddeenntt
llaasstt nniigghhtt,, ffrroomm sslleeeeppiinneessss ...... ssoo
II ddeecciiddeedd ttoo ppuullll oovveerr........
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
YYoouu sslleepptt hheerree aallll nniigghhtt??
MMAARRYY
((aa ffaaiinntt eeddggee ooff
ddeeffeennssiivveenneessss))
YYeess.. AAss II ssaaiidd,, II ccoouullddnn''tt kkeeeepp mmyy
eeyyeess......
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
((mmeerree ccoonncceerrnn))
TThheerree aarree pplleennttyy ooff mmootteellss iinn tthhiiss
aarreeaa.. YYoouu sshhoouulldd hhaavvee ...... II mmeeaann,,
jjuusstt ttoo bbee ssaaffee........
MMAARRYY
II ddiiddnn''tt iinntteenndd ttoo sslleeeepp aallll nniigghhtt!!
II jjuusstt ppuulllleedd oovveerr ...... hhaavvee II
bbrrookkeenn aannyy llaawwss??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 1199..
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
NNoo,, mm''aamm..
MMAARRYY
TThheenn II''mm ffrreeee ttoo ggoo......??
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
((aa ppaauussee))
IIss aannyytthhiinngg wwrroonngg??
MMAARRYY
OOff ccoouurrssee nnoott!! AAmm II aaccttiinngg aass iiff
...... ssoommeetthhiinngg''ss wwrroonngg??
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
((aallmmoosstt aa ssmmiillee))
FFrraannkkllyy,, yyeess..
MMAARRYY
PPlleeaassee ...... II''dd lliikkee ttoo ggoo........
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
IIss tthheerree??
MMAARRYY
IIss tthheerree wwhhaatt??
((nnoott wwaaiittiinngg ffoorr aann
aannsswweerr))
II''vvee ttoolldd yyoouu tthheerree''ss nnootthhiinngg wwrroonngg
...... eexxcceepptt tthhaatt II''mm iinn aa hhuurrrryy aanndd
yyoouu''rree ttaakkiinngg uupp mmyy ttiimmee........
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg,, sstteerrnnllyy))
NNooww wwaaiitt jjuusstt aa mmoommeenntt!! TTuurrnn yyoouurr
mmoottoorr ooffff,, pplleeaassee..
MMaarryy sseeeemmss aabboouutt ttoo oobbjjeecctt,, tthhiinnkkss bbeetttteerr ooff iitt,, ttuurrnnss
ooffff tthhee iiggnniittiioonn..
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
IInn tthhee ccoouurrssee ooff mmyy dduuttyy,, II nneevveerr
""ttaakkee uupp"" aannyyoonnee''ss ttiimmee,, wwhheetthheerr
iitt''ss ttoo ggiivvee aa wwaarrnniinngg,, oorr aa
ttiicckkeett,, oorr hheellpp!! BBeelliieevvee tthhaatt,,
MM''aamm..
((aa lliittttllee ssoofftteerr))
NNooww iiff yyoouu wwookkee uupp oonn tthhee wwrroonngg
ssiiddee ooff ...... tthhee ccaarr sseeaatt,, tthhaatt''ss
oonnee tthhiinngg.. BBuutt wwhheenn yyoouu aacctt aass iiff
II''vvee jjuusstt ppllaacceedd yyoouu uunnddeerr
aarrrreesstt ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2200..
MMAARRYY
II''mm ssoorrrryy..
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
NNoo nneeeedd ttoo aappoollooggiieess........
MMaarryy ssttaarrttss tthhee ccaarr,, hheerr ffaaccee ttuurrnneedd aass iiff sshhee wwiisshheess
tthhee mmaatttteerr wweerree aallll sseettttlleedd aanndd tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann hhaadd
aallrreeaaddyy ggoonnee.. TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann iissnn''tt eexxaaccttllyy oonnee ooff tthhoossee
cciivviill sseerrvvaannttss wwhhoo ddeemmaannddss aa tthhaannkk--yyoouu,, bbuutt hhee ddooeess ffeeeell
hheerr mmaannnneerr iiss aa bbiitt ttoooo aabbrruupptt.. HHee ccaallllss::
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
WWaaiitt aa mmiinnuuttee!!
MMAARRYY
((jjaammmmiinngg ddoowwnn tthhee
bbrraakkee))
NNooww wwhhaatt??
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann ggaazzeess aatt hheerr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn::
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
MMaayy II sseeee yyoouurr lliicceennssee??
MMAARRYY
WWhhyy??
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN
PPlleeaassee..
MMaarryy ppuullllss hheerr hhaannddbbaagg uupp ffrroomm tthhee fflloooorr,, wwhheerree sshhee''dd
ppllaacceedd iitt wwhheenn sshhee ssttrreettcchheedd oouutt ffoorr sslleeeepp.. SShhee ppuuttss
hheerr hhaanndd iinn iitt,, rruummmmaaggeess ffoorr hheerr wwaalllleett,, ccaannnnoott ffiinndd iitt..
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann iiss ssttaarriinngg aatt hheerr.. SShhee ggllaanncceess aatt hhiimm
nneerrvvoouussllyy,, ppookkeess iinn hheerr bbaagg aa bbiitt mmoorree,, ssiigghhss,, rreeaalliizzeess
sshhee''llll hhaavvee ttoo rreemmoovvee ssoommee ooff iittss ccoonntteennttss.. NNeerrvvoouussllyy,,
bbaaddllyy ccoonnttrroolllliinngg hheerr ffeeaarr,, sshhee ttaakkeess oouutt tthhee mmoonneeyy--
ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee,, aanndd tthheenn tthhee iimmppoorrttaanntt ppaappeerrss eennvveellooppee,,
tthheenn aa ccoouuppllee ooff ootthheerr iitteemmss,, ppllaacceess tthheemm oonn tthhee sseeaatt,,
ffiinnaallllyy ffiinnddss hheerr wwaalllleett,, ooppeennss iitt,, hhaannddss iitt ttoo hhiimm.. HHee
llooookkss aatt tthhee wwaalllleett,, tthheenn aatt tthhee ccaarr..
EEXXTT.. RROOAADD SSHHOOUULLDDEERR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann wwaallkkss aarroouunndd ttoo tthhee ffrroonntt ooff tthhee ccaarr,,
cchheecckkss tthhee lliicceennssee ppllaattee,, aanndd rreettuurrnnss..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann ppeeeerrss iinn,, cchheecckkss tthhee ccaarr rreeggiissttrraattiioonn oonn
tthhee sstteeeerriinngg wwhheeeell,, rreettuurrnnss MMaarryy''ss wwaalllleett..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2211..
SShhee ttaakkeess iitt,, llooookkss aatt hhiimm ffoorr aa fflliicckkeerr ooff aa mmoommeenntt..
HHee ssaayyss nnootthhiinngg.. SShhee ssttaarrttss aahheeaadd,, ffaasstt..
EEXXTT.. RROOAADD SSHHOOUULLDDEERR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann ssttaarreess aafftteerr MMaarryy aass sshhee ddrriivveess ooffff,, tthheenn
ssttaarrttss bbaacckk ttoo hhiiss aauuttoommoobbiillee..
MMAARRYY IINN CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
SShhee iiss qquuiittee sshhaakkeenn,, rreeaalliizzeess sshhee ccaauusseedd hheerrsseellff aa ggrreeaatt
ddeeaall ooff ttrroouubbllee aanndd ppllaacceedd hheerrsseellff iinn uunnnneecceessssaarryy
ddaannggeerr.. SShhee iiss ddiissttuurrbbeedd aanndd aannggrryy aanndd ffrriigghhtteenneedd aatt
hheerr iinnaabbiilliittyy ttoo aacctt nnoorrmmaallllyy uunnddeerr tthhee pprreessssuurree ooff
gguuiilltt.. AAss sshhee ddrriivveess,, sshhee ggllaanncceess iinnttoo hheerr rreeaarr--vviieeww
mmiirrrroorr..
MMAARRYY''SS RREEAARR--VVIIEEWW MMIIRRRROORR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann iiss ffoolllloowwiinngg iinn hhiiss aauuttoommoobbiillee,, kkeeeeppiinngg
bbeehhiinndd hheerr aatt aa mmaattcchheedd ssppeeeedd..
MMAARRYY IINN CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
SShhee ggllaanncceess oouutt aatt hheerr ssuurrrroouunnddiinnggss..
MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee FFrreeeewwaayy aahheeaadd..
EEXXTT.. MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
SShhee ssuuddddeennllyy ttuurrnnss ooffff tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy..
MMAARRYY IINN CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
SShhee cchheecckkss hheerr mmiirrrroorr..
MMAARRYY''SS RREEAARR--VVIIEEWW MMIIRRRROORR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann iiss nnoo lloonnggeerr ffoolllloowwiinngg,, hhaass nnoott ttuurrnneedd ooffff
aafftteerr hheerr..
MMAARRYY IINN CCAARR -- ((DDAAWWNN))
SShhee bbrreeaatthheess aa ssiigghh ooff rreelliieeff,, tthhiinnkkss aa mmoommeenntt,, mmaakkeess aa
qquuiicckk ddeecciissiioonn..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2222..
EEXXTT.. UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee bbiigg ssiiggnn rreeaaddss ""CCaalliiffoorrnniiaa CChhaarrlliiee -- AAuuttoommoobbiillee
PPaarraaddiissee.."" WWee sseeee MMaarryy''ss ccaarr ddrriivvee oonnttoo tthhee lloott aanndd
ssttoopp.. MMaarryy ggeettss oouutt ooff tthhee ccaarr,, ggllaanncceess ttoowwaarrdd tthhee lloott
ooffffiiccee,, ttuurrnnss hheerr aatttteennttiioonn ttoo tthhee lliinnee ooff ccaarrss,, nnoottiiccee
tthhee CCaalliiffoorrnniiaa lliicceennccee ppllaatteess oonn aallll ooff tthheemm.. TThhee CCAARR
DDEEAALLEERR ccaallllss oouutt ffrroomm hhiiss ooffffiiccee::
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
WWiitthh yyoouu iinn aa sseeccoonndd!!
MMaarryy nnooddss,, ssttaarrttss wwaallkkiinngg aalloonngg tthhee lliinnee ooff ccaarrss aass iiff
mmaakkiinngg aa sseelleeccttiioonn.. HHeerr eeyyee iiss ccaauugghhtt bbyy tthhee iirroonn
nneewwssppaappeerr ssttaanndd oonn tthhee ccoorrnneerr,, jjuusstt oouuttssiiddee tthhee lloott..
SShhee ssttaarreess aatt tthhee ppaappeerrss,, ttuurrnnss aawwaayy,, aass iiff wwhhaatt sshhee iiss
ffeeaarriinngg wwoouulldd hhaavvee ttoo bbee iimmppoossssiibbllee,, tthheenn,, hhaavviinngg ttoo
ssaattiissffyy hheerrsseellff,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee ssttaanndd,, ddrrooppss aa ddiimmee iinn tthhee
iirroonn sslloott,, ppiicckkss uupp aa LLOOSS AANNGGEELLEESS nneewwssppaappeerr,, ssttaarrttss bbaacckk
iinnttoo tthhee ccaarr lloott aass sshhee ggllaanncceess wwoorrrriieedd aatt tthhee ffrroonntt
ppaaggee.. AAss sshhee ggooeess,, wwee sseeee,, ccoommiinngg uupp tthhee ssttrreeeett ttoowwaarrdd
tthhee lloott,, tthhee ssaammee PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN.. HHee sseeeess MMaarryy,, sslloowwss,,
sswweerrvveess oovveerr ttoo tthhee ooppppoossiittee ssiiddee ooff tthhee ssttrreeeett,, ssttooppss
bbyy tthhee ccuurrbb.. MMaarryy,, eennggrroosssseedd iinn tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr,, aanndd
wwaallkkiinngg bbaacckk eeaassee tthhee lloott,, ddooeess nnoott sseeee tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
TThhee ccaarr ddeeaalleerr iiss oouutt oonn tthhee lloott nnooww,, ssttaannddiinngg aanndd
wwaaiittiinngg ffoorr MMaarryy.. AAss sshhee aapppprrooaacchheess,, lloosstt iinn hheerr
nneewwssppaappeerr,, hhee ssmmiilleess..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
II''mm iinn nnoo mmoooodd ffoorr ttrroouubbllee!!
MMAARRYY
((ggllaanncciinngg uupp,, tthhrroowwnn
ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt))
WWhhaatt??
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
((cchheeeerrffuullllyy))
TThheerree''ss aann oolldd ssaayyiinngg,, ""FFiirrsstt
ccuussttoommeerr ooff tthhee ddaayy iiss aallwwaayyss tthhee
mmoosstt ttrroouubbllee!!"" BBuutt lliikkee II ssaaiidd,,
II''mm iinn nnoo mmoooodd ffoorr iitt ssoo II''mm jjuusstt
ggooiinngg ttoo ttrreeaatt yyoouu ssoo ffaaiirr aanndd
ssqquuaarree yyoouu wwoonn''tt hhaavvee oonnee hhuummaann
rreeaassoonn ttoo ggiivvee mmee......
MMAARRYY
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
CCaann II ttrraaddee iinn mmyy ccaarr aanndd ttaakkee
aannootthheerr??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2233..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
YYoouu ccaann ddoo aannyytthhiinngg yyoouu''vvee aa mmiinndd
ttoo ...... aanndd bbeeiinn'' aa wwoommaann,, yyoouu wwiillll!!
((cchhiinn--iinnddiiccaattiinngg hheerr
ccaarr))
TThhaatt yyoouurrss??
MMAARRYY
YYeess,, iitt''ss ...... nnootthhiinngg wwrroonngg wwiitthh
iitt,, II''mm jjuusstt........
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
SSiicckk ooff tthhee ssiigghhtt ooff iitt!!
((llaauugghhss))
WWeellll,, ssuuppppoossee yyoouu llooookk aarroouunndd ffoorr
ssoommeetthhiinngg tthhaatt ssttrriikkeess yyoouurr eeyyeess
aanndd mmeeaannwwhhiillee II''llll hhaavvee mmyy mmeecchhaanniicc
ggiivvee yyoouurrss tthhee oonnccee oovveerr aanndd ......
wwaanntt ssoommee ccooffffeeee?? II wwaass jjuusstt
aabboouutt........
MMAARRYY
NNoo.. TThhaannkk yyoouu.. II''mm iinn ...... aa
hhuurrrryy.. II jjuusstt wwaanntt ttoo mmaakkee aa
cchhaannggee aanndd ssttaarrtt......
SShhee ssttooppss ssuuddddeennllyy,, aallmmoosstt wwiitthh aa ggaasspp.. SShhee hhaass sseeeenn
tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
TTHHEE PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAYY))
HHee iiss ssttaarriinngg oovveerr aatt hheerr,, hhiiss ffaaccee ddiissppaassssiioonnaattee..
EEXXTT.. UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy hhaass ttoo ffoorrccee hheerrsseellff ttoo llooookk aawwaayy..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
OOnnee tthhiinngg ppeeooppllee nneevveerr oouugghhtt ttoo bbee
wwhheenn tthheeyy''rree bbuuyyiinngg aa uusseedd ccaarr iiss
iinn aa hhuurrrryy!!
((ssttaarrttiinngg aawwaayy ttoowwaarrdd
hheerr ccaarr))
BBuutt lliikkee II ssaaiidd,, ttoooo nniiccee aa ddaayy ffoorr
aarrgguuiinngg.. II''llll jjuusstt sshhoooott tthhiiss iinnttoo
tthhee ggaarraaggee..
HHee ssttaarrttss iinnttoo MMaarryy''ss ccaarr.. SShhee llooookkss aatt hhiimm,, iinn nneeaarr
ppaanniicc,, wwaannttiinngg ttoo sskkiipp tthhee wwhhoollee tthhiinngg.. TToorrnn,, wwoonnddeerriinngg
iiff tthhee pprreesseennccee ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann ddooeessnn''tt nneeggaattee tthhee
vvaalluuee ooff cchhaannggiinngg ccaarrss,, wwoonnddeerriinngg hhooww sshhee ccaann ggeett aawwaayy,,
wwoonnddeerriinngg iiff sshhee''llll bbee ffoolllloowweedd,, oorr iiff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann
wwiillll ggoo aawwaayy iiff sshhee ddooeess ssttaayy hheerree..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2244..
AAllll tthheessee ppaanniicc--ffeeaarrss rruusshh hheerr mmiinndd aanndd sshhee ccaann ddoo
nnootthhiinngg.. TThhee CCaarr DDeeaalleerr hhaass ddrriivveenn hheerr ccaarr iinnttoo tthhee
ggaarraaggee.. SShhee ssttaannddss iinn tthhee mmiiddddllee ooff tthhee lloott,, ffeeeelliinngg
lliikkee aa sshhoooottiinngg ttaarrggeett.. SShhee llooookkss ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ggaarraaggee..
TTHHEE GGAARRAAGGEE -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy''ss ccaarr iiss iinn iitt..
EEXXTT.. UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy ddeecciiddeess sshhee ccaannnnoott bbaacckk oouutt nnooww wwiitthhoouutt aarroouussiinngg
ffuurrtthheerr ssuussppiicciioonn,, iiss ccoommppeelllleedd ttoo llooookk aaggaaiinn aatt tthhee
PPaattrroollmmaann..
TTHHEE PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAYY))
HHee ssttiillll wwaattcchheess.. WWiitthh aa sseellff--aannggrryy ssiigghh ooff rreessiiggnnmmeenntt,,
sshhee ggooeess ttoo aa cclloossee ccaarr,, llooookkss aatt iitt.. TThhee CCaarr DDeeaalleerr iiss
rreettuurrnniinngg..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
TThhaatt''ss tthhee oonnee II''dd''vvee ppiicckkeedd ffoorr
yyoouu mmyysseellff!!
MMAARRYY
HHooww mmuucchh??
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
GGoo aahheeaadd!! SSppiinn iitt aarroouunndd tthhee
bblloocckk.. NNooww II kknnooww yyoouu ddoonn''tt kknnooww
aannyytthhiinngg aabboouutt eennggiinnee ccoonnddiittiioonn,,
bbuutt yyoouu ccaann ffeeeell,, ccaann''tt yyoouu ...... aanndd
iitt''ss aallll iinn tthhee ffeeeell,, bbeelliieevvee mmee,,
yyoouu ffeeeell tthhaatt oonnee aarroouunndd tthhee
bblloocckk........
MMAARRYY
IItt llooookkss ffiinnee.. HHooww mmuucchh wwiillll iitt
bbee,, wwiitthh mmyy ccaarr......??
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
YYoouu mmeeaann yyoouu ddoonn''tt wwaanntt tthhee uussuuaall
ddaayy aanndd aa hhaallff ttoo tthhiinnkk iitt oovveerr??
((llaauugghhss))
YYoouu aarree iinn aa hhuurrrryy!! SSoommeebbooddyy
cchhaassiinn'' yyoouu??
MMAARRYY
OOff ccoouurrssee nnoott.. PPlleeaassee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2255..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
WWeellll ...... hheecckk,, tthhiiss iiss tthhee ffiirrsstt
ttiimmee II eevveerr ssaaww tthhee ccuussttoommeerr hhiigghh--
pprreessssuurree tthhee ssaalleessmmaann!!
((llaauugghhss,, sseeeess sshhee iiss
iinn nnoo mmoooodd ffoorr iitt))
II''dd ffiigguurree rroouugghhllyy ......
((llooookkss aatt tthhee ccaarr,,
tthheenn bbaacckk aatt tthhee
ggaarraaggee))
...... yyoouurr ccaarr pplluuss ffiivvee hhuunnddrreedd..
MMAARRYY
FFiivvee hhuunnddrreedd..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
AAhhaa!! AAllwwaayyss ggoott ttiimmee ttoo aarrgguuee
mmoonneeyy,, hhuuhh......??
MMAARRYY
AAllll rriigghhtt..
AAss tthhee ccaarr ddeeaalleerr llooookkss aatt hheerr iinn aammaazzeemmeenntt,, sshhee rreeaacchheess
iinnttoo hheerr bbaagg,, ffeeeellss tthhee mmoonneeyy--ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee,, ppaauusseess..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
((sslloowwllyy))
II ttaakkee iitt ...... yyoouu ccaann pprroovvee tthhaatt
ccaarr''ss yyoouurrss ...... II mmeeaann,, oouutt ooff
ssttaattee aanndd aallll ...... ggoott yyoouurr ppiinnkk
sslliipp aanndd yyoouurr ......
MMAARRYY
II tthhiinnkk II hhaavvee tthhee nneecceessssaarryy
ppaappeerrss.. IIss tthheerree aa LLaaddiieess RRoooomm......
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
IInn tthhee bbuuiillddiinngg ......
((iinnddiiccaatteess,, ccoonnttiinnuueess
ttoo ssttaarree qquuiieettllyy))
MMaarryy ssttaarrttss ffoorr tthhee bbuuiillddiinngg,, ggllaanncciinngg oonnccee iinn tthhee
ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
TTHHEE PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAYY))
HHee ssttiillll ssiittss,, hhiiss mmoottoorr tthhrroobbbbiinngg,, hhiiss ffaaccee qquuiieett..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee bbuuiillddiinngg..
CCUUTT TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2266..
IINNTT.. LLAADDIIEESS RROOOOMM -- ((DDAAYY))
MMaarryy eenntteerrss,, lloocckkss ddoooorr,, ttaakkeess eennvveellooppee oouutt ooff hheerr
hhaannddbbaagg,, eexxttrraaccttss oonnee bbuunnddllee ooff bbiillllss ffrroomm tthhee eennvveellooppee,,
ccoouunnttss ooffff ffiivvee,, ppuuttss tthhee bbuunnddllee bbaacckk iinnttoo tthhee eennvveellooppee
aanndd tthhee eennvveellooppee bbaacckk iinnttoo tthhee bbaagg.. TThheenn sshhee rreemmeemmbbeerrss,,
ttaakkeess oouutt tthhee iimmppoorrttaanntt ppaappeerrss eennvveellooppee,, ggooeess tthhrroouugghh
iitt,, ffiinnddss sseevveerraall ppaappeerrss hhaavviinngg ttoo ddoo wwiitthh hheerr ccaarr,,
ttaakkeess tthheemm aallll oouutt,, ppuuttss bbaacckk tthhee eennvveellooppee,, ssttaarrttss oouutt
ooff tthhee llaaddiieess RRoooomm..
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee CCaarr DDeeaalleerr hhaass mmoovveedd tthhee ccaarr ooff hheerr cchhooiiccee oouutt ooff
tthhee lliinnee.. IItt ssttaannddss iinn tthhee cclleeaarriinngg..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
((ttoooo cchheeeerrffuullllyy))
II tthhiinnkk yyoouu''dd bbeetttteerr ggiivvee iitt aa
ttrriiaall ssppiinn.. DDoonn''tt wwaanntt aannyy bbaadd
wwoorrdd ooff mmoouutthh aabboouutt CCaalliiffoorrnniiaa
CChhaarrlliiee..
MMAARRYY
II''dd rreeaallllyy rraatthheerr nnoott.. PPlleeaassee..
CCaann''tt wwee jjuusstt sseettttllee tthhiiss aanndd ......
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
II''llll bbee ppeerrffeeccttllyy hhoonneesstt wwiitthh yyoouu,,
MMaa''aamm.. IItt''ss nnoott tthhaatt II ddoonn''tt ttrruusstt
yyoouu,, bbuutt ......
MMAARRYY
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
BBuutt wwhhaatt?? IIss tthheerree aannyytthhiinngg ssoo
tteerrrriibbllyy wwrroonngg aabboouutt ...... mmaakkiinngg aa
ddeecciissiioonn aanndd wwaannttiinngg ttoo hhuurrrryy?? DDoo
yyoouu tthhiinnkk II''vvee ssttoolleenn ...... mmyy ccaarr??
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
NNoo,, MM''aamm.. II wwaass oonnllyy aabboouutt ttoo ssaayy,,
II''vvee sseenntt mmyy mmeecchhaanniicc oouutt ttoo ggiivvee
yyoouurr ccaarr aa lliittttllee tteesstt ...... tthhaatt''ss
aallll..
MMAARRYY
((hhaannddiinngg hhiimm tthhee
oowwnneerrsshhiipp ppaappeerrss aanndd
tthhee nneeww bbiillllss))
II''dd lliikkee ttoo bbee rreeaaddyy wwhheenn hhee ggeettss
bbaacckk..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2277..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR
OOkkaayy.. IIff yyoouu''llll ccoommee aalloonngg ......
HHee ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ooffffiiccee bbuuiillddiinngg.. MMaarryy ffoolllloowwss,,
cclloosseellyy,, aannxxiioouussllyy.. SShhee ggllaanncceess,, sseeeess::
TTHHEE PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV -- ((DDAAYY))
HHee iiss ssttiillll aatt tthhee ffaarr ccuurrbb..
EEXXTT.. UUSSEEDD CCAARR LLOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee CCaarr DDeeaalleerr ggooeess iinnttoo hhiiss ooffffiiccee.. MMaarryy ffoolllloowwss..
TTHHEE PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN -- ((DDAAYY))
AA sseeccoonndd llaatteerr,, hhee ssttaarrttss hhiiss aauuttoommoobbiillee,, cchheecckkss
ttrraaffffiicc,, ccoommeess aaccrroossss tthhee ssttrreeeett,, sslloowwllyy,, aanndd ddrriivveess
oonnttoo tthhee lloott.. HHee ppaauusseess aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ddrriivveess aaccrroossss
tthhee lloott,, ppaassssiinngg tthhee ooffffiiccee,, ggooiinngg oonn ttoo tthhee ootthheerr eexxiitt,,
ssttooppss tthheerree aass MMaarryy''ss ccaarr iiss ddrriivveenn bbaacckk oonnttoo tthhee lloott..
TThhee MMEECCHHAANNIICC ssttooppss MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, hhooppss oouutt,, wwaavveess ttoo tthhee
PPaattrroollmmaann.. TThhee PPaattrroollmmaann wwaavveess bbaacckk,, ggooeess oonn aa bbiitt
uunnttiill hhee iiss bbeehhiinndd MMaarryy''ss ccaarr,, ssttooppss aaggaaiinn,, llooookkss oovveerr
aatt tthhee ooffffiiccee.. IInn aa mmoommeenntt,, MMaarryy ccoommeess oouutt,, hhuurrrriieess
aaccrroossss ttoo hheerr nneeww ccaarr,, ggeettss iinn,, ssttaarrttss tthhee mmoottoorr.. TThhee
MMeecchhaanniicc yyeellllss::
MMEECCHHAANNIICC
HHeeyy!! MMiissss??
MMaarryy ppaauusseess,, ttuurrnnss,, sseeeess tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann,, tthheenn tthhee
MMeecchhaanniicc.. HHeerr ffaaccee ggooeess wwhhiittee.. SShhee ddooeessnn''tt kknnooww wwhhiicchh
mmaann ccaalllleedd hheerr.. TThheenn tthhee MMeecchhaanniicc wwaavveess,, ssttaarrttss ffoorrwwaarrdd
wwiitthh hheerr ssuuiittccaassee..
MMAARRYY
((aass MMeecchhaanniicc rreeaacchheess
ccaarr))
JJuusstt ppuutt iitt rriigghhtt iinn hheerree,, pplleeaassee
...... bbeessiiddee mmee..
TThhee MMeecchhaanniicc ssmmiilleess,, tthhrroowwss tthhee ssuuiittccaassee iinn.. MMaarryy zzoooommss
ooffff.. AAss sshhee ddrriivveess oouutt ooff lloott wwee sseeee tthhee MMeecchhaanniicc,, tthhee
CCaarr DDeeaalleerr aanndd tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann aallll llooookkiinngg aafftteerr hheerr..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR OONN RROOUUTTEE 9999
MMaarryy iiss ddrriivviinngg tteennsseellyy.. SShhee cchheecckkss tthhee rreeaarr--vviieeww
mmiirrrroorr,, iiss mmoorree sshhoocckkeedd tthhaann pplleeaasseedd wwhheenn sshhee sseeeess......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2288..
MMAARRYY''SS RREEAARR--VVIIEEWW MMIIRRRROORR
NNoo ssiiggnn ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR OONN RROOUUTTEE 9999
SShhee ttuurrnnss hheerr ffaaccee,, llooookkss oouutt aatt tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy..
RROOUUTTEE 9999 -- MMAARRYY''SS PPOOVV
IItt iiss hheeaavvyy wwiitthh ttrraaffffiicc..
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR OONN RROOUUTTEE 9999
AAggaaiinn sshhee cchheecckkss tthhee mmiirrrroorr aanndd aalltthhoouugghh ......
MMAARRYY''SS RREEAARR--VVIIEEWW MMIIRRRROORR
TThheerree iiss ssttiillll nnoo ssiiggnn ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR OONN RROOUUTTEE 9999
SShhee ccaannnnoott rreellaaxx oorr ffeeeell ssaaffee,, ccaannnnoott ccoonnvviinnccee hheerrsseellff
tthhaatt nnootthhiinngg wwiillll ccoommee ooff tthhee mmaann''ss wwaattcchhiinngg aanndd
ssuussppiicciioonnss..
CCAAMMEERRAA IISS CCLLOOSSEE oonn MMaarryy''ss ffaaccee nnooww,, rreeccoorrddiinngg hheerr
aannxxiieettyy,, hheerr ffeeaarrss.. HHeerr gguuiilltt sshhiinneess bbrriigghhtt iinn hheerr eeyyeess
aanndd sshhee iiss aa ppeerrssoonn uunnaaccccuussttoommeedd ttoo ccoonnttaaiinniinngg tthhiiss mmuucchh
gguuiilltt iinn tthhiiss rreeaalliissttiicc aa ssiittuuaattiioonn.. SSuuddddeennllyy,, wwee hheeaarr
tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee UUsseedd CCaarr DDeeaalleerr''ss llaauugghh,, hheeaarr iitt aass
cclleeaarrllyy aass MMaarryy hheeaarrss iitt iinn hheerr iimmaaggiinnaattiioonn.. TThhee
""iimmaaggiinneedd vvooiiccee"" wwee hheeaarr iiss aaccttuuaallllyy tthhee vvooiiccee ooff tthhee
CCaarr DDeeaalleerr::
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE
HHeecckk,, OOffffiicceerr,, tthhaatt wwaass tthhee ffiirrsstt
ttiimmee II eevveerr ssaaww tthhee CCuussttoommeerr hhiigghh--
pprreessssuurree tthhee SSaalleessmmaann!! SSoommeebbooddyy
cchhaassiinngg hheerr??
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
II bbeetttteerr hhaavvee aa llooookk aatt tthhoossee
ppaappeerrss,, CChhaarrlliiee..
CCAARR DDEEAALLEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE
SShhee llooookk lliikkee aa wwrroonngg--oonnee ttoo yyoouu??
PPAATTRROOLLMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
AAcctteedd lliikkee oonnee..
MMaarryy bblliinnkkss,, sshhaakkeess hheerr hheeaadd,, aass iiff ttrryyiinngg ttoo sshhaakkee aawwaayy
tthheessee vvooiicceess ooff hheerr iimmaaggiinnaattiioonn.. SShhee cchheecckkss tthhee rreeaarr--
vviieeww mmiirrrroorr..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 2299..
MMAARRYY''SS RREEAARR--VVIIEEWW MMIIRRRROORR
SSttiillll nnoo ssiigghhtt ooff tthhee PPaattrroollmmaann..
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR
SShhee ttrriieess ttoo ffoorrccee hheerrsseellff ttoo rreellaaxx,, aallmmoosstt ssuucccceeeeddss
wwhheenn sshhee iiss sspprruunngg ttoo tteennssiioonn aaggaaiinn bbyy ........
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY 9999
TThhee ssiigghhtt ooff aa ppoolliiccee ccaarr.. AAss sshhee ddrriivveess ppaasstt,, wwee hheeaarr
tthhee ssqquueeaakkyy,, uunniinntteelllliiggiibbllee vvooiiccee ccoommiinngg oovveerr tthhee ccaarr
rraaddiioo.. MMaarryy zzoooommss ddoowwnn oonn tthhee ggaass,, wwhhiizzzzeess aahheeaadd..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTHHRROOUUGGHH TTOO::
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY 9999 -- LLOONNGG SSHHOOTT
MMaarryy''ss ccaarr ddaasshhiinngg aalloonngg..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR
MMaarryy llooookkss wweeaarryy,, ttiirreedd wwiitthh ssttrraaiinn aanndd wwiitthh hhaarrdd
ddrriivviinngg.. HHeerr eeyyeess aarree hheeaavvyy wwiitthh wwoorrrryy aanndd ddeeeepp tthhoouugghhtt..
OOUUTT TTHHEE WWIINNDDSSHHIIEELLDD
WWee ccaann sseeee tthhaatt iitt iiss mmuucchh llaatteerr iinn tthhee ddaayy,, aallmmoosstt dduusskk..
MMAARRYY IINN NNEEWW CCAARR
WWee HHEEAARR tthhee ssoouunndd ooff aann aaggiittaatteedd BBUUZZZZ ooff aann iinntteerrccoomm
ssyysstteemm,, aa ssoouunndd eemmaannaattiinngg ffrroomm MMaarryy''ss iimmaaggiinnaattiioonn..
AAfftteerr tthhee sseeccoonndd BBUUZZZZ,, wwee HHEEAARR tthhee vvooiiccee ooff CCaarroolliinnee..
CCAARROOLLIINNEE''SS VVOOIICCEE
YYeess,, MMrr.. LLoowweerryy..
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
((aa wwoorrrriieedd ttoonnee))
CCaarroolliinnee ...... ?? MMaarryy ssttiillll iissnn''tt iinn??
CCAARROOLLIINNEE''SS VVOOIICCEE
NNoo,, MMrr.. LLoowweerryy ...... bbuutt tthheenn sshhee''ss
aallwwaayyss aa bbiitt llaattee oonn MMoonnddaayy
mmoorrnniinnggss..
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
BBuuzzzz mmee tthhee mmiinnuuttee sshhee ccoommeess iinn..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3300..
AAggaaiinn MMaarryy sshhaakkeess hheerr hheeaadd,, ffoorrcceess hheerrsseellff ttoo ssttoopp
hheeaarriinngg tthheessee ""iinnvveenntteedd"" sscceenneess ooff hheerr iimmaaggiinnaattiioonn..
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY 9999
NNooww wwee ccuutt ttoo tthhee vviieeww ooff tthhee rrooaadd,, ffrroomm MMaarryy''ss
vviieewwppooiinntt.. DDaarrkknneessss ooff eevveenniinngg iiss ccoommiinngg.. IInn tthhee ddiimm
ttwwiilliigghhtt wwee sseeee tthhee nneeoonn ssiiggnn ooff rrooaaddssiiddee rreessttaauurraannttss
aanndd ggaass ssttaattiioonnss bbeeggiinnnniinngg ttoo bbllaazzee oonn..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS NNEEWW CCAARR
BBaacckk oonn MMaarryy''ss ffaaccee,, aanndd aafftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthhee iimmaaggiinneedd
vvooiicceess aaggaaiinn::
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
CCaallll hheerr ssiisstteerr!! IIff nnoo oonnee''ss
aannsswweerriinngg aatt tthhee hhoouussee........
CCAARROOLLIINNEE''SS VVOOIICCEE
II ccaalllleedd hheerr ssiisstteerr,, MMrr.. LLoowweerryy,,
wwhheerree sshhee wwoorrkkss,, tthhee MMuussiicc MMaakkeerrss
MMuussiicc SSttoorree,, yyoouu kknnooww?? AAnndd sshhee
ddooeessnn''tt kknnooww wwhheerree MMaarryy iiss aannyy mmoorree
tthhaann wwee ddoo..
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
YYoouu bbeetttteerr rruunn oouutt ttoo tthhee hhoouussee..
SShhee mmaayy bbee ...... uunnaabbllee ttoo aannsswweerr tthhee
pphhoonnee........
CCAARROOLLIINNEE''SS VVOOIICCEE
HHeerr ssiisstteerr''ss ggooiinngg ttoo ddoo tthhaatt..
SShhee''ss aass wwoorrrriieedd aass wwee aarree..
AA fflluusshh ooff ppaaiinnffuull gguuiilltt aanndd rreeggrreett rriisseess uupp iinn MMaarryy''ss
ffaaccee.. SShhee cclloosseess hheerr eeyyeess ffoorr oonnee ttiigghhtt sswwiifftt mmoommeenntt..
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY 9999
WWee ccuutt aaggaaiinn ttoo tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy.. TThhee ffiirrsstt oonnccoommiinngg
hheeaaddlliigghhttss ssllaasshh aatt tthhee wwiinnddsshhiieelldd..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS NNEEWW CCAARR
CCuuttttiinngg bbaacckk ttoo MMaarryy,, wwee ccaann sseennssee bbyy tthhee tteennssee mmuusscclleess
ooff hheerr ffaaccee tthhaatt sshhee iiss ddrriivviinngg ffaasstteerr.. TThhee oonnccoommiinngg
hheeaaddlliigghhttss bblluurrtt aatt hheerr..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3311..
SSuuddddeennllyy wwee HHEEAARR LLoowweerryy''ss vvooiiccee,, lloouudd nnooww aanndd
ffrriigghhtteenneedd,, aass iiff tthhee aannxxiieettyy iinn tthhee mmaann''ss vvooiiccee wwaass
ssttrroonngg eennoouugghh ttoo bbrreeaakk tthhrroouugghh MMaarryy''ss eeffffoorrtt ttoo kkeeeepp hheerr
mmiinndd ssiilleenntt aanndd hheerr iimmaaggiinnaattiioonn bbllaannkk..
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
NNoo!! II hhaavveenn''tt tthhee ffaaiinntteesstt iiddeeaa..
AAss II ssaaiidd,, II llaasstt ssaaww yyoouurr ssiisstteerr
wwhheenn sshhee lleefftt tthhiiss ooffffiiccee oonn FFrriiddaayy
...... sshhee ssaaiidd sshhee ddiiddnn''tt ffeeeell wweellll
aanndd wwaanntteedd ttoo lleeaavvee eeaarrllyy aanndd II
ssaaiidd sshhee ccoouulldd.. AAnndd tthhaatt wwaass tthhee
llaasstt II ssaaww ......
((aa ppaauussee,, aa tthhoouugghhtt))
...... wwaaiitt aa mmiinnuuttee,, II ddiidd sseeee hheerr,,
aann hhoouurr oorr ssoo llaatteerr,, ddrriivviinngg......
((aa ppaauussee,, tthheenn wwiitthh
ssoolleemmnn ffeeaarr))
AAhh,, II tthhiinnkk yyoouu''dd bbeetttteerr ccoommee oovveerr
hheerree ttoo mmyy ooffffiiccee.. QQuuiicckk..
((aa ppaauussee,, aa cclliicckk))
CCaarroolliinnee,, ggeett MMrr.. CCaassssiiddyy ffoorr mmee..
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY 9999
IItt iiss ccoommpplleetteellyy ddaarrkk nnooww,, nniigghhtt..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS NNEEWW CCAARR
WWee ccuutt bbaacckk ttoo hheerr ffaaccee..
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
AAfftteerr aallll,, CCaassssiiddyy,, II ttoolldd yyoouu ......
aallll tthhaatt ccaasshh ...... II''mm nnoott ttaakkiinngg
tthhee rreessppoonnssiibbiilliittyy ...... OOhh,, ffoorr
hheeaavveenn''ss ssaakkee,, aa ggiirrll wwoorrkkss ffoorr yyoouu
ffoorr tteenn yyeeaarrss,, yyoouu ttrruusstt hheerr!! AAllll
rriigghhtt,, yyeess,, yyoouu bbeetttteerr ccoommee oovveerr..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE RROOAADD AAHHEEAADD -- FFRROOMM MMAARRYY''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS NNEEWW CCAARR
FFaasstt ccuutt bbaacckk ttoo MMaarryy''ss ffaaccee.. OOnnccoommiinngg hheeaaddlliigghhttss tthhrrooww
aa bblliinnddiinngg lliigghhtt aaccrroossss hheerr ffeeaattuurreess..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3322..
CCAASSSSIIDDYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
((uunnddrruunnkk,, sshhaarrpp wwiitthh
rraaggee))
WWeellll II aaiinn''tt aabboouutt ttoo kkiissss ooffff
ffoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss!! II''llll ggeett
iitt bbaacckk aanndd iiff aannyy ooff iitt''ss mmiissssiinn''
II''llll rreeppllaaccee iitt wwiitthh hheerr ffiinnee ssoofftt
fflleesshh!! II''llll ttrraacckk hheerr,, nneevveerr yyoouu
ddoouubbtt iitt!!
LLOOWWEERRYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
HHoolldd oonn,, CCaassssiiddyy ...... II ssttiillll ccaann''tt
bbeelliieevvee ...... iitt mmuusstt bbee ssoommee kkiinndd ooff
aa mmyysstteerryy ...... II ccaann''tt........
CCAASSSSIIDDYY''SS VVOOIICCEE
YYoouu cchheecckkeedd wwiitthh tthhee bbaannkk,, nnoo??
TThheeyy nneevveerr llaaiidd eeyyeess oonn hheerr,, nnoo??
YYoouu ssttiillll ttrruussttiinn''?? HHoott ccrreeeeppeerrss,,
sshhee ssaatt tthheerree wwhhiillee II dduummppeedd iitt oouutt
...... hhaarrddllyy eevveenn llooookkeedd aatt iitt,,
ppllaannnniinn'' aanndd ...... aanndd eevveenn fflliirrttiinn''
wwiitthh mmee........!!
AA llooookk ooff rreevvuullssiioonn mmaakkeess MMaarryy cclloossee hheerr eeyyeess..
TTHHRROOUUGGHH TTHHEE WWIINNDDSSHHIIEELLDD AAGGAAIINN
BBiigg ddrrooppss ooff rraaiinn bbeeggiinn ttoo aappppeeaarr..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- MMAARRYY
SShhee iiss bbeeccoommiinngg aawwaarree ooff tthhee rraaiinn ssttaarrttiinngg..
TTHHRROOUUGGHH TTHHEE WWIINNDDSSHHIIEELLDD
TThhee rraaiinn iinnccrreeaassiinngg aanndd bbaacckklliitt bbyy tthhee oonnccoommiinngg
hheeaaddlliigghhttss..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- MMAARRYY
MMaarryy ssttaarrttss tthhee wwiinnddsshhiieelldd wwiippeerrss..
TTHHRROOUUGGHH TTHHEE WWIINNDDSSHHIIEELLDD
TThhee wwiippeerrss aarree hhaavviinngg aa bbaattttllee wwiitthh tthhee nnooww ttoorrrreennttiiaall
rraaiinn..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- MMAARRYY
PPeeeerriinngg tthhrroouugghh tthhee bblluurrrreedd wwiinnddsshhiieelldd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3333..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- TTHHEE CCAARR WWHHEEEELLSS
sslloowwiinngg ddoowwnn iinn tthhee ffllooooddiinngg hhiigghhwwaayy..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- MMAARRYY
ppeeeerriinngg tthhrroouugghh tthhee wwiinnddsshhiieelldd.. TThhee oonnccoommiinngg lliigghhttss aarree
ffeewweerr..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- TTHHEE CCAARR WWHHEEEELLSS
aallmmoosstt ccoommiinngg ttoo aa ssllooww ttuurrnn..
TTHHRROOUUGGHH TTHHEE WWIINNDDSSHHIIEELLDD
jjuusstt bbllaacckknneessss aanndd rraaiinn..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- MMAARRYY
ppeeeerriinngg..
MMAARRYY''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT
AAnn aallmmoosstt uunnddiisscceerrnniibbllee lliigghhtt iinn tthhee ffaarr ddiissttaannccee,, aa
nneeoonn ssiiggnn bblluurrrreedd bbyy tthhee rraaiinn--sshheeeetteedd wwiinnddsshhiieelldd..
MMAARRYY''SS CCAARR
SShhee pprreesssseess ddoowwnn,, ffoorrcceess tthhee ccaarr ttoo mmoovvee oonn tthhrroouugghh tthhee
ffllooooddeedd rrooaadd..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE RROOAADD
AAss wwee mmoovvee cclloosseerr,, wwee sseeee tthhee nneeoonn ssiiggnn mmoorree cclleeaarrllyy aanndd
ccaann ffaaiinnttllyy mmaakkee oouutt tthhee llaarrggee lleetttteerrss wwhhiicchh rreeaadd
""MMootteell.."" MMaarryy ssttooppss tthhee ccaarr,, lloowweerrss tthhee wwiinnddooww
sslliigghhttllyy,, llooookkss oouutt.. WWee sseeee tthhee ssiiggnn cclleeaarrllyy nnooww::
""BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL.."" MMaarryy ooppeennss tthhee ccaarr ddoooorr aanndd ddaasshheess oouutt
iinnttoo tthhee rraaiinn aanndd uupp oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh ooff tthhee mmootteell ooffffiiccee..
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
MMaarryy ppaauusseess oonn tthhee ppoorrcchh.. TThhee lliigghhttss aarree oonn wwiitthhiinn tthhee
ooffffiiccee.. SShhee ttrriieess ddoooorr,, ffiinnddss iitt ooppeenn,, ggooeess iinnttoo
ooffffiiccee.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS hheerr iinnttoo ooffffiiccee.. TThheerree iiss nnoo
oonnee pprreesseenntt.. MMaarryy ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, rriinnggss aa ssmmaallll
ppuusshhbbeellll.. TThheerree iiss nnoo rreessppoonnssee.. MMaarryy rruubbss hheerr ffoorreehheeaadd
iinn wweeaarriinneessss aanndd ffrruussttrraattiioonn,, ggooeess bbaacckk oouutt oonnttoo tthhee
ppoorrcchh.. SShhee llooookkss ooffff iinn aannootthheerr ddiirreeccttiioonn,, sslliigghhttllyy
bbeehhiinndd tthhee ooffffiiccee,, aanndd sseeeess ........
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3344..
MMAARRYY''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- AA LLAARRGGEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AA ppaatthh ffrroomm tthhee mmootteell ooffffiiccee lleeaaddss ddiirreeccttllyy uupp ttoo tthhiiss
hhoouussee.. TThheerree iiss aa lliigghhtt oonn iinn oonnee ooff tthhee uuppssttaaiirrss
rroooommss.. AA WWOOMMAANN ppaasssseess tthhee wwiinnddooww,, ppaauusseess,, ppeeeerrss oouutt..
WWee sseeee hheerr iinn cclleeaarr ssiillhhoouueettttee.. SShhee qquuiicckkllyy ggooeess aawwaayy
ffrroomm tthhee wwiinnddooww..
EEXXTT.. PPOORRCCHH OOFF BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
MMaarryy,, hhaavviinngg sseeeenn tthhee wwoommaann,, eexxppeeccttss nnooww tthhaatt sshhee wwiillll
ggeett ssoommee aatttteennttiioonn.. SShhee ssttaannddss aa ffeeww mmoommeennttss,, wwaaiittiinngg..
NNoo oonnee ccoommeess.. IImmppaattiieennccee aanndd aannggeerr rriissee iinn MMaarryy.. SShhee
ddaasshheess oouutt iinnttoo tthhee rraaiinn,, ttoo hheerr ccaarr,, ggeettss iinn,, ooppeennss tthhee
ssiiddee wwiinnddooww,, bbeeggiinnss ttoo hhoonnkk tthhee hhoorrnn.. AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,,
aa YYOOUUNNGG MMAANN ooppeenn tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr ooff tthhee hhoouussee,, ppaauusseess,,
ssttaarrttss ddoowwnn tthhee ppaatthh.. AAfftteerr aa ffeeww sstteeppss,, hhee ttuurrnnss aanndd
rruunnss bbaacckk iinnttoo tthhee hhoouussee.. MMaarryy lleeaavveess hheerr ccaarr,, ssttaarrttss
aa ddaasshh ffoorr tthhee sshheelltteerr ooff tthhee ppoorrcchh.. AAss sshhee rruunnss,, wwee
sseeee tthhaatt tthhee YYoouunngg MMaann hhaass ggoonnee bbaacckk oonnllyy ttoo ggeett aann
uummbbrreellllaa.. SSeeeeiinngg tthhaatt MMaarryy iiss oonn hheerr wwaayy ttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh,,
hhee rruunnss qquuiicckkllyy,, tthhee uummbbrreellllaa uunnooppeenneedd iinn hhiiss hhaanndd.. HHee
ggeettss ttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh aa mmoommeenntt aafftteerr MMaarryy hhaass rreeaacchheedd iitt..
HHee ssttooppss sshhoorrtt,, llooookkss aatt hheerr,, tthheenn aatt tthhee uummbbrreellllaa
hhaannggiinngg uusseelleessss iinn hhiiss hhaanndd,, tthheenn bbaacckk ttoo hheerr..
TThheerree iiss ssoommeetthhiinngg ssaaddllyy ttoouucchhiinngg iinn hhiiss mmaannnneerr,, iinn hhiiss
llooookk.. MMaarryy''ss iimmppaattiieennccee ggooeess aanndd sshhee ssmmiilleess aanndd tthhiiss
mmaakkeess hhiimm aallmmoosstt ssmmiillee.. HHee ggeessttuurreess hheerr iinnttoo tthhee
ooffffiiccee,, ssttaannddiinngg bbaacckk ttoo iinnddiiccaattee tthhaatt hhee wwiillll ggoo aafftteerr
hheerr.. SShhee ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee..
IINNTT.. OOFFFFIICCEE OOFF BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee YYoouunngg MMaann ffoolllloowwss MMaarryy iinn,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr.. HHee iiss
NNOORRMMAANN BBAATTEESS,, ssoommeewwhheerree iinn hhiiss llaattee ttwweennttiieess,, tthhiinn aanndd
ttaallll,, ssoofftt--ssppookkeenn aanndd hheessiittaanntt..
NNOORRMMAANN
DDiirrttyy nniigghhtt..
MMAARRYY
((nnoott rreeaallllyy aa qquueessttiioonn))
YYoouu hhaavvee aa vvaaccaannccyy??
NNOORRMMAANN
((ssiimmppllyy,, aallmmoosstt
cchheeeerrffuullllyy))
WWee hhaavvee ttwweellvvee vvaaccaanncciieess.. TTwweellvvee
ccaabbiinnss,, ttwweellvvee vvaaccaanncciieess..
((aa ppaauussee))
TThheeyy mmoovveedd aawwaayy tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3355..
MMAARRYY
II tthhoouugghhtt II''dd ggootttteenn ooffff tthhee
mmaaiinn........
NNOORRMMAANN
II kknneeww yyoouu mmuusstt hhaavvee.. NNoo oonnee ssttooppss
hheerree aannyymmoorree uunnlleessss tthheeyy ddoo..
HHee iiss bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr nnooww,, ppuusshhiinngg ffoorrwwaarrdd tthhee
rreeggiissttrraattiioonn bbooookk..
NNOORRMMAANN
BBuutt iitt''ss nnoo ggoooodd ddwweelllliinngg oonn oouurr
lloosssseess,, iiss iitt..
WWee ggoo rriigghhtt aahheeaadd lliigghhttiinngg ssiiggnnss
aanndd ffoolllloowwiinngg tthhee ffoorrmmaalliittiieess ......
WWoouulldd yyoouu ssiiggnn,, pplleeaassee..
MMaarryy hhaass ppllaacceedd hheerr hhaannddbbaagg oonn tthhee ccoouunntteerr.. SShhee ttaakkeess
tthhee rreeggiissttrraattiioonn bbooookk,, ppiicckkss uupp tthhee ppeenn,, iiss ssuuddddeennllyy
ssttrruucckk wwiitthh tthhee rreeaalliizzaattiioonn tthhaatt sshhee''dd bbeetttteerr uussee aann
aalllliieess.. SShhee wwrriitteess tthhee nnaammee MMaarriiee SSaammuueellss..
NNOORRMMAANN
YYoouurr hhoommee aaddddrreessss.. OOhh,, jjuusstt tthhee
ttoowwnn wwiillll ddoo..
MMAARRYY
((ggllaanncciinngg aatt nneewwssppaappeerr
ssttiicckkiinngg oouutt ooff hheerr
hhaannddbbaagg))
LLooss AAnnggeelleess..
SShhee rreeaalliizzeess hhee ddiiddnn''tt aasskk hheerr ttoo tteellll hhiimm,, mmeerreellyy ttoo
wwrriittee iitt ddoowwnn.. SShhee ssmmiilleess,, wwrriitteess LLooss AAnnggeelleess bbeessiiddee
tthhee ffaallssee nnaammee.. NNoorrmmaann ssmmiilleess,, ssttooppss ssmmiilliinngg oouutt ooff
eemmbbaarrrraassssmmeenntt..
NNOORRMMAANN
CCaabbiinn OOnnee.. IItt''ss cclloosseerr iinn ccaassee yyoouu
wwaanntt aannyytthhiinngg ...... rriigghhtt nneexxtt ttoo tthhee
ooffffiiccee..
CCLLOOSSEEUUPP -- NNOORRMMAANN
HHee rreemmoovveess aa kkeeyy ffoorr CCaabbiinn OOnnee.. WWee sseeee tthhaatt tthheerree iiss aa
rreemmaanniinngg kkeeyy oonn tthhee bbooaarrdd..
TTWWOO SSHHOOTT -- MMAARRYY AANNDD NNOORRMMAANN
MMAARRYY
II wwaanntt sslleeeepp mmoorree tthhaann aannyytthhiinngg..
EExxcceepptt mmaayybbee,, ffoooodd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3366..
NNOORRMMAANN
TThheerree''ss aa bbiigg ddiinneerr aabboouutt tteenn mmiilleess
oonn uupp ...... jjuusstt oouuttssiiddee FFaaiirrvvaallee..
MMAARRYY
AAmm II tthhaatt cclloossee ttoo FFaaiirrvvaallee??
NNOORRMMAANN
FFiifftteeeenn mmiilleess.. II''llll ggeett yyoouurr bbaaggss..
HHee ggooeess ttoo ddoooorr,, ooppeennss iitt.. TThhee rraaiinn hhaass sslloowweedd ddoowwnn
ccoonnssiiddeerraabbllyy.. HHee ssmmiilleess aatt tthhiiss ffaacctt,, aass iiff ttoo
ccoommmmuunniiccaattee ssoommee pplleeaassssuurree hhee ffiinnddss iinn iitt.. MMaarryy ffoolllloowwss
hhiimm ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,, ggooeess oouutt oonn tthhee ppoorrcchh,, wwaaiittss aanndd
wwaattcchheess aass NNoorrmmaann rruunnss ttoo hheerr ccaarr,, ggeettss iinn,, ddrriivveess iitt ttoo
tthhee ppaarrkkiinngg ssppaaccee iinn ffrroonntt ooff CCaabbiinn OOnnee.. MMaarryy wwaallkkss
aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh,, wwaaiittss bbeeffoorree tthhee ddoooorr ooff CCaabbiinn OOnnee..
NNoorrmmaann ggeettss oouutt ooff ccaarr,, wwiitthh ssuuiittccaassee,, rruunnss ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,,
ooppeennss iitt,, ppuusshheess tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn,, ppuuttss hhiiss hhaanndd iinn aanndd
sswwiittcchheess oonn aa lliigghhtt.. MMaarryy ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee ccaabbiinn.. NNoorrmmaann
ffoolllloowwss hheerr..
IINNTT.. CCAABBIINN OONNEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann ppllaacceess ssuuiittccaassee oonn bbeedd,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee wwiinnddooww,, ooppeennss
iitt..
NNOORRMMAANN
SSttuuffffyy iinn hheerree..
((ttuurrnnss ttoo hheerr))
WWeellll ...... tthhee mmaattttrreessss iiss ssoofftt aanndd
tthheerree''rree hhaannggeerrss iinn tthhee cclloosseett aanndd
...... ssttaattiioonnaarryy wwiitthh ""BBaatteess'' MMootteell""
pprriinntteedd oonn iitt iinn ccaassee yyoouu wwaanntt ttoo
mmaakkee yyoouurr ffrriieennddss bbaacckk hhoommee eennvviioouuss
...... aanndd ...... tthhee ...... eevveerr tthheerree ........
((hhee ppooiinnttss ttoo tthhee
bbaatthhrroooomm,, ffaaiirrllyy
bblluusshheess))
MMAARRYY
TThhee bbaatthhrroooomm..
NNOORRMMAANN
((qquuiicckkllyy,, ssttaarrttiinngg ttoo
lleeaavvee))
II''llll bbee iinn tthhee ooffffiiccee iiff yyoouu wwaanntt
aannyytthhiinngg ...... jjuusstt ttaapp oonn tthhee wwaallll..
MMAARRYY
TThhaannkk yyoouu,, MMrr.. BBaatteess..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3377..
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess..
HHee ppaauusseess aatt tthhee ddoooorr,, ggaazzeess aatt hheerr.. SShhee ssmmiilleess..
NNOORRMMAANN
YYoouu hhaavvee ssoommeetthhiinngg mmoosstt ggiirrllss nneevveerr
hhaavvee..
MMAARRYY
II hhaavvee??
NNOORRMMAANN
TThheerree''ss nnoo nnaammee ffoorr iitt ...... BBuutt iitt''ss
ssoommeetthhiinngg tthhaatt,, tthhaatt ppuuttss aa ppeerrssoonn
aatt eeaassee..
MMAARRYY
TThhaannkk yyoouu.. AAggaaiinn..
NNOORRMMAANN
((nnoott rreeaallllyy aa qquueessttiioonn))
YYoouu''rree nnoott ggooiinngg ttoo ggoo oouutt aaggaaiinn
aanndd ddrriivvee uupp ttoo tthhaatt ddiinneerr,, aarree yyoouu??
MMAARRYY
NNoo..
NNOORRMMAANN
TThheenn wwiillll yyoouu ddoo mmee aa ffaavvoorr??
((wwiitthhoouutt wwaaiittiinngg ffoorr
hheerr rreessppoonnssee))
WWiillll yyoouu hhaavvee ssuuppppeerr hheerree?? II wwaass
jjuusstt aabboouutt ttoo,, mmyysseellff ...... nnootthhiinngg
mmoorree tthhaann ssoommee ssaannddwwiicchheess aanndd aa lloott
ooff mmiillkk,, bbuutt II''dd lliikkee iitt iiff yyoouu''dd
ccoommee uupp ttoo tthhee hhoouussee aanndd ...... II
ddoonn''tt sseett aa ffaannccyy ttaabbllee bbuutt ...... tthhee
kkiittcchheenn''ss aawwffuull hhoommeeyy..
MMAARRYY
II''dd lliikkee ttoo..
NNOORRMMAANN
AAllll rriigghhtt,, yyoouu ggeett yyoouurr ddrreesssseess
hhaannggiinngg oouutt aanndd ...... cchhaannggee tthhoossee
wweett sshhooeess,, aanndd II''llll ccoommee ffoorr yyoouu
ssoooonn aass iitt''ss rreeaaddyy......
((ssttaarrttss oouutt))
......wwiitthh mmyy ttrruussttyy uummbbrreellllaa..
((hhee llaauugghhss aa ssmmaallll
llaauugghh,, rruunnss ooffff))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3388..
MMaarryy cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr,, ggooeess ttoo ssuuiittccaassee,, ooppeennss iitt,, ssttaarrttss
ttoo ttaakkee oouutt aa ddrreessss.. HHeerr hhaannddbbaagg iiss nneexxtt ttoo tthhee
ssuuiittccaassee.. SShhee ggllaanncceess ddoowwnn iinnttoo iitt,, ppaauusseess,, ddrrooppss tthhee
ddrreessss,, rreeaacchheess iinnttoo tthhee hhaannddbbaagg,, ttaakkeess oouutt tthhee mmoonneeyy--
ffiilllleedd eennvveellooppee,, ssttaarreess aatt iitt,, aallmmoosstt wwiitthh rreeggrreett,,
ccoonntteemmppllaatteess hhiiddiinngg iitt,, ddeecciiddeess ttoo,, ssttaarrttss llooookkiinngg ffoorr
aa rreeaassoonnaabbllee hhiiddiinngg ppllaaccee.. SShhee llooookkss aabboouutt,, aatt tthhee
cclloosseett,, tthhee ddrraawweerrss eettcc..,, rreeaalliizzeess aallll ssuucchh ppllaacceess aarree
oobbvviioouuss.. CCaattcchhiinngg ssiigghhtt ooff tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr iinn hheerr bbaagg,,
sshhee hhiittss oonn aa ssoolluuttiioonn.. SShhee ooppeennss tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr,, ppllaacceess
tthhee eennvveellooppee wwiitthhiinn iitt,, lloocckk--ffoollddss tthhee ppaappeerr aaggaaiinn aanndd
tthheenn ppllaacceess iitt oonn tthhee bbeeddssiiddee ttaabbllee aass iiff iitt wweerree tthheerree
ffoorr llaatteerr rreeaaddiinngg.. SShhee ccoonnssiiddeerrss tthhiiss ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,,
aacccceeppttss iitt,, ggooeess ttoo hheerr ssuuiittccaassee ttoo ssttaarrtt uunnppaacckkiinngg..
SSuuddddeennllyy tthhee qquuiieett iiss sshhaatttteerreedd bbyy tthhee sshhrriillll,, uuggllyy
ssoouunndd ooff aa wwoommaann''ss vvooiiccee,, rraaiisseedd iinn aannggeerr..
WWOOMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
NNoo!! II tteellll yyoouu nnoo!!
MMaarryy wwaallkkss sslloowwllyy ttoo tthhee wwiinnddooww,, rreeaalliizziinngg tthhaatt tthhee
tteerrrriibbllee vvooiiccee iiss ccoommiinngg ffrroomm tthhee hhoouussee bbeehhiinndd tthhee
ccaabbiinnss.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS hheerr ttoo wwiinnddooww aanndd oonnccee tthheerree wwee
sseeee tthhee lliigghhtt iiss ssttiillll oonn iinn tthhee uuppssttaaiirrss bbeeddrroooomm aanndd
tthhee vvooiiccee iiss ccoommiinngg ffrroomm tthhaatt rroooomm.. TThhee rraaiinn hhaass
ssttooppppeedd aanndd tthhee mmoooonn iiss oouutt..
WWOOMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
II wwoonn''tt hhaavvee yyoouu bbrriinnggiinngg ssttrraannggee
yyoouunngg ggiirrllss iinn ffoorr ssuuppppeerr ......
((aann uuggllyy,, ssnneeeerriinngg
nnoottee ccrreeeeppss iinnttoo tthhee
vvooiiccee))
...... bbyy ccaannddlleelliigghhtt,, II ssuuppppoossee,, iinn
tthhee cchheeaapp eerroottiicc ffaasshhiioonn ooff yyoouunngg
mmeenn wwiitthh cchheeaapp,, eerroottiicc mmiinnddss!!
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
MMootthheerr,, pplleeaassee ......
WWOOMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
AAnndd tthheenn wwhhaatt?? AAfftteerr ssuuppppeerr,,
mmuussiicc?? WWhhiissppeerrss??
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
MMootthheerr,, sshhee''ss jjuusstt aa ssttrraannggeerr ......
hhuunnggrryy,, aanndd tthhee wweeaatthheerr''ss bbaadd ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 3399..
WWOOMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
((mmiimmiicckkiinngg ccrruueellllyy))
MMootthheerr,, sshhee''ss jjuusstt aa ssttrraannggeerr!!
((hhaarrdd,, ccrruueell aaggaaiinn))
AAss iiff mmeenn ddoonn''tt ddeessiirree ssttrraannggeerrss,,
aass iiff ...... oohh,, II rreeffuussee ttoo ssppeeaakk ooff
ddiissgguussttiinngg tthhiinnggss bbeeccaauussee tthheeyy
ddiissgguusstt mmee!! YYoouu uunnddeerrssttaanndd,, BBooyy??
WWOOMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
((ppaauussee))
GGoo oonn,, ggoo tteellll hheerr sshhee''llll nnoott bbee
aappppeeaassiinngg hheerr uuggllyy aappppeettiittee wwiitthh mmyy
ffoooodd ...... oorr mmyy ssoonn!! OOrr ddoo II hhaavvee
ttoo tteellll hheerr,, ccaauussee yyoouu ddoonn''tt hhaavvee
tthhee gguuttss?? HHuuhh,, bbooyy?? YYoouu hhaavvee tthhee
gguuttss,, bbooyy??
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
((bblluurrtteedd ccuutt ffuurryy aanndd
sshhaammee))
SShhuutt uupp!! SShhuutt uupp!!
TThheerree iiss tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff aa ddoooorr cclloossiinngg iinn tthhaatt rroooomm uupp
tthheerree.. MMaarryy hhaass ssttoooodd bbyy tthhee wwiinnddooww,, lliisstteenniinngg wwiitthh
mmoouunnttiinngg ddiissttrreessss aanndd ccoonncceerrnn aanndd ssyymmppaatthhyy.. SShhee ttuurrnnss
hheerr ffaaccee aawwaayy nnooww,, ggaazzeess ssaaddllyy aatt tthhee lliittttllee eemmppttyy rroooomm..
IInn aa mmoommeenntt tthheerree iiss tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee hhoouussee''ss ffrroonntt ddoooorr
ssllaammmmiinngg sshhuutt.. MMaarryy ttuurrnnss,, llooookkss oouutt tthhee wwiinnddooww..
FFRROOMM MMAARRYY''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
WWee sseeee NNoorrmmaann ccoommiinngg ddoowwnn tthhee ppaatthh,, ccaarrrryyiinngg aa nnaappkkiinn--
ccoovveerreedd ttrraayy..
IINNTT.. CCAABBIINN OONNEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
MMaarryy llooookkss aatt hhiimm ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ttuurrnnss qquuiicckkllyy,, ggooeess
ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,, ooppeennss iitt aanndd ggooeess oouutt oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL PPOORRCCHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
MMaarryy ppaauusseess oouuttssiiddee tthhee ddoooorr,, iiss aabboouutt ttoo ssttaarrtt ffoorrwwaarrdd
wwhheenn NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess rroouunndd tthhee bbuuiillddiinngg aanndd wwaallkkss aalloonngg tthhee
ppoorrcchh,, ppaasstt tthhee ooffffiiccee,, ssttooppppiinngg oonnllyy wwhheenn hhee iiss cclloossee
ttoo hheerr.. HHee ssttaarreess wwiitthh ppaaiinnffuull eemmbbaarrrraassssmmeenntt aatt tthhee
kknnoowwiinngg llooookk iinn hheerr eeyyee..
MMAARRYY
II''vvee ccaauusseedd yyoouu ssoommee ttrroouubbllee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4400..
NNOORRMMAANN
MMootthheerr ......
((aa hhoollllooww lliittttllee
llaauugghh,, aann aatttteemmpptt aatt
ssaarrddoonniicc hhuummoorr))
...... wwhhaatt iiss tthhee pphhrraassee ...... ""sshhee
iissnn''tt hheerrsseellff ttooddaayy"" ...... II tthhiinnkk
tthhaatt''ss iitt..
MMAARRYY
((llooookkiinngg aatt tthhee ttrraayy))
YYoouu sshhoouullddnn''tt hhaavvee bbootthheerreedd.. II
rreeaallllyy ddoonn''tt hhaavvee tthhaatt mmuucchh ooff aann
aappppeettiittee..
NNoorrmmaann fflliinncchheess,, rreeaalliizziinngg sshhee hhaass hheeaarrdd hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss
rreeffeerreennccee ttoo MMaarryy''ss aappppeettiittee..
NNOORRMMAANN
II''mm ssoorrrryy.. II wwiisshh ...... ppeeooppllee ccoouulldd
aappoollooggiizzee ffoorr ootthheerr ppeeooppllee..
MMAARRYY
DDoonn''tt wwoorrrryy aabboouutt iitt..
((aa wwaarrmm ssmmiillee))
BBuutt aass lloonngg aass yyoouu''vvee mmaaddee uuss
ssuuppppeerr,, wwee mmaayy aass wweellll eeaatt iitt.. HHuuhh??
SShhee bbeeggiinnss ttoo bbaacckk iinnttoo hheerr rroooomm.. NNoorrmmaann ssttaarrttss ttoo
ffoollllooww,, hheessiittaatteess aass hhee sseeeess tthhee ttoottaall ppiiccttuurree ooff aann
aattttrraaccttiivvee yyoouunngg wwoommaann aanndd aa mmootteell rroooomm.. BBrriinnggiinngg ddoowwnn
tthhee ttrraayy ooff ffoooodd,, iinn ddeeffiiaannccee ooff hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss oorrddeerrss,, iiss
aabboouutt tthhee lliimmiitt ooff hhiiss ddeeffiiaannccee ffoorr oonnee ddaayy.. HHee ccaannnnoott
ggoo iinnttoo MMaarryy''ss rroooomm..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt mmiigghhtt bbee nniicceerr ...... wwaarrmmeerr iinn tthhee
ooffffiiccee..
WWiitthhoouutt wwaaiittiinngg ffoorr aapppprroovvaall oorr ddiissaapppprroovvaall,, hhee ttuurrnnss,,
hhuurrrriieess ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee.. MMaarryy llooookkss aafftteerr hhiimm,, hheerr ffaaccee
sshhoowwiinngg aammuusseedd ssyymmppaatthhyy,, tthheenn ffoolllloowwss..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann llooookkss aabboouutt,, ttrraayy iinn hhaanndd,, sseeeess tthheerree iiss nnoo
rreeaassoonnaabbllee ppllaaccee ttoo sspprreeaadd oouutt aa ssuuppppeerr.. HHee ttuurrnnss,, sseeeess
MMaarryy ssttaannddiinngg iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4411..
NNOORRMMAANN
EEaattiinngg iinn aann ooffffiiccee ......
((aa rruueeffuull ssmmiillee))
...... ttoo ooffffiicciioouuss,, eevveenn ffoorr mmee.. II
hhaavvee tthhee ppaarrlloorr bbeehhiinndd tthhiiss ...... iiff
yyoouu''dd lliikkee..
MMaarryy nnooddss.. NNoorrmmaann wwaallkkss oonn,, bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr aanndd iinnttoo
tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd ppaarrlloorr.. MMaarryy ffoolllloowwss..
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS PPAARRLLOORR --((NNIIGGHHTT))
IInn tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd rroooomm,, lliitt oonnllyy bbyy tthhee lliigghhtt ffrroomm tthhee
ooffffiiccee ssppiilllliinngg iinn,, wwee sseeee NNoorrmmaann ppllaacciinngg tthhee ttrraayy oonn aa
ttaabbllee.. MMaarryy ccoommeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy,, ppaauusseess.. NNoorrmmaann
ssttrraaiigghhtteennss uupp,, ggooeess ttoo llaammpp,, ttuurrnnss oonn tthhee lliigghhtt..
MMaarryy iiss ssttaarrttlleedd bbyy tthhee rroooomm.. EEvveenn iinn tthhee ddiimmnneessss ooff
oonnee llaammpp,, tthhee ssttrraannggee,, eexxttrraaoorrddiinnaarryy nnaattuurree ooff tthhee rroooomm
rruusshheess uupp aatt oonnee.. IItt iiss aa rroooomm ooff bbiirrddss.. SSttuuffffeedd
bbiirrddss,, aallll oovveerr tthhee rroooomm,, oonn eevveerryy aavvaaiillaabbllee ssuurrffaaccee,,
oonnee eevveenn cclliinnggiinngg ttoo tthhee oolldd ffaasshhiioonneedd ffrriinnggeedd sshhaaddee ooff
tthhee llaammpp.. TThhee bbiirrddss aarree ooff mmaannyy vvaarriieettiieess,, bbeeaauuttiiffuull,,
ggrraanndd,, hhoorrrriibbllee,, pprreeyyiinngg.. MMaarryy ssttaarreess iinn aawwee aanndd aa
cceerrttaaiinn ffaasscciinnaatteedd hhoorrrroorr..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- TTHHEE VVAARRIIOOUUSS BBIIRRDDSS
TTWWOO SSHHOOTT -- MMAARRYY AANNDD NNOORRMMAANN
NNOORRMMAANN
PPlleeaassee ssiitt ddoowwnn.. OOnn tthhee ssooffaa..
AAss NNoorrmmaann ggooeess aabboouutt sspprreeaaddiinngg oouutt tthhee bbrreeaadd aanndd hhaamm aanndd
ppoouurriinngg tthhee mmiillkk,, wwee ffoollllooww MMaarryy aaccrroossss tthhee rroooomm.. SShhee
ssttuuddiieess tthhee bbiirrddss aass sshhee wwaallkkss,, bbrriieeffllyy eexxaammiinneess aa
bbooookkccaassee ssttaacckkeedd wwiitthh bbooookkss oonn tthhee ssuubbjjeecctt ooff
""TTaaxxiiddeerrmmyy..""
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- TTHHEE BBOOOOKKSS OONN TTAAXXIIDDEERRMMYY
MMEEDD.. CCLLOOSSEE SSHHOOTT -- MMAARRYY
SShhee nnoottiicceess,, ttoooo,, tthhee ppaaiinnttiinnggss oonn tthhee wwaallll;; nnuuddeess,,
pprriimmaarriillyy,, aanndd mmaannyy wwiitthh aa vvaagguueellyy rreelliiggiioouuss oovveerrttoonnee..
FFiinnaallllyy MMaarryy rreeaacchheess tthhee ssooffaa,, ssiittss ddoowwnn,, llooookkss aatt tthhee
sspprreeaadd..
MMAARRYY
YYoouu''rree vveerryy ...... kkiinndd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4422..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt''ss aallll ffoorr yyoouu.. II''mm nnoott hhuunnggrryy..
PPlleeaassee ggoo aahheeaadd..
MMaarryy bbeeggiinnss ttoo eeaatt,, hheerr aattttiittuuddee aa bbiitt tteennssee.. SShhee ttaakkeess
uupp aa ssmmaallll sslliiccee ooff hhaamm,, bbiitteess ooffff aa ttiinnyy bbiittee,, nniibbbblleess
aatt iitt iinn tthhee mmaannnneerr ooff oonnee ddiissttuurrbbeedd aanndd pprreeooccccuuppiieedd..
NNoorrmmaann ggaazzeess aatt hheerr,, aatt tthhee ttiinnyy bbiittee sshhee hhaass ttaakkeenn,,
ssmmiilleess aanndd tthheenn llaauugghhss..
NNOORRMMAANN
YYoouu eeaatt lliikkee aa bbiirrdd..
MMAARRYY
YYoouu''dd kknnooww,, ooff ccoouurrssee..
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoott rreeaallllyy.. II hheeaarr tthhaatt
eexxpprreessssiioonn,, tthhaatt oonnee eeaattss ""lliikkee aa
bbiirrdd,,"" iiss rreeaallllyy aa ffaallssiiee,, II mmeeaann
aa ffaallssiittyy,, bbeeccaauussee bbiirrddss eeaatt aa
ttrreemmeennddoouuss lloott..
((AA ppaauussee,, tthheenn
eexxppllaaiinniinngg))
OOhh,, II ddoonn''tt kknnooww aannyytthhiinngg aabboouutt
bbiirrddss.. MMyy hhoobbbbyy iiss ssttuuffffiinngg tthhiinnggss
...... ttaaxxiiddeerrmmyy.. AAnndd II gguueessss II''dd
jjuusstt rraatthheerr ssttuuffff bbiirrddss bbeeccaauussee ......
wweellll,, II hhaattee tthhee llooookk ooff bbeeaassttss
wwhheenn tthheeyy''rree ssttuuffffeedd,, ffooxxeess aanndd
cchhiimmppss aanndd aallll ...... ssoommee ppeeooppllee eevveenn
ssttuuffff ddooggss aanndd ccaattss ...... bbuutt II ccaann''tt
...... II tthhiinnkk oonnllyy bbiirrddss llooookk wweellll
ssttuuffffeedd bbeeccaauussee tthheeyy''rree rraatthheerr ......
ppaassssiivvee,, ttoo bbeeggiinn wwiitthh ...... mmoosstt ooff
tthheemm ......
HHee ttrraaiillss ooffff,, hhiiss eexxuubbeerraannccee ffaaiilliinngg iinn tthhee rruusshhiinngg
rreettuurrnn ooff hhiiss nnaattuurraall hheessiittaannccyy aanndd ddiissccoommffoorrtt.. MMaarryy
llooookkss aatt hhiimm,, wwiitthh ssoommee ccoommpprreessssiioonn,, ssmmiilleess..
MMAARRYY
IItt''ss aa ssttrraannggee hhoobbbbyy.. CCuurriioouuss,, II
mmeeaann..
NNOORRMMAANN
UUnnccoommmmoonn,, ttoooo..
MMAARRYY
II iimmaaggiinnee ssoo..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4433..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt''ss nnoott aass eexxppeennssiivvee aass yyoouu''dd
tthhiinnkk.. CChheeaapp,, rreeaallllyy.. NNeeeeddlleess,,
tthhrreeaadd,, ssaawwdduusstt ...... tthhee cchheemmiiccaallss
aarree aallll tthhaatt ccoosstt aannyytthhiinngg..
((HHee ggooeess qquuiieett,, llooookkss
ddiissttuurrbbeedd))
MMAARRYY
AA mmaann sshhoouulldd hhaavvee aa hhoobbbbyy..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt''ss mmoorree tthhaann aa hhoobbbbyy ......
ssoommeettiimmeess ...... aa hhoobbbbyy iiss ssuuppppoosseedd
ttoo ppaassss tthhee ttiimmee,, nnoott ffiillll iitt..
MMAARRYY
((aafftteerr aa ppaauussee,, ssooffttllyy))
IIss yyoouurr ttiimmee ssoo eemmppttyy??
NNOORRMMAANN
OOhh,, nnoo!!
((ffoorrcciinngg bbrriigghhttnneessss
aaggaaiinn))
II rruunn tthhee ooffffiiccee,, tteenndd tthhee ccaabbiinnss
aanndd ggrroouunnddss,, ddoo lliittttllee cchhoorreess ffoorr
mmootthheerr ...... tthhee oonneess sshhee aalllloowwss II
mmiigghhtt bbee ccaappaabbllee ooff ddooiinngg..
MMAARRYY
YYoouu ggoo oouutt ...... wwiitthh ffrriieennddss??
NNOORRMMAANN
FFrriieennddss?? WWhhoo nneeeeddss ffrriieennddss..
((LLaauugghhss,, tthheenn wwiitthh
ggaalllloowwss hhuummoorr))
AA bbooyy''ss bbeesstt ffrriieenndd iiss hhiiss mmootthheerr..
((SSttooppss llaauugghhiinngg))
YYoouu''vvee nneevveerr hhaadd aann eemmppttyy mmoommeenntt iinn
yyoouurr wwhhoollee lliiffee.. HHaavvee yyoouu??
MMAARRYY
OOnnllyy mmyy sshhaarree..
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhheerree aarree yyoouu ggooiinngg?? II ddoonn''tt mmeeaann
ttoo pprryy ......
MMAARRYY
((AA wwiissttffuull ssmmiillee))
II''mm llooookkiinngg ffoorr aa pprriivvaattee iissllaanndd..
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhhaatt aarree yyoouu rruunnnniinngg aawwaayy ffrroomm??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4444..
MMAARRYY
((AAlleerrtt))
WWhhyy ddoo yyoouu aasskk tthhaatt??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo.. PPeeooppllee nneevveerr rruunn aawwaayy ffrroomm
aannyytthhiinngg..
((AA ppaauussee))
TThhee rraaiinn ddiiddnn''tt llaasstt vveerryy lloonngg..
((TTuurrnniinngg ssuuddddeennllyy))
YYoouu kknnooww wwhhaatt II tthhiinnkk?? II tthhiinnkk
wwee''rree aallll iinn oouurr pprriivvaattee ttrraappss,,
ccllaammppeedd iinn tthheemm,, aanndd nnoonnee ooff uuss ccaann
eevveerr cclliimmbb oouutt.. WWee ssccrraattcchh aanndd
ccllaaww ...... bbuutt oonnllyy aatt tthhee aaiirr,, oonnllyy
aatt eeaacchh ootthheerr,, aanndd ffoorr aallll ooff iitt,,
wwee nneevveerr bbuuddggee aann iinncchh..
MMAARRYY
SSoommeettiimmeess wwee ddeelliibbeerraatteellyy sstteepp iinnttoo
tthhoossee ttrraappss..
NNOORRMMAANN
II wwaass bboorrnn iinn mmiinnee.. II ddoonn''tt mmiinndd
iitt aannyymmoorree..
MMAARRYY
YYoouu sshhoouulldd ...... MMiinndd iitt..
NNOORRMMAANN
OOhh II ddoo ...... bbuutt II ssaayy II ddoonn''tt..
((LLaauugghhss bbooyyiisshhllyy))
MMAARRYY
((SSttaarriinngg aatt hhiimm,,
sshhaakkiinngg hheerr hheeaadd
ssooffttllyy..))
IIff aannyyoonnee eevveerr ssppookkee ttoo mmee,, tthhee wwaayy
II hheeaarrdd ...... TThhee wwaayy sshhee ssppookkee ttoo
yyoouu,, II ddoonn''tt tthhiinnkk II ccoouulldd eevveerr
llaauugghh aaggaaiinn..
NNOORRMMAANN
((CCoonnttrroolllleedd rreesseennttmmeenntt))
SSoommeettiimmeess wwhheenn sshhee ttaallkkss tthhaatt wwaayy
ttoo mmee II''dd lliikkee ttoo ...... ccuurrssee hheerr oouutt
aanndd lleeaavvee hheerr ffoorreevveerr!!
((AA rruueeffuull ssmmiillee))
OOrr aatt lleeaasstt,, ddeeffyy hheerr..
((AA ppaauussee,, aa hhooppeelleessss
sshhrruugg))
BBuutt II ccoouullddnn''tt.. SShhee''ss iillll..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4455..
MMAARRYY
SShhee ssoouunnddeedd ssttrroonngg ......
NNOORRMMAANN
II mmeeaann ...... iillll..
((AA ppaauussee))
SShhee hhaadd ttoo rraaiissee mmee aallll bbyy hheerrsseellff
aafftteerr mmyy ddaadd ddiieedd ...... II wwaass oonnllyy
ffiivvee ...... aanndd iitt mmuusstt hhaavvee bbeeeenn aa
ssttrraaiinn.. OOhh,, sshhee ddiiddnn''tt hhaavvee ttoo ggoo
oouutt ttoo wwoorrkk oorr aannyytthhiinngg,, DDaadd lleefftt
uuss wwiitthh aa lliittttllee ssoommeetthhiinngg ......
aannyywwaayy,, aa ffeeww yyeeaarrss aaggoo ...... MMootthheerr
mmeett aa mmaann.. HHee ttaallkkeedd hheerr iinnttoo
bbuuiillddiinngg tthhiiss mmootteell ...... WWee ccoouulldd
hhaavvee ttaallkkeedd hheerr iinnttoo aannyytthhiinngg ......
aanndd wwhheenn.. WWeellll ...... IItt wwaass jjuusstt ttoooo
mmuucchh ffoorr hheerr wwhheenn hhee ddiieedd,, ttoooo ......
AAnndd tthhee wwaayy hhee ddiieedd ......OOhh,, iitt''ss
nnootthhiinngg ttoo ttaallkk aabboouutt wwhheenn yyoouu''rree
eeaattiinngg..
((PPaauusseess,, ssmmiilleess))
AAnnyywwaayy,, iitt wwaass ttoooo mmuucchh ooff aa lloossss
ffoorr mmyy mmootthheerr ...... sshhee hhaadd nnootthhiinngg
lleefftt..
MMAARRYY
((CCrriittiiccaallllyy))
EExxcceepptt yyoouu..
NNOORRMMAANN
AA ssoonn iiss aa ppoooorr ssuubbssttiittuuttee ffoorr aa
lloovveerr..
((TTuurrnnss aawwaayy aass iiff iinn
ddiissttaassttee ooff tthhee wwoorrdd))
MMAARRYY
WWhhyy ddoonn''tt yyoouu ggoo aawwaayy??
NNOORRMMAANN
TToo aa pprriivvaattee iissllaanndd,, lliikkee yyoouu??
MMAARRYY
NNoo,, nnoott lliikkee mmee..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt''ss ttoooo llaattee ffoorr mmee.. AAnndd bbeessiiddeess
...... wwhhoo''dd llooookk aafftteerr hheerr?? SShhee''dd bbee
aalloonnee uupp tthheerree,, tthhee ffiirree wwoouulldd ggoo
oouutt ...... ddaammpp aanndd ccoolldd,, lliikkee aa
ggrraavvee.. WWhheenn yyoouu lloovvee ssoommeeoonnee,, yyoouu
ddoonn''tt ddoo tthhaatt ttoo tthheemm,, eevveenn iiff yyoouu
hhaattee tthheemm.. OOhh,, II ddoonn''tt hhaattee hheerr..
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4466..
NNOORRMMAANN ((ccoonntt''dd))
II hhaattee ...... wwhhaatt sshhee''ss bbeeccoommee.. II
hhaattee ...... tthhee iillllnneessss..
MMAARRYY
((SSlloowwllyy,, ccaarreeffuullllyy))
WWoouullddnn''tt iitt bbee bbeetttteerr iiff yyoouu ppuutt
hheerr iinn ...... ssoommeeppllaaccee ......
SShhee hheessiittaatteess.. NNoorrmmaann ttuurrnnss,, sslloowwllyy,, llooookkiinngg aatt hheerr
wwiitthh aa ssttrriikkiinngg ccoollddnneessss..
NNOORRMMAANN
AAnn IInnssttiittuuttiioonn?? AA mmaaddhhoouussee??
PPeeooppllee aallwwaayyss ccaallll aa mmaaddhhoouussee
""ssoommeeppllaaccee..""
((MMiimmiicciinngg ccoollddllyy))
PPuutt hheerr iinn SSoommeeppllaaccee!!
MMAARRYY
II''mm ssoorrrryy ...... II ddiiddnn''tt mmeeaann iitt ttoo
ssoouunndd uunnccaarriinngg ......
NNOORRMMAANN
((TThhee ccoollddnneessss ttuurrnniinngg
ttoo ttiigghhtt ffuurryy))
WWhhaatt ddoo yyoouu mmeeaann aabboouutt ccaarriinngg??
HHaavvee yyoouu eevveerr sseeeenn oonnee ooff tthhoossee
ppllaacceess?? IInnssiiddee?? LLaauugghhiinngg aanndd
tteeaarrss aanndd ccrruueell eeyyeess ssttuuddyyiinngg yyoouu
...... aanndd mmyy mmootthheerr tthheerree?? WWhhyy?? hhaass
sshhee hhaarrmmeedd yyoouu?? SShhee''ss aass hhaarrmmlleessss
aass ...... oonnee ooff tthheessee ssttuuffffeedd bbiirrddss..
MMAARRYY
II aamm ssoorrrryy.. II oonnllyy ffeelltt ...... iitt
sseeeemmeedd sshhee wwaass hhaarrmmiinngg yyoouu.. II
mmeeaanntt ......
NNOORRMMAANN
((HHiigghh ffuurryy nnooww))
WWeellll?? YYoouu mmeeaanntt wweellll?? PPeeooppllee
aallwwaayyss mmeeaann wweellll,, tthheeyy cclluucckk tthheeiirr
tthhiicckk ttoonngguueess aanndd sshhaakkee tthheeiirr hheeaaddss
aanndd ssuuggggeesstt ssoo vveerryy ddeelliiccaatteellyy
tthhaatt ......
TThhee ffuurryy ssuuddddeennllyy ddiieess,, aabbrruuppttllyy aanndd ccoommpplleetteellyy,, aanndd hhee
ssiinnkkss bbaacckk iinnttoo hhiiss cchhaaiirr.. TThheerree iiss aa bbrriieeff ssiilleennccee..
MMaarryy wwaattcchheess tthhee ttrroouubblleedd mmaann,, iiss aallmmoosstt pphhyyssiiccaallllyy
ppaaiinneedd bbyy hhiiss aanngguuiisshh..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4477..
NNOORRMMAANN
((QQuuiieettllyy))
II''vvee ssuuggggeesstteedd iitt mmyysseellff.. BBuutt II
hhaattee ttoo eevveenn tthhiinnkk ssuucchh aa tthhiinngg..
SShhee nneeeeddss mmee ...... aanndd iitt iissnn''tt ......
((LLooookkss uupp wwiitthh aa
cchhiillddlliikkee pplleeaaddiinngg iinn
hhiiss eeyyeess))
......iitt iissnn''tt aass iiff sshhee wweerree aa
mmaanniiaacc,, aa rraavviinngg tthhiinngg ...... iitt''ss
jjuusstt tthhaatt ...... ssoommeettiimmeess sshhee ggooeess aa
lliittttllee mmaadd.. WWee aallll ggoo aa lliittttllee mmaadd
ssoommeettiimmeess.. HHaavveenn''tt yyoouu??
MMAARRYY
((AAfftteerr aa lloonngg
tthhoouugghhttffuull ppaauussee))
YYeess,, aanndd jjuusstt oonnee ttiimmee ccaann bbee
eennoouugghh..
((RRiisseess))
TThhaannkk yyoouu..
NNOORRMMAANN
((CChheeeerrffuullllyy,,
ccoorrrreeccttiinngg))
TThhaannkk yyoouu,, NNoorrmmaann..
MMAARRYY
NNoorrmmaann..
NNOORRMMAANN
YYoouu''rree nnoott ggooiinngg ttoo ...... ttoo yyoouurr
rroooomm aallrreeaaddyy??
MMAARRYY
II''mm vveerryy ttiirreedd.. AAnndd II''llll hhaavvee aa
lloonngg ddrriivvee ttoommoorrrrooww.. AAllll tthhee wwaayy
bbaacckk ttoo PPhhooeenniixx..
NNOORRMMAANN
PPhhooeenniixx??
MMAARRYY
II sstteeppppeedd iinnttoo aa pprriivvaattee ttrraapp bbaacckk
tthheerree ---- aanndd II wwaanntt ttoo ggoo bbaacckk aanndd
...... ttrryy ttoo ppuullll mmyysseellff oouutt..
((LLooookkiinngg cclloossee aatt
NNoorrmmaann))
BBeeffoorree iitt''ss ttoooo llaattee ffoorr mmee,, ttoooo..
NNOORRMMAANN
((LLooookkiinngg aatt hheerr))
WWhhyy ddoonn''tt yyoouu ssttaayy aa lliittttllee wwhhiillee,,
jjuusstt ffoorr ttaallkkiinngg..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4488..
MMAARRYY
II''dd lliikkee ttoo,, bbuutt ......
NNOORRMMAANN
AAllrriigghhtt.. II''llll sseeee yyoouu iinn tthhee
mmoorrnniinngg.. II''llll bbrriinngg yyoouu bbrreeaakkffaasstt..
WWhhaatt ttiimmee wwiillll yyoouu ........
MMAARRYY
VVeerryy eeaarrllyy.. DDaawwnn..
NNOORRMMAANN
AAllrriigghhtt,, MMiissss......
((HHee hhaass ffoorrggootttteenn hheerr
nnaammee))
MMAARRYY
CCrraannee..
NNOORRMMAANN
TThhaatt''ss iitt..
((HHee ffrroowwnnss,, aass iiff
bbootthheerreedd bbyy nnoott bbeeiinngg
aabbllee ttoo mmaattcchh tthhee
nnaammee ttoo tthhee mmeemmoorryy ooff
tthhee nnaammee iinn tthhee
rreeggiissttrraattiioonn bbooookk))
MMAARRYY
GGoooodd nniigghhtt..
SShhee ggooeess oouutt ooff tthhee ppaarrlloorr.. WWee sseeee hheerr,, ffrroomm NNoorrmmaann''ss
vviieewwppooiinntt,, aass sshhee ccrroosssseess tthhee ssmmaallll ooffffiiccee,, ggooeess oouutt
iinnttoo tthhee nniigghhtt.. NNoorrmmaann ttuurrnnss aanndd llooookkss aatt tthhee ttaabbllee,,
aanndd wwee sseeee hhiiss ffaaccee nnooww.. IItt iiss bbrriigghhtt wwiitthh tthhaatt ddrruunnkkeenn--
lliikkee llooookk ooff ddeetteerrmmiinnaattiioonn aanndd eennccoouurraaggeemmeenntt aanndd
rreessoollvvee.. HHee ssttaarrttss ttoo cclleeaann uupp tthhee ttaabbllee,, ppaauusseess aass hhee
hheeaarrss tthhee cclloossiinngg ooff MMaarryy''ss ddoooorr iinn tthhee ccaabbiinn nneexxtt ddoooorr..
HHee hhoollddss ssttiillll,, lliisstteennss.. HHee ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee aanndd
llooookkss aatt tthhee bbooookk..
CC..UU.. -- TTHHEE NNAAMMEE ""SSAAMMUUEELLSS""
MM..SS.. -- NNOORRMMAANN
HHee ggooeess bbaacckk iinnttoo tthhee ppaarrlloorr wwiitthh aa mmyyssttiiffiieedd
eexxpprreessssiioonn.. TThhee ssoouunndd ooff MMaarryy mmoovviinngg aabboouutt hheerr rroooomm
ccoommee oovveerr,, ssoofftt SSOOUUNNDDSS,, ssoommeehhooww iinnttiimmaattee iinn tthhee nniigghhtt
qquuiieett.. NNoorrmmaann ttuurrnnss hhiiss eeaarr ffrroomm tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee
SSOOUUNNDDSS,, sseeeemmss ttoo bbee ffiigghhttiinngg aann iimmppuullssee ttoo lliisstteenn,, oorr
mmoorree tthhaann lliisstteenn..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 4499..
BBuutt sslloowwllyy,, hhee iiss ffoorrcceedd ttoo ssuurrrreennddeerr ttoo tthhee iimmppuullssee
aanndd,, rreessiissttiinngg hhiimmsseellff,, hhee ggooeess ttoo tthhee wwaallll,, pprreesssseess tthhee
ssiiddee ooff hhiiss hheeaadd aaggaaiinnsstt iitt.. TThhee SSOOUUNNDDSS ccoommee lloouuddeerr,, aass
iiff wwee ttoooo hhaadd oouurr eeaarr pprreesssseedd aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee wwaallll.. NNooww
NNoorrmmaann llooookkss aatt aa ppiiccttuurree hhaannggiinngg oonn tthhee ffaarr eenndd ooff tthhee
wwaallll hhee iiss lleeaanniinngg aaggaaiinnsstt.. SSlloowwllyy hhee ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd iitt..
HHee rreeaacchheess iitt,, ttoouucchheess iitt,, rreelluuccttaannttllyy lliiffttss tthhee ssmmaallll
ffrraammee ooffff tthhee wwaallll..
AA ttiinnyy cciirrccllee ooff lliigghhtt hhiittss NNoorrmmaann''ss ffaaccee,, ccoommiinngg ffrroomm
tthhee hhoollee iinn tthhee wwaallll bbeehhiinndd tthhee ppiiccttuurree.. TThhiiss eenndd ooff
tthhee rroooomm iiss vveerryy ddiimm aanndd tthhuuss wwee aarree aabbllee ttoo sseeee cclleeaarrllyy
tthhee lliigghhtt ssttrriikkiinngg NNoorrmmaann''ss ffaaccee..
WWee mmoovvee cclloossee ttoo NNoorrmmaann,, eexxttrreemmeellyy cclloossee,, uunnttiill hhiiss
pprrooffiillee ffiillllss tthhee ssccrreeeenn.. TThhee ttiinnyy ssppoott ooff lliigghhtt hhiittss
hhiiss eeyyee.. SSeeee tthhee ssmmaallll hhoollee tthhrroouugghh wwhhiicchh tthhee lliigghhtt
ccoommeess.. NNoorrmmaann ppeeeeppss tthhrroouugghh..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT
TThhrroouugghh tthhee hhoollee wwee llooookk iinnttoo MMaarryy''ss ccaabbiinn,, sseeee MMaarryy
uunnddrreessssiinngg.. SShhee iiss iinn hheerr bbrraa aanndd hhaallffsslliipp.. SShhee ssttooooppss
oovveerr aa bbiitt,, ppllaacceess hheerr hhaannddss bbeehhiinndd hheerr uuppppeerr bbaacckk,,
bbeeggiinnss ttoo uunnhhooookk hheerr bbrraa..
NNOORRMMAANN -- EECCUU
HHee wwaattcchheess aass MMaarryy rreemmoovveess hheerr bbrraa.. WWee sseeee hhiiss eeyyee rruunn
uupp aanndd ddoowwnn tthhee uunnsseeeenn ffiigguurree ooff MMaarryy..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT
MMaarryy,, jjuusstt sslliippppiinngg iinnttoo aa rroobbee,, ccoovveerriinngg hheerr ccoommpplleettee
nnuuddiittyy..
NNOORRMMAANN
HHee ttuurrnnss ffrroomm tthhee hhoollee,, ffaacceess uuss ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, ccoonnttiinnuueess
ttuurrnniinngg uunnttiill hhee ccaann llooookk oouutt tthhee ssmmaallll ppaarrlloorr wwiinnddooww..
WWee sseeee,, aass hhee sseeeess ......
TTHHEE HHOOUUSSEE IINN TTHHEE BBAACCKKGGRROOUUNNDD
NNOORRMMAANN
HHee ttuurrnnss hhiiss ffaaccee aawwaayy,, qquuiicckkllyy,, rreesseennttffuullllyy.. IInn hhiiss
ffaaccee wwee sseeee aannggeerr aanndd aanngguuiisshh.. AAnndd tthheenn rreessoollvvee..
QQuuiicckkllyy,, pprreecciisseellyy,, hhee rreehhaannggss tthhee ppiiccttuurree oovveerr tthhee hhoollee
iinn tthhee wwaallll,, ttuurrnnss,, ssttaarrttss oouutt ooff tthhee ppaarrlloorr.. WWee sseeee
hhiimm ggoo tthhrroouugghh tthhee ooffffiiccee aanndd oouutt oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh,, nnoott
eevveenn bbootthheerriinngg ttoo cclloossee tthhee ddoooorr bbeehhiinndd hhiimm..
CCUUTT TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5500..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE PPOORRCCHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann wwaallkkiinngg aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh,, iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee
bbiigg hhoouussee.. OOnnccee oonn tthhee ppaatthh hhee ppaauusseess,, llooookkss uupp aatt tthhee
lliigghhtt iinn tthhee bbeeddrroooomm wwiinnddooww,, tthheenn ppuullllss hhiimmsseellff uupp,,
ssqquuaarreess hhiiss sshhoouullddeerrss,, ssttrriiddeess mmaannffuullllyy uupp tthhee ppaatthh..
CCAAMMEERRAA ffoolllloowwss bbeehhiinndd hhiimm.. HHee ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr ooff tthhee
hhoouussee,, eenntteerrss.. WWee sseeee hhiimm ppaauussee aatt tthhee ffoooott ooff tthhee
ssttaaiirrwwaayy,, llooookk uupp aatt tthhee bbeeddrroooomm ddoooorr jjuusstt aatt tthhee hheeaadd
ooff tthhee ssttaaiirr.. HHee hhoollddss ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, aanndd tthheenn hhiiss
rreessoollvvee aanndd ccoouurraaggee eevvaappoorraatteess.. HHiiss sshhoouullddeerrss sslluummpp,,
ssaaddllyy,, mmoouurrnnffuullllyy.. HHee bbyy--ppaasssseess tthhee ssttaaiirrss aanndd sslloowwllyy
mmaakkeess hhiiss wwaayy ttoo tthhee kkiittcchheenn.. AAtt tthhee ffaarr eenndd ooff tthhee
hhaallll.. HHee eenntteerrss tthhee kkiittcchheenn,, ddrrooppss wweeaarriillyy iinnttoo aa
cchhaaiirr.. AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, hhee ssttrreettcchheess oouutt aa lleegg aanndd
ggeennttllyy ppuusshheess tthhee kkiittcchheenn ddoooorr cclloosseedd..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS MMOOTTEELL RROOOOMM -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
MMaarryy iiss sseeaatteedd aatt tthhee ssmmaallll ddeesskk,, eennggrroosssseedd iinn ffiigguurriinngg
iinn aa ssmmaallll nnootteebbooookk.. WWee sseeee ffrroomm tthheessee ffiigguurreess aa
ccaallccuullaattiioonn wwhhiicchh iinnddiiccaatteess hheerr iinntteennttiioonn ttoo mmaakkee aa
rreessttiittuuttiioonn ooff tthhee mmoonneeyy sshhee hhaass uusseedd ooff tthhee ffoorrttyy
tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss.. WWee sseeee,, ttoooo,, hheerr bbaannkkbbooookk.. TThhee ppaappeerr
rreeaaddss tthhuuss:: ttoopp ffiigguurree,, 4400,,000000;; ddiirreeccttllyy bbeenneeaatthh iitt 550000,,
tthhee aammoouunntt uusseedd ffoorr tthhee nneeww ccaarr;; ttoottaall aafftteerr
ssuubbttrraaccttiioonn,, 3399,,550000.. IInn aannootthheerr ssppoott wwee sseeee aa ffiigguurree
wwhhiicchh mmaattcchheess tthhee bbaallaannccee iinn hheerr bbaannkkbbooookk;; 662244..0000..
BBeenneeaatthh tthhiiss iiss tthhee ffiigguurree 550000,, aanndd tthhee aammoouunntt aafftteerr
ssuubbttrraaccttiioonn,, 112244..0000.. SShhee ssttuuddiieess tthhee ffiigguurreess,, ssiigghhss,,
nnoott wweeaarriillyy bbuutt wwiitthh aa cceerrttaaiinn ssaattiissffaaccttiioonn,, wwiitthh tthhee
pplleeaassuurree tthhaatt ccoommeess wwhheenn oonnee kknnoowwss tthhaatt aatt aannyy ccoosstt oonnee
iiss ggooiinngg ttoo ccoonnttiinnuuee ddooiinngg tthhee rriigghhtt tthhiinngg.. AAfftteerr aa
mmoommeenntt sshhee tteeaarrss tthhee ppaaggee oouutt ooff tthhee nnootteebbooookk aanndd,,
rriissiinngg,, bbeeggiinnss ttoo rriipp iitt iinnttoo ssmmaallll ppiieecceess.. SShhee ggooeess
iinnttoo tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, ddrrooppss tthhee ppiieecceess iinnttoo tthhee ttooiilleett
bboowwll,, fflluusshheess tthhee ttooiilleett.. TThheenn sshhee ddrrooppss hheerr rroobbee aanndd
sstteeppss iinnttoo tthhee ttuubb aanndd ttuurrnnss tthhee sshhoowweerr oonn..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY IINN SSHHOOWWEERR
OOvveerr tthhee bbaarr oonn wwhhiicchh hhaannggss tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn,, wwee ccaann
sseeee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr,, nnoott eennttiirreellyy cclloosseedd.. FFoorr aa
mmoommeenntt wwee wwaattcchh MMaarryy aass sshhee wwaasshheess aanndd ssooaappss hheerrsseellff..
TThheerree iiss ssttiillll aa ssmmaallll wwoorrrryy iinn hheerr eeyyeess,, bbuutt ggeenneerraallllyy
sshhee llooookkss ssoommeewwhhaatt rreelliieevveedd..
NNooww wwee sseeee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr bbeeiinngg ppuusshheedd sslloowwllyy ooppeenn..
TThhee nnooiissee ooff tthhee sshhoowweerr ddrroowwnnss oouutt aannyy ssoouunndd.. TThhee ddoooorr
iiss tthheenn sslloowwllyy aanndd ccaarreeffuullllyy cclloosseedd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5511..
AAnndd wwee sseeee tthhee sshhaaddooww ooff aa wwoommaann ffaallll aaccrroossss tthhee sshhoowweerr
ccuurrttaaiinn.. MMaarryy''ss bbaacckk iiss ttuurrnneedd ttoo tthhee ccuurrttaaiinn.. TThhee
wwhhiittee bbrriigghhttnneessss ooff tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm iiss aallmmoosstt bblliinnddiinngg..
SSuuddddeennllyy wwee sseeee tthhee hhaanndd rreeaacchh uupp,, ggrraasspp tthhee sshhoowweerr
ccuurrttaaiinn,, rriipp iitt aassiiddee..
CCUUTT TTOO::
MMAARRYY -- EECCUU
AAss sshhee ttuurrnnss iinn rreessppoonnssee ttoo tthhee ffeeeell aanndd SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee
sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn bbeeiinngg ttoorrnn aassiiddee.. AA llooookk ooff ppuurree hhoorrrroorr
eerruuppttss iinn hheerr ffaaccee.. AA llooww tteerrrriibbllee ggrrooaann bbeeggiinnss ttoo rriissee
uupp oouutt ooff hheerr tthhrrooaatt.. AA hhaanndd ccoommeess iinnttoo tthhee sshhoott..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY IINN SSHHOOWWEERR
OOvveerr tthhee bbaarr oonn wwhhiicchh hhaannggss tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn,, wwee ccaann
sseeee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr,, nnoott eennttiirreellyy cclloosseedd.. FFoorr aa
mmoommeenntt wwee wwaattcchh MMaarryy aass sshhee wwaasshheess aanndd ssooaappss hheerrsseellff..
TThheerree iiss ssttiillll aa ssmmaallll wwoorrrryy iinn hheerr eeyyeess,, bbuutt ggeenneerraallllyy
sshhee llooookkss ssoommeewwhhaatt rreelliieevveedd..
NNooww wwee sseeee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr bbeeiinngg ppuusshheedd sslloowwllyy ooppeenn..
TThhee nnooiissee ooff tthhee sshhoowweerr ddrroowwnnss oouutt aannyy ssoouunndd.. TThhee ddoooorr
iiss tthheenn sslloowwllyy aanndd ccaarreeffuullllyy cclloosseedd.. AAnndd wwee sseeee tthhee
sshhaaddooww ooff aa wwoommaann ffaallll aaccrroossss tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn..
MMaarryy''ss bbaacckk iiss ttuurrnneedd ttoo tthhee ccuurrttaaiinn.. TThhee wwhhiittee
bbrriigghhttnneessss ooff tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm iiss aallmmoosstt bblliinnddiinngg.. SSuuddddeennllyy
wwee sseeee tthhee hhaanndd rreeaacchh uupp,, ggrraasspp tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn,, rriipp
iitt aassiiddee..
CCIITT TTOO::
MMAARRYY -- EECCUU
AAss sshhee ttuurrnnss iinn rreessppoonnssee ttoo tthhee ffeeeell aanndd SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee
sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn bbeeiinngg ttoorrnn aassiiddee.. AA llooookk ooff ppuurree hhoorrrroorr
eerruuppttss iinn hheerr ffaaccee.. AA llooww tteerrrriibbllee ggrrooaann bbeeggiinnss ttoo rriissee
uupp oouutt ooff hheerr tthhrrooaatt.. AA hhaanndd ccoommeess iinnttoo tthhee sshhoott.. TThhee
hhaanndd hhoollddss aann eennoorrmmoouuss bbrreeaadd kknniiffee.. TThhee fflliinntt ooff tthhee
bbllaaddee sshhaatttteerrss tthhee ssccrreeeenn ttoo aann aallmmoosstt ttoottaall,, ssiillvveerr
bbllaannkknneessss..
TTHHEE SSLLAASSHHIINNGG
AAnn iimmpprreessssiioonn ooff aa kknniiffee ssllaasshhiinngg,, aass iiff tteeaarriinngg aatt tthhee
vveerryy ssccrreeeenn,, rriippppiinngg tthhee ffiillmm.. OOvveerr iitt tthhee bbrriieeff gguullppss
ooff ssccrreeaammiinngg.. AAnndd tthheenn ssiilleennccee.. AAnndd tthheenn tthhee ddrreeaaddffuull
tthhuummpp aass MMaarryy''ss bbooddyy ffaallllss iinn tthhee ttuubb..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5522..
RREEVVEERRSSEE AANNGGLLEE
TThhee bbllaannkk wwhhiitteenneessss,, tthhee bblluurr ooff tthhee sshhoowweerr wwaatteerr,, tthhee
hhaanndd ppuulllliinngg tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn bbaacckk.. WWee ccaattcchh oonnee
fflliicckkeerr ooff aa gglliimmppssee ooff tthhee mmuurrddeerreerr.. AA wwoommaann,, hheerr ffaaccee
ccoonnttoorrtteedd wwiitthh mmaaddnneessss,, hheerr hheeaadd wwiilldd wwiitthh hhaaiirr,, aass iiff
sshhee wweerree wweeaarriinngg aa ffrriigghhtt--wwiigg.. AAnndd tthheenn wwee sseeee oonnllyy tthhee
ccuurrttaaiinn,, cclloosseedd aaccrroossss tthhee ttuubb,, aanndd hheeaarr tthhee rruusshh ooff tthhee
sshhoowweerr wwaatteerr.. AAbboovvee tthhee sshhoowweerr--bbaarr wwee sseeee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm
ddoooorr ooppeenn aaggaaiinn aanndd aafftteerr aa mmoommeenntt wwee HHEEAARR tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff
tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr ssllaammmmiinngg..
CCUUTT TTOO::
TTHHEE DDEEAADD BBOODDYY
LLyyiinngg hhaallff iinn,, hhaallff oouutt ooff tthhee ttuubb,, tthhee hheeaadd ttuummbblleedd
oovveerr,, ttoouucchhiinngg tthhee fflloooorr,, tthhee hhaaiirr wweett,, oonnee eeyyee wwiiddee
ooppeenn aass iiff ppooppppeedd,, oonnee aarrmm llyyiinngg lliimmpp aanndd wweett aalloonngg tthhee
ttiillee fflloooorr.. CCoommiinngg ddoowwnn tthhee ssiiddee ooff tthhee ttuubb,, rruunnnniinngg
tthhiicckk aanndd ddaarrkk aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcceellaaiinn,, wwee sseeee mmaannyy ssmmaallll
tthhrreeaaddss ooff bblloooodd.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS aawwaayy ffrroomm tthhee bbooddyy,,
ttrraavveellss sslloowwllyy aaccrroossss tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, ppaasstt tthhee ttooiilleett,, oouutt
iinnttoo tthhee bbeeddrroooomm.. AAss CCAAMMEERRAA aapppprrooaacchheess tthhee bbeedd,, wwee sseeee
tthhee ffoollddeedd nneewwssppaappeerr aass MMaarryy ppllaacceedd iitt oonn tthhee bbeeddssiiddee
ttaabbllee..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- TTHHEE NNEEWWSSPPAAPPEERR
bbeessiiddee tthhee bbeedd.. TThhee CCAAMMEERRAA nnooww mmoovveess aawwaayy oovveerr ttoo tthhee
wwiinnddooww aanndd llooookkss uupp ttoo tthhee hhoouussee,, aanndd aass iitt ggeettss tthheerree
wwee HHEEAARR,, ccoommiinngg ffrroomm wwiitthhiinn tthhee hhoouussee,, tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff
NNoorrmmaann''ss ffeeaarrffuull,, sshhoocckkeedd vvooiiccee..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
MMootthheerr!! OOhh GGoodd,, wwhhaatt ...... bblloooodd,,
bblloooodd ...... mmootthheerr ......!!
WWee ccaannnnoott eennttiirreellyy ddiissttiinngguuiisshh tthheessee eexxccllaammaattiioonnss..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt oorr ttwwoo ooff ssiilleennccee,, NNoorrmmaann eemmeerrggeess ffrroomm
tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr,, ddaasshheess ddoowwnn tthhee ppaatthh ttoowwaarrdd tthhee mmootteell..
QQUUIICCKK CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE PPAATTHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann iiss ccoommiinngg AATT CCAAMMEERRAA,, rruunnnniinngg hheeaadd--oonn.. HHee ddaasshheess
iinnttoo aann eexxttrreemmee cclloossee uupp aanndd wwee sseeee tthhee tteerrrroorr aanndd ffeeaarr
rriippee iinn hhiiss ffaaccee.. CCAAMMEERRAA PPAANNSS aass NNoorrmmaann rraacceess ppaasstt,,
hhoollddss aass NNoorrmmaann rruunnss ttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh aanndd qquuiicckkllyy aalloonngg iitt
aanndd ddiirreeccttllyy ttoo MMaarryy''ss rroooomm..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5533..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS CCAABBIINN -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann ppaauusseess aa mmoommeenntt iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy,, ggllaanncceess aabboouutt tthhee
rroooomm,, hheeaarrss tthhee sshhoowweerr ggooiinngg,, sseeeess tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr iiss
ooppeenn.. HHee ggooeess ttoo tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, llooookkss iinn,, sseeeess tthhee bbooddyy..
SSlloowwllyy,, aallmmoosstt ccaarreeffuullllyy,, hhee rraaiisseess hhiiss hhaannddss ttoo hhiiss
ffaaccee,, ccoovveerrss hhiiss eeyyeess,, ttuurrnnss hhiiss ffaaccee aawwaayy.. TThheenn hhee
ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee wwiinnddooww,, llooookkss oouutt aatt tthhee hhoouussee.. SShhoott iiss
ssoo aanngglleedd tthhaatt wwee sseeee tthhee bbeeddssiiddee ttaabbllee wwiitthh tthhee
nneewwssppaappeerr oonn iitt..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, NNoorrmmaann mmoovveess ffrroomm tthhee wwiinnddooww,, ssiinnkkss oonnttoo
tthhee eeddggee ooff tthhee bbeedd..
FFRREESSHH AANNGGLLEE -- BBEEHHIINNDD NNOORRMMAANN
NNoorrmmaann ssiittttiinngg oonn bbeedd,, tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm iinn bb..gg.. ooff sshhoott.. WWee
ccaann sseeee oonnllyy tthhee hhaanndd ooff tthhee ddeeaadd ggiirrll,, llyyiinngg aalloonngg tthhee
ttiillee fflloooorr.. NNoorrmmaann pprreesssseess hhiiss eeyyeess,, ffiigghhttss ttoo ffiinndd aa
wwaayy oouutt ooff hhiiss ddiilleemmmmaa.. SSlloowwllyy,, aa kkiinndd ooff sseettttlliinngg
ccoommeess uuppoonn hhiimm,, tthhee ppeeaaccee tthhaatt ccoommeess wwiitthh ddeecciissiioonn..
NNoorrmmaann rriisseess,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee wwiinnddooww,, llooookkss oouutt,, aanndd tthheenn,,
wwiitthh rreessoolluuttiioonn,, cclloosseess tthhee wwiinnddooww aanndd ddrraawwss tthhee ccuurrttaaiinn
aaccrroossss iitt.. TThheenn hhee ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ffrroonntt wwiinnddooww,, ffaacciinngg
tthhee ppoorrcchh,, aanndd ddrraawwss tthhoossee ccuurrttaaiinnss cclloosseedd.. TThheenn hhee
sswwiittcchheess ooffff tthhee bbeeddrroooomm lliigghhtt,, lleeaavviinngg tthhee rroooomm lliitt
oonnllyy bbyy tthhee ssppiillll ffrroomm tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm.. HHee ooppeennss tthhee ffrroonntt
ddoooorr,, ggooeess oouutt..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE HHOOTTEELL PPOORRCCHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess oouutt ooff MMaarryy''ss ccaabbiinn,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr
ccaarreeffuullllyy bbeehhiinndd hhiimm,, ggooeess aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh ttoo hhiiss
ooffffiiccee,, ggooeess iinn.. WWee ssttaayy oouuttssiiddee.. IImmmmeeddiiaatteellyy,, tthhee
""VVaaccaannccyy"" ssiiggnn ggooeess ooffff,, aanndd tthheenn tthhee mmootteell ssiiggnn ggooeess
ooffff.. AAss CCAAMMEERRAA GGOOEESS cclloosseerr ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee,, tthhee lliigghhttss
wwiitthhiinn ggoo ooffff aanndd wwee HHEEAARR aa cclloosseett ddoooorr ooppeenniinngg aanndd tthheenn
tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff aa ppaaiill bbeeiinngg ppiicckkeedd uupp.. NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess oouutt
ooff ooffffiiccee,, cclloosseess ddoooorr,, llooookkss ccaauuttiioouussllyy aabboouutt,, ggooeess
aalloonngg ppoorrcchh,, ccaarrrryyiinngg ppaaiill wwiitthh mmoopp iinn iitt,, ggooeess iinnttoo
MMaarryy''ss ccaabbiinn,, cclloossiinngg tthhee ddoooorr aafftteerr hhiimm..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS CCAABBIINN
WWiitthh tthhee ppaappeerr iinn tthhee ffoorreeggrroouunndd,, NNoorrmmaann eenntteerrss.. WWee ccaann
sseeee hhiimm iinn tthhee ddiimm ssppiillll ooff lliigghhtt.. HHee ppaauusseess bbyy tthhee
ddoooorr,, tthheenn ggaatthheerrss hhiiss ssttrreennggtthh aanndd ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee
bbaatthhrroooomm.. WWee HHEEAARR hhiimm sseett tthhee ppaaiill oonn tthhee ttiilleedd fflloooorr,,
aanndd tthheenn wwee HHEEAARR tthhee sshhoowweerr bbeeiinngg ttuurrnneedd ooffff.. AAnndd tthheerree
iiss ttoottaall ssiilleennccee.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS FFOORRWWAARRDD ssoo tthhaatt wwee ccaann
sseeee iinnttoo bbaatthhrroooomm..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5544..
CCAAMMEERRAA iiss AANNGGLLEEDD tthhaatt wwee sseeee NNoorrmmaann oonnllyy ffrroomm tthhee wwaaiisstt
uupp.. QQuuiicckkllyy aanndd ddeeffttllyy hhee uunnhhooookkss tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn,,
eemmeerrggeess wwiitthh iitt iinnttoo tthhee bbeeddrroooomm.. CCAAMMEERRAA PPAANNSS ddoowwnn aanndd
wwee sseeee hhiimm sspprreeaadd tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn oonn tthhee bbeeddrroooomm
fflloooorr,, jjuusstt oouuttssiiddee tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr.. HHee sspprreeaaddss tthhee
ccuurrttaaiinn ssoo tthhaatt oonnee eenndd ooff iitt ccoommeess uupp aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee
bbaatthhrroooomm tthhrreesshhoolldd aanndd sslliigghhttllyy oovveerr aanndd oonnttoo tthhee ttiillee
fflloooorr.. AAggaaiinn hhee ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm aanndd CCAAMMEERRAA TTIILLTTSS
uupp ssoo tthhaatt wwee sseeee oonnllyy tthhee uuppppeerr hhaallff ooff NNoorrmmaann.. HHee
wwoorrkkss ccaarreeffuullllyy,, wwiitthh hhiiss aarrmmss eexxtteennddeedd aawwaayy ffrroomm hhiiss
bbooddyy,, sslloowwllyy ppuullllss tthhee ddeeaadd bbooddyy oouutt ooff tthhee ttuubb,, ddrraaggss
iitt aaccrroossss tthhee ttiillee fflloooorr aanndd oonnttoo tthhee sspprreeaadd--oouutt sshhoowweerr
ccuurrttaaiinn iinn tthhee bbeeddrroooomm.. HHaavviinngg aarrrraannggeedd tthhee bbooddyy,, hhee
ssttrraaiigghhtteennss uupp,, eexxaammiinneess hhiiss hhaannddss,, sseeeess bbllooooddssttaaiinnss oonn
tthheemm.. HHee rreettuurrnnss ttoo tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee hhaanndd--
bbaassiinn..
CCLLOOSSEE SSHHOOTT
WWee sseeee hhiiss hhaannddss bbeeiinngg wwaasshheedd,, sseeee tthhee bbllooooddssttaaiinnss bbeeiinngg
ddiilluutteedd aanndd wwaasshheedd aawwaayy bbyy tthhee gguusshh ooff tthhee ffaauucceett wwaatteerr..
NNOORRMMAANN
WWee sseeee NNoorrmmaann sshhaakkee hhiiss hhaannddss ffrreeee ooff tthhee wwaatteerr,, tthheenn
ttuurrnn ttoo tthhee jjoobb ooff cclleeaanniinngg tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm..
HHee ppllaacceess tthhee ppaaiill iinn tthhee ttuubb,, rruunnss wwaatteerr iinnttoo iitt,, ddiippss
tthhee mmoopp iinn,, sswwaabbss tthhee ttiillee fflloooorr.. WWiitthh aa ttoowweell hhee wwiippeess
ooffff tthhee wwaallll oovveerr tthhee ttuubb aanndd tthhee eeddggeess aanndd ssiiddeess ooff tthhee
ttuubb aanndd eevveenn tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn rroodd.. TThheenn hhee ttaakkeess aa
sseeccoonndd ttoowweell aanndd ggooeess oovveerr tthhee cclleeaanneedd aarreeaass,, ccaarreeffuullllyy
ddrryyiinngg tthheemm.. FFiinnaallllyy hhee rriinnsseess aanndd ssqquueeeezzeess oouutt tthhee
mmoopp,, eemmppttiieess tthhee ppaaiill,, cclleeaannss oouutt tthhee ttuubb,, aanndd ggooeess oouutt
iinnttoo tthhee bbeeddrroooomm..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS BBEEDDRROOOOMM
NNoorrmmaann sstteeppss ccaarreeffuullllyy aarroouunndd tthhee uunnsseeeenn bbooddyy,, ccrroosssseess
ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, ssttaarrttss ggooiinngg tthhrroouugghh MMaarryy''ss hhaannddbbaagg,, iinn
sseeaarrcchh ooff hheerr ccaarr kkeeyyss.. HHee ssuuddddeennllyy nnoottiicceess tthheemm llyyiinngg
oonn tthhee ddeesskk,, wwhheerree hhee''dd tthhrroowwnn tthheemm aafftteerr ppaarrkkiinngg hheerr
ccaarr.. HHee ppiicckkss uupp tthhee kkeeyyss,, ccrroosssseess tthhee rroooomm,, ggooeess oouutt..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE PPOORRCCHH
WWee sseeee NNoorrmmaann ppaauusseess aatt tthhee ddoooorr,, cchheecckk ccaauuttiioouussllyy,, tthheenn
hhuurrrryy aaccrroossss tthhee ppoorrcchh aanndd iinnttoo MMaarryy''ss ccaarr.. HHee cciirrccllee--
ttuurrnnss tthhee ccaarr,, ssoo tthhaatt iittss ttrruunnkk iiss bbaacckkeedd uupp ttoo tthhee
ppoorrcchh,, ddiirreeccttllyy ooppppoossiittee MMaarryy''ss ddoooorr,, aass cclloossee aass iitt ccaann
ggoo..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5555..
TThheenn hhee aalliigghhttss,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee ttrruunnkk,, ooppeennss iitt wwiitthh tthhee
kkeeyy aanndd,, lleeaavviinngg tthhee ttrruunnkk lliidd rraaiisseedd,, ggooeess bbaacckk iinnttoo
tthhee ccaabbiinn..
IINNTT.. MMAARRYY''SS RROOOOMM
FFrroomm aa rraaiisseedd aannggllee,, wwee sseeee NNoorrmmaann bbeenndd ddoowwnn aanndd bbeeggiinn
ttoo wwrraapp tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn aarroouunndd tthhee bbooddyy.. WWee sseeee tthhee
eeddggeess ooff tthhee ccuurrttaaiinn aass tthheeyy aarree rraaiisseedd aanndd llaaiidd ddoowwnn
aaggaaiinn.. TThheenn hhee ppiicckkss uupp tthhee wwrraappppeedd bbooddyy,, ccrroosssseess ttoo
tthhee ddoooorr,, uusseess hhiiss ffoooott ttoo ppuullll tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn,, aanndd,,
lleeaavviinngg tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn bbeehhiinndd hhiimm,, ggooeess qquuiicckkllyy aaccrroossss
tthhee ppoorrcchh aanndd ggeennttllyy llaayyss tthhee bbooddyy iinn tthhee ttrruunnkk.. HHee
cclloosseess tthhee lliidd tthheenn,, bbuutt ddooeess nnoott lloocckk iitt.. HHee ccoommeess
bbaacckk iinnttoo tthhee ccaabbiinn,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr ccoommpplleetteellyy,, fflliicckkss
oonn tthhee lliigghhtt..
AAggaaiinn tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr iiss iinn tthhee ffoorreeggrroouunndd.. FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt
hhee ppaauusseess,, cclloosseess hhiiss eeyyeess aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee rreeaalliizzaattiioonn ooff
wwhhaatt hhee iiss ddooiinngg,, tthheenn qquuiicckkllyy ppuusshheess aallll tthhoouugghhttss aawwaayy,,
ccoonnttiinnuueess wwiitthh hhiiss wwoorrkk.. WWiitthh tthhee rroooomm lliigghhtteedd,, hhee nnooww
pprroocceeeeddss ttoo ggaatthheerr uupp aallll MMaarryy''ss aarrttiicclleess aanndd ttoossss tthheemm
iinnttoo tthhee ssuuiittccaassee.. HHee cchheecckkss aallll ddrraawweerrss aanndd tthhee
cclloosseett,, ggeettss ddoowwnn aanndd cchheecckkss uunnddeerr bbeedd aanndd bbuurreeaauu,, ggooeess
iinnttoo tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, cchheecckkss tthhaatt rroooomm aaggaaiinn,, ccoommeess bbaacckk
iinnttoo tthhee bbeeddrroooomm,, llooookkss aabboouutt ccaarreeffuullllyy,, ssppoottss MMaarryy''ss
hhaannddbbaagg,, tthhrroowwss eevveenn tthhaatt iinnttoo tthhee ssuuiittccaassee,, iiss ffiinnaallllyy
ssaattiissffiieedd tthhaatt aallll ttrraacceess ooff tthhee ggiirrll aarree ggoonnee ffrroomm tthhee
rroooomm.. TThheenn hhee cclloosseess MMaarryy''ss ssuuiittccaassee,, ppiicckkss iitt uupp..
WWiitthh hhiiss ffrreeee hhaanndd hhee ppiicckkss uupp tthhee ppaaiill,, iinn wwhhiicchh aarree
tthhee mmoopp aanndd tthhee uusseedd ttoowweellss.. HHee ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,,
sswwiittcchheess ooffff tthhee lliigghhtt wwiitthh hhiiss sshhoouullddeerr,, ppuullllss ooppeenn tthhee
ddoooorr,, ssttaarrttss oouutt..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE PPOORRCCHH
AAss NNoorrmmaann ssttaannddss iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy,, hhee iiss ssuuddddeennllyy aanndd
bblliinnddiinnggllyy lliitt bbyy tthhee bbrriigghhtt hheeaaddlliigghhttss ooff aa ppaassssiinngg
ccaarr.. TThhee ffllaasshh ooff tthhee lliigghhttss aanndd tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee
SSPPEEEEDDIINNGG CCAARR aarree oovveerr iinn aa fflliicckkeerr ooff aa mmoommeenntt,, bbuutt iitt
ttaakkeess aa ffeeww sseeccoonnddss ffoorr NNoorrmmaann ttoo rreeggaaiinn hhiiss ffoorrmmeerr
tteennssee ccoommppoossuurree.. TThheenn hhee ggooeess ttoo tthhee ccaarr ttrruunnkk,, rraaiisseess
iitt wwiitthh hhiiss ffoooott,, tthhrroowwss tthhee ssuuiittccaassee aanndd tthhee ppaaiill iinnttoo
iitt,, ssllaammss iitt sshhuutt.. HHee ppaauusseess aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn rreeaalliizzeess hhee
hhaass lleefftt tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm lliigghhtt oonn iinn MMaarryy''ss ccaabbiinn.. HHee
rreettuurrnnss ttoo ccaabbiinn.. AAss hhee eenntteerrss,, hhiiss eeyyee iiss ccaauugghhtt bbyy
tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr oonn tthhee bbeeddssiiddee ttaabbllee.. HHee ggooeess ttoo iitt,,
ttaakkeess tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr,, aanndd llooookkss oonnccee aaggaaiinn iinnttoo tthhee
bbaatthhrroooomm.. HHiiss ggllaannccee ggooeess rriigghhtt oovveerr tthhee ttooiilleett bboowwll..
HHee ttuurrnnss oouutt tthhee lliigghhttss,, ccrroosssseess tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd ccaabbiinn,,
ggooeess oouutt oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5566..
HHee rreeooppeennss tthhee ttrruunnkk,, ttoosssseess iinn tthhee nneewwssppaappeerr aanndd cclloosseess
iitt.. HHee ggooeess aarroouunndd aanndd jjuummppss iinnttoo tthhee ccaarr aanndd ssttaarrttss
aawwaayy..
WWee HHOOLLDD oonn tthhee ttrruunnkk,, ffoollllooww iitt ffoorr aa wwhhiillee,, tthheenn
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE SSWWAAMMPP -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee ccaarr ppuullllss aawwaayy ffrroomm aa CCLLOOSSEE AANNGGLLEE oonn tthhee ttrruunnkk aanndd
aass CCAAMMEERRAA HHOOLLDDSS wwee sseeee tthhaatt wwee aarree nnooww iinn aa sswwaammpp aarreeaa..
IItt iiss qquuiieett eexxcceepptt ffoorr tthhee iirrrriittaattiinngg nnooiisseess ooff nniigghhtt
iinnsseeccttss.. NNoorrmmaann ssttooppss tthhee ccaarr aatt tthhee vveerryy eeddggee ooff tthhee
sswwaammpp,, ttuurrnnss ooffff tthhee lliigghhttss,, ggeettss oouutt,, lleeaavviinngg ddoooorr
ooppeenn.. HHee llooookkss aatt tthhee sswwaammpp,, sseeeemmss ddoouubbttffuull ooff iittss
aabbiilliittyy ttoo sswwaallllooww uupp tthhee ccaarr,, rreeaalliizzeess hhee hhaass nnoo
cchhooiiccee.. HHee lleeaannss iinnttoo tthhee ccaarr,, rreelleeaasseess tthhee eemmeerrggeennccyy
bbrraakkee,, ssttaarrttss ttoo ppuusshh.. TThhee ffrroonntt ooff tthhee ccaarr bbeeggiinnss ttoo
rroollll iinnttoo tthhee sswwaammpp.. SSuuddddeennllyy tthheerree iiss tthhee LLOOWW,,
TTHHRROOBBBBIINNGG SSOOUUNNDD ooff aa mmoottoorr.. NNoorrmmaann ffrreeeezzeess,, lliisstteennss..
TThhee SSOOUUNNDD ggrroowwss lloouuddeerr aanndd NNoorrmmaann rreeaalliizzeess iitt iiss aann
aaiirrppllaannee ffllyyiinngg oovveerrhheeaadd.. TThhee ccaarr iiss rroolllliinngg qquuiicckkllyy
nnooww.. NNoorrmmaann jjuummppss aawwaayy,, ssllaammss tthhee ddoooorr sshhuutt,, ssttaannddss
tteennssee.. TThhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee ppllaannee oovveerrhheeaadd ggrroowwss lloouuddeerr..
NNoorrmmaann llooookkss uupp..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- TTHHEE BBLLAACCKK SSKKYY
WWee sseeee nnoo ppllaannee.. TThhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee mmoottoorr iiss bbeeggiinnnniinngg ttoo
ddiimmiinniisshh..
CCUUTT BBAACCKK TTOO::
NNOORRMMAANN
WWee sseeee tthhee rreelliieeff iinn hhiiss ffaaccee.. HHee llooookkss aatt tthhee ccaarr..
MMoorree tthhaann ttwwoo--tthhiirrddss ooff iitt hhaavvee aallrreeaaddyy ssuunnkk iinnttoo tthhee
sswwaammpp.. TThhee ttrruunnkk aalloonnee sseeeemmss ttoo hhoolldd ppooiisseedd aabboovvee tthhee
ssaanndd aanndd sslliimmee,, aass iiff rreeffuussiinngg ttoo ggoo tthhee rreesstt ooff tthhee
wwaayy.. NNoorrmmaann bbeeggiinnss ttoo ppaanniicc,, hhee sstteeppss ddaannggeerroouussllyy
cclloossee,, ppuusshheess wwiitthh hhiiss ffoooott.. AAnndd sslloowwllyy tthhee ccaarr ssiinnkkss,,
uunnttiill ffiinnaallllyy iitt iiss ggoonnee aanndd wwee hheeaarr oonnllyy tthhee ggeennttllee
pplloopp ooff tthhee sswwaammpp''ss ffiinnaall gguullpp,, aanndd sseeee oonnllyy tthhee ssmmaallll
aafftteerr--bbuubbbbllee,, lliikkee aa vviissuuaall bbuurrpp..
NNoorrmmaann wwaaiittss aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn bbeeggiinnss ssttaammppiinngg oouutt tthhee ttiirree
mmaarrkkss,, ssoo oobbvviioouuss iinn tthhee wweett ggrroouunndd aarroouunndd tthhee sswwaammpp..
HHee ssttaammppss aanndd ddrraaggss hhiiss ffeeeett oovveerr tthhee mmaarrkkiinnggss aass wwee::
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5577..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP NNOORRMMAANN
ssttaannddiinngg oonn tthhee ppoorrcchh ooff tthhee mmootteell,, lleeaanniinngg aaggaaiinnsstt aa
ppoosstt.. HHee iiss ssttaarriinngg oouutt iinnttoo tthhee nniigghhtt,, aa llooookk ooff
gguuaarrddeedd,, ccaassuuaall iinnnnoocceennccee oonn hhiiss ffaaccee,, aass iiff hhee wweerree
ttaakkiinngg oonnee llaasstt mmoommeenntt ooff ppeeaacceeffuull nniigghhtt aaiirr bbeeffoorree
rreettiirriinngg.. TThheenn hhee ggllaanncceess ddoowwnn aanndd CCAAMMEERRAA ffoolllloowwss hhiiss
ggaazzee.. AA hhoossee iiss llyyiinngg oonn tthhee ggrroouunndd oouuttssiiddee MMaarryy''ss
ccaabbiinn,, iittss ssttrreeaamm ooff wwaatteerr oobblliitteerraattiinngg tthhee ttiirree mmaarrkkss..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, NNoorrmmaann''ss hhaanndd ccoommeess iinnttoo sshhoott,, ppiicckkss uupp
hhoossee,, ppllaacceess iitt iinn aa nneeww ppoossiittiioonn.. AAss CCAAMMEERRAA PPUULLLLSS
BBAACCKK,, wwee sseeee tthhaatt tthhee wwaatteerr ffrroomm tthhee hhoossee hhaass eerraasseedd aanndd
rreeaarrrraannggeedd tthhee rrooaadd mmaarrkkiinnggss ssoo tthhaatt iitt wwoouulldd bbee
iimmppoossssiibbllee ttoo tteellll tthhaatt aa ccaarr hhaadd bbeeeenn ppaarrkkeedd hheerree..
AAfftteerr aa sshhoorrtt wwaaiitt,, NNoorrmmaann ggooeess ttoo tthhee hhoossee--ffaauucceett,,
ttuurrnnss iitt ooffff,, uunnssccrreewwss tthhee hhoossee.. AAss hhee rroollllss tthhee hhoossee,,
hhee wwaallkkss aawwaayy ffrroomm tthhee ssppoott,, ppaasstt tthhee ooffffiiccee,, hheeaaddiinngg
ffoorr tthhee ppaatthh tthhaatt lleeaaddss ttoo tthhee hhoouussee.. HHee ggooeess uupp tthhee
ppaatthh,, ppaauusseess aatt tthhee sstteeppss ooff tthhee hhoouussee,, ttoosssseess tthhee
ccuurrlleedd hhoossee oonnttoo tthhee llaawwnn,, ggooeess uupp tthhee sstteeppss aanndd iinnttoo
tthhee hhoouussee.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS hhiimm iinn,, PPAAUUSSEESS aass hhee ppaauusseess
aatt tthhee ffoooott ooff tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. NNoorrmmaann ggooeess uupp tthhee ssttaaiirrss..
OOnn tthhee llaannddiinngg hhee ssttooppss.. TThhee ddoooorr ttoo hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss rroooomm
iiss cclloosseedd.. LLyyiinngg iinn aa hheeaapp oouuttssiiddee tthhee ddoooorr aarree aa bblloooodd--
ssttaaiinneedd ddrreessss aanndd aa ppaaiirr ooff eellddeerrllyy--wwoommaann''ss sshhooeess..
FFrroomm aann EEXXTTRREEMMEELLYY HHIIGGHH AANNGGLLEE,, wwee llooookk ddoowwnn oonn NNoorrmmaann aass
hhee bbeennddss ttoo ppiicckk uupp tthhee ssttaaiinneedd ddrreessss aanndd sshhooeess..
HHee rroollllss tthhee sshhooeess iinnttoo tthhee ddrreessss,, ttuucckkss tthhee ssmmaallll,, nneeaatt
bbuunnddllee uunnddeerr hhiiss aarrmm,, aanndd ssttaarrttss ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss,,
hheeaaddiinngg ffoorr tthhee bbaasseemmeenntt..
EEXXTT.. AA LLOONNGG SSHHOOTT OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
IItt ssttaannddss ssiillhhoouueetttteedd aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee sskkyy.. TThheerree iiss aa lloonngg
wwaaiitt.. TThheenn,, sslloowwllyy,, aa ccuurrll ooff ssmmookkee ccoommeess oouutt ooff tthhee
cchhiimmnneeyy..
FFAADDEE OOUUTT::
FFAADDEE IINN::
IINNTT.. BBAACCKK RROOOOMM OOFF SSAAMM''SS HHAARRDDWWAARREE SSTTOORREE IINN FFAAIIRRVVAALLEE -- ((DDAAYY))
SSaamm iiss sseeaatteedd aatt hhiiss ddeesskk,, wwrriittiinngg aa lleetttteerr.. SSeeqquueennccee
bbeeggiinnss wwiitthh CCAAMMEERRAA IINN CCLLOOSSEE,, oovveerr SSaamm''ss sshhoouullddeerr,, aanndd wwee
ccaann rreeaadd aass mmuusshh aass hhee hhaass wwrriitttteenn ooff tthhee lleetttteerr.. TThhee
lleetttteerrhheeaadd rreeaaddss ""SSaamm LLoooommiiss -- HHaarrddwwaarree,,"" aanndd tthhee lleetttteerr
rreeaaddss::
""DDeeaarreesstt rriigghhtt--aass--aallwwaayyss MMaarryy::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5588..
II''mm ssiittttiinngg iinn tthhiiss ttiinnyy bbaacckk rroooomm
wwhhiicchh iissnn''tt bbiigg eennoouugghh ffoorr bbootthh ooff uuss,,
aanndd ssuuddddeennllyy iitt llooookkss bbiigg eennoouugghh ffoorr
bbootthh ooff uuss.. SSoo wwhhaatt iiff wwee''rree ppoooorr aanndd
ccrraammppeedd aanndd mmiisseerraabbllee,, aatt lleeaasstt wwee''llll
bbee hhaappppyy!! IIff yyoouu hhaavveenn''tt ccoommee ttoo yyoouurr
sseennsseess,, aanndd ssttiillll wwaanntt ttoo ......
CCAAMMEERRAA bbeeggiinnss PPUULLLLIINNGG AAWWAAYY aass SSaamm ttuurrnnss tthhee sshheeeett ooff
ppaappeerr oovveerr,, ccoonnttiinnuueess bbaacckkiinngg aawwaayy oouutt ooff tthhee ssmmaallll bbaacckk
rroooomm aanndd hheeaaddss,, bbaacckkwwaarrddss,, ddoowwnn tthhee ccoorrrriiddoorr,, wwee sseeee aa
yyoouunngg cclleerrkk,, BBOOBB SSUUMMMMEERRFFIIEELLDD,, SSaamm''ss aassssiissttaanntt,, ssttaannddiinngg
bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, aa llooookk ooff hhaannddssoommee ppaattiieennccee oonn hhiiss
ffaaccee.. HHee iiss wwaaiittiinngg oonn aa mmeettiiccuulloouuss,, eellddeerrllyy wwoommaann
ccuussttoommeerr,, wwhhoo iiss hhoollddiinngg aanndd eexxaammiinniinngg aa llaarrggee ccaann ooff
iinnsseeccttiicciiddee.. AAss CCAAMMEERRAA PPAASSSSEESS::
WWOOMMAANN CCUUSSTTOOMMEERR
...... TThheeyy tteellll yyoouu wwhhaatt iittss
iinnggrreeddiieennttss aarree aanndd hhooww iitt''ss
gguuaarraanntteeeedd ttoo eexxtteerrmmiinnaattee aannyy
iinnsseecctt iinn tthhee wwoorrlldd,, bbuutt tthheeyy ddoo
nnoott tteellll yyoouu wwhheetthheerr oorr nnoott iitt''ss
ppaaiinnlleessss.. AAnndd II ssaayy iinnsseecctt oorr mmaann,,
ddeeaatthh sshhoouulldd aallwwaayyss bbee ppaaiinnlleessss..
CCAAMMEERRAA,, bbyy tthhiiss hhaass rreeaacchheedd tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr ooff tthhee
hhaarrddwwaarree ssttoorree aanndd wwee nnooww sseeee aa ggiirrll ssttaannddiinngg jjuusstt
iinnssiiddee tthhee ddoooorr.. SShhee iiss aann aattttrraaccttiivvee ggiirrll wwiitthh aa
rraatthheerr ddeeffiinniittee mmaannnneerr,, aa llooookk ooff ppuurrppoosseeffuullnneessss.. SShhee
ccaarrrriieess aa hhaannddbbaagg aanndd aa ssmmaallll oovveerrnniigghhtt ccaassee.. SShhee iiss
MMaarryy''ss ssiisstteerr,, LLIILLAA CCRRAANNEE..
BBoobb SSuummmmeerrffiieelldd hhaass nnoottiicceedd LLiillaa,, ssmmiilleess bbrriigghhttllyy aatt
hheerr,, ggiivveess hheerr aann II''llll--bbee--wwiitthh--yyoouu--iinn--aa--mmoommeenntt nnoodd..
LLiillaa ssttaarrttss ttoo wwaallkk ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, nneevveerr ttaakkiinngg hheerr
eeyyeess ooffff BBoobb.. AAss sshhee aapppprrooaacchheess,, sshhee aasskkss qquuiieettllyy::
LLIILLAA
SSaamm??
SSUUMMMMEERRFFIIEELLDD
YYoouu wwaanntt ttoo sseeee SSaamm??
LLIILLAA
SSaamm LLoooommiiss..
SSUUMMMMEERRFFIIEELLDD
((yyeelllliinngg ttoowwaarrdd bbaacckk
rroooomm))
SSaamm!! LLaaddyy wwaannttss ttoo sseeee yyoouu!!
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 5599..
LLiillaa llooookkss ttoo tthhee bbaacckk rroooomm.. TThhee wwoommaann ccuussttoommeerr ggooeess oonn
wwoorrrriieeddllyy eexxaammiinniinngg tthhee ffiinnee pprriinntt ooff tthhee iinnsseeccttiicciiddee
ccaann.. SSaamm ccoommeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr ooff hhiiss rroooomm,, ppaauusseess,, llooookkss
aatt LLiillaa aa mmoommeenntt,, ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd hheerr,, hhiiss eexxpprreessssiioonn
iinnddiiccaattiinngg tthhaatt hhee ddooeess nnoott kknnooww hheerr.. LLiillaa ssttuuddiieess hhiimm
wwiitthh aa qquuiieett,, wwoorrrriieedd eexxpprreessssiioonn..
SSAAMM
YYeess??
LLIILLAA
MMaayy II ttaallkk ttoo yyoouu??
SSAAMM
((aa bbiitt mmyyssttiiffiieedd))
SSuurree ......
LLiillaa ggllaanncceess aatt tthhee ccuussttoommeerr aanndd tthhee cclleerrkk,, ttuurrnnss,,
ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ffrroonntt ooff tthhee ssttoorree.. SSaamm hhoollddss aa
mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ffoolllloowwss.. AAss hhee rreeaacchheess hheerr,, sshhee ttuurrnnss,, hheerr
eeyyeess ssttuuddyyiinngg hhiimm iinntteennttllyy aass sshhee ssaayyss::
LLIILLAA
II''mm MMaarryy''ss ssiisstteerr..
SSAAMM
LLiillaa..
LLIILLAA
((qquuiicckkllyy))
IIss MMaarryy hheerree??
SSaamm iiss mmyyssttiiffiieedd,, aanndd iiss aallssoo aawwaarree ooff tthhee wwoorrrriieedd,,
hhoossttiillee eexxpprreessssiioonn oonn LLiillaa''ss ffaaccee.. HHee ssttuuddiieess hheerr ffoorr
aa qquuiieett mmoommeenntt.. BBeehhiinndd tthheemm iiss aa ddiissppllaayy ooff vvaarriioouuss
ssiizzee ccaarrvviinngg kknniivveess..
SSAAMM
IIss ssoommeetthhiinngg wwrroonngg??
LLIILLAA
II wwaanntt ttoo kknnooww iiff mmyy ssiisstteerr iiss hheerree..
SSAAMM
HHeerree??
LLIILLAA
WWiitthh yyoouu..
SSAAMM
WWhheerree??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6600..
LLIILLAA
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww wwhheerree.. IInn yyoouurr ssttoorree,,
ssoommeewwhheerree iinn yyoouurr ttoowwnn ......
aannyywwhheerree..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt''ss tthhee mmaatttteerr??
LLIILLAA
DDoonn''tt yyoouu kknnooww??
AAss SSaamm iiss aabboouutt ttoo ssppeeaakk,, tthhee WWoommaann CCuussttoommeerr ccoommeess
ssaaiilliinngg ppaasstt,, ssppeeaakkiinngg aass sshhee ggooeess aanndd wweeaarriinngg aa
ssaattiissffiieedd ssmmiillee..
WWOOMMAANN CCUUSSTTOOMMEERR
AAllll II ccaann ddoo iiss hhooppee iiff iitt iissnn''tt
ppaaiinnlleessss,, iitt''ss qquuiicckk!!
SShhee ssppeeaakkss ""qquuiicckk"" wwiitthh aa kkiinndd ooff ddeelliicciioouuss bbiittee,, nnooddss
hhaappppiillyy,, ggooeess oonn oouutt ooff tthhee ssttoorree.. SSaamm iiss nnooww ssttaarriinngg
aapppprreehheennssiivveellyy aatt LLiillaa..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt sshhoouulldd II kknnooww??
LLIILLAA
TToo bbeeggiinn wwiitthh,, wwhheerree MMaarryy iiss.. DDoo
yyoouu??
SSAAMM
NNoo.. II ttaakkee iitt yyoouu ddoonn''tt eeiitthheerr??
((AAss LLiillaa sshhaakkeess hheerr
hheeaadd))
HHooww lloonngg??
LLIILLAA
LLaasstt FFrriiddaayy.. SShhee lleefftt wwoorrkk,, aanndd
hhoommee ...... II wwaass iinn TTuuccssoonn oovveerr tthhee
wweeeekkeenndd ...... II hhaavveenn''tt hheeaarrdd ffrroomm
hheerr,, nnoott eevveenn aa pphhoonnee ccaallll..
SSAAMM
AAnndd yyoouu tthhoouugghhtt sshhee''dd ccoommee uupp hheerree,,
ttoo mmee?? IIff sshhee hhaadd,, wwhhaatt rreeaassoonn
wwoouulldd sshhee hhaavvee ffoorr nnoott ccaalllliinngg yyoouu??
LLIILLAA
AA ggoooodd rreeaassoonn,, II ssuuppppoossee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6611..
SSAAMM
((SSlliigghhttllyy eexxaassppeerraatteedd))
WWeellll wwhhaatt ddoo yyoouu tthhiinnkk,, wwee eellooppeedd
oorr ssoommeetthhiinngg?? OOrr wwee''rree lliivviinngg iinn
ssiinn aanndd ......
LLIILLAA
MMrr.. LLoooommiiss,, yyoouu''rree ssoo bbuussyy bbeeiinngg
ddeeffeennssiivvee tthhaatt yyoouu hhaavveenn''tt eevveenn
rreeaacctteedd ttoo tthhee mmoosstt sseerriioouuss ffaacctt ooff
aallll.. MMaarryy iiss mmiissssiinngg..
SSAAMM
II wwaass ggeettttiinngg ttoo tthhaatt!!
LLIILLAA
WWhhaatt ddoo yyoouu kknnooww aabboouutt iitt??
SSAAMM
NNootthhiinngg!! YYoouu''rree ppuuttttiinngg mmee oonn tthhee
ddeeffeennssiivvee..
LLIILLAA
LLooookk,, iiff yyoouu ttwwoo aarree iinn tthhiiss tthhiinngg
ttooggeetthheerr,, II ddoonn''tt ccaarree,, iitt''ss nnoonnee
ooff mmyy bbuussiinneessss ...... BBuutt II wwaanntt ttoo
sseeee MMaarryy.. II wwaanntt hheerr ttoo tteellll mmee
sshhee''ss aallll rriigghhtt aanndd iitt''ss nnoonnee ooff mmyy
bbuussiinneessss.. TThheenn II''llll ggoo bbaacckk ttoo
PPhhooeenniixx aanndd ......
SShhee ssttooppss,, tthhee aannxxiieettyy aanndd ffeeaarr bbuuiillddiinngg uupp iinn hheerr,, hheerr
eeyyeess bbeeggiinnnniinngg ttoo ffiillll wwiitthh wwoorrrriieedd tteeaarrss.. SSaamm ssttuuddiieess
hheerr ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ttuurrnnss aanndd ccaallllss::
SSAAMM
BBoobb?? RRuunn oouutt aanndd ggeett yyoouurrsseellff ssoommee
lluunncchh..
SSUUMMMMEERRFFIIEELLDD
IItt''ss ookkaayy,, SSaamm,, II bbrroouugghhtt iitt wwiitthh
mmee..
SSAAMM
RRuunn oouutt aanndd eeaatt iitt..
BBoobb ggeettss tthhee mmeessssaaggee,, ggooeess oouutt tthhrroouugghh tthhee bbaacckk wwaayy..
SSaamm ggooeess cclloosseerr ttoo LLiillaa,, ssppeeaakkss wwiitthh ssoofftt sseerriioouussnneessss..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt tthhiinngg??
LLIILLAA
HHuuhh??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6622..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt tthhiinngg ccoouulldd wwee bbee iinn ttooggeetthheerr??
LLIILLAA
((AA ppaauussee))
II hhaattee tteeaarrss..
((TTaakkeess oouutt hhaannkkiiee))
SSAAMM
IIss MMaarryy ...... iinn ttrroouubbllee??
LLIILLAA
YYeess..
SSAAMM
WWeellll wwhhyy ddiiddnn''tt sshhee ccoommee ttoo mmee ......
ccaallll mmee ......??
LLIILLAA
NNoott tthhaatt kkiinndd ......
((AAllmmoosstt aa ssmmiillee))
YYoouu mmeenn aanndd yyoouurr eeggooss..
SSAAMM
((SSeerriioouussllyy))
NNeevveerr mmiinndd mmyy eeggoo.. LLeett''ss ttaallkk
aabboouutt MMaarryy..
TThheeiirr aatttteennttiioonn iiss ddiissttrraacctteedd bbyy aa mmaann wwhhoo hhaass ssttrroolllleedd
qquuiieettllyy iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm.. HHee iiggnnoorreess tthheemm,, wwaallkkss ppaasstt
tthheemm,, ggooeess bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, ttaakkeess ddoowwnn aa ssiiggnn rreeaaddiinngg
""CCLLOOSSEEDD FFOORR LLUUNNCCHH,,"" wwaallkkss bbaacckk ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,, cclloosseess ddoooorr,,
hhaannggss tthhee ssiiggnn aaccrroossss tthhee ddoooorr wwiinnddooww,, lloocckkss tthhee ddoooorr,,
ttuurrnnss ttoo SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa,, ffoollddss hhiiss aarrmmss,, ssmmiilleess aa
ppaarrttiiccuullaarrllyy uunnffrriieennddllyy ssmmiillee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
LLeett''ss aallll ttaallkk aabboouutt MMaarryy..
SSAAMM
WWhhoo aarree yyoouu,, ffrriieenndd??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
MMiilltt AArrbbooggaasstt,, PPrriivvaattee IInnvveessttiiggaattoorr..
((TToo LLiillaa))
WWhheerree iiss sshhee,, MMiissss CCrraannee??
LLIILLAA
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
WWoouullddnn''tt hhaavvee bbeeeenn aabbllee ttoo ttaaiill yyoouu
iiff yyoouu ddiidd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6633..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt''ss yyoouurr iinntteerreesstt??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
MMoonneeyy..
TThheerree iiss aa mmoommeenntt''ss ssiilleennccee aanndd tthheenn,, uunnaabbllee ttoo ttoolleerraattee
tthhee ssuuddddeenn ffrriigghhtteenniinngg hhaappppeenniinnggss,, SSaamm eexxppllooddeess..
SSAAMM
SSoommeebbooddyy bbeetttteerr tteellll mmee wwhhaatt''ss
ggooiinngg oonn aanndd tteellll mmee ffaasstt!! II ccaann
ttaakkee ssoo mmuucchh aanndd tthheenn ......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((IInntteerrrruuppttiinngg ccaallmmllyy))
YYoouurr ggiirrll ffrriieenndd ssttoollee ffoorrttyy
tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss..
SSaamm llooookkss aatt AArrbbooggaasstt iinn uutttteerr sshhoocckk aanndd iinn tthhaatt ssttaattee
aasskkss oonnee ooff tthhoossee sseeeemmiinnggllyy rriiddiiccuulloouuss qquueessttiioonnss..
SSAAMM
WWhhyy??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((AAnn aallmmoosstt aammuusseedd
ssmmiillee))
MMuusstt''vvee nneeeeddeedd iitt..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt aarree yyoouu ttaallkkiinngg aabboouutt??
((TToo LLiillaa))
WWhhaatt iiss tthhiiss??
LLIILLAA
SShhee wwaass ssuuppppoosseedd ttoo bbaannkk iitt,, oonn
FFrriiddaayy,, ffoorr hheerr bboossss.. SShhee ddiiddnn''tt..
AAnndd nnoo oonnee hhaass sseeeenn hheerr ssiinnccee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((LLooookkiinngg aatt SSaamm))
SSoommeeoonnee hhaass sseeeenn hheerr.. SSoommeeoonnee
aallwwaayyss sseeeess aa ggiirrll wwiitthh ffoorrttyy
tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss..
((TToo SSaamm))
SShhee iiss yyoouurr ggiirrll ffrriieenndd,, iissnn''tt sshhee??
LLIILLAA
SSaamm,, tthheeyy ddoonn''tt wwaanntt ttoo pprroosseeccuuttee,,
tthheeyy jjuusstt wwaanntt tthhee mmoonneeyy bbaacckk.. IItt
wwaass aallll iinn ccaasshh ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6644..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((CCoorrrreeccttiinngg wwiitthh
CCaassssiiddyy''ss wwoorrdd))
CCaasshhaarroooonniiee!!
LLIILLAA
SSaamm,, iiff sshhee''ss hheerree ......
SSAAMM
SShhee iissnn''tt!!
AA rreeaall llooookk ooff aanngguuiisshh ccoommeess iinnttoo LLiillaa''ss ffaaccee.. AAnndd
AArrbbooggaasstt ssttuuddiieess iitt,, tthheenn ssppeeaakkss..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYoouu ccaammee uupp hheerree oonn aa hhuunncchh,, MMiissss
CCrraannee?? NNootthhiinngg mmoorree?? NNoo pphhoonnee
ccaallll ...... ffrroomm hhiimm,, oorr ffrroomm yyoouurr
ssiisstteerr hheerrsseellff??
LLIILLAA
((wweeaarriillyy))
NNoott eevveenn aa hhuunncchh.. JJuusstt hhooppee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
WWiitthh aa lliittttllee cchheecckkiinngg,, II ccoouulldd ggeett
ttoo bbeelliieevvee yyoouu..
LLIILLAA
((aannxxiioouussllyy))
II ddoonn''tt ccaarree iiff yyoouu ddoo oorr ...... II
wwaanntt ttoo sseeee MMaarryy ...... bbeeffoorree sshhee
ggeettss iinn aannyy ddeeeeppeerr ......
SSAAMM
DDiidd yyoouu cchheecckk iinn PPhhooeenniixx ......
hhoossppiittaallss ...... mmaayybbee sshhee hhaadd aann
aacccciiddeenntt ...... aa hhoolldd--uupp ......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SShhee wwaass sseeeenn lleeaavviinngg ttoowwnn iinn hheerr
ccaarr.. SSeeeenn bbyy hheerr vveerryy vviiccttiimmss,, II
mmiigghhtt aadddd..
SSAAMM
((aafftteerr aa mmoommeenntt))
II ddoonn''tt bbeelliieevvee iitt..
((ttoo LLiillaa,, sslloowwllyy))
DDoo yyoouu??
LLIILLAA
((aa tthhoouugghhttffuull ppaauussee))
YYeess ...... II jjuusstt ...... ddiidd.. TThhee mmoommeenntt
tthheeyy ttoolldd mmee ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6655..
SSAAMM
YYoouu mmiigghhtt hhaavvee ddoouubbtteedd ffoorr ssaayy ffiivvee
mmiinnuutteess oorr ssoo,, SSiisstteerr..
LLiillaa ttuurrnnss ffrroomm SSaamm,, aa fflluusshh ooff gguuiilltt aanndd rreeggrreett iinn hheerr
ffaaccee.. AArrbbooggaasstt llooookkss aatt hheerr,, qquuiieett ssyymmppaatthheettiiccaallllyy..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
WWee''rree aallwwaayyss qquuiicckkeesstt ttoo ddoouubbtt
ppeeooppllee wwhhoo hhaavvee aa rreeccoorrdd ffoorr bbeeiinngg
hhoonneesstt.. II tthhiinnkk sshhee''ss hheerree,, MMiissss
CCrraannee.. WWhheerree tthheerree''ss aa
bbooyyffrriieenndd ......
((TTrraaiillss ooffff,, ssmmiilleess
eennccoouurraaggiinnggllyy))
SShhee wwoonn''tt bbee bbaacckk tthheerree aammoonngg tthhee
nnuuttss aanndd bboollttss ...... bbuutt sshhee''llll bbee iinn
tthhiiss ttoowwnn ...... ssoommeewwhheerree.. II''llll ffiinndd
hheerr..
HHee nnooddss,, ttaakkeess ddoowwnn tthhee cclloosseedd--ffoorr--lluunncchh ssiiggnn,, ssaaiillss iitt
ttoo tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, ooppeennss ddoooorr,, ggooeess oouutt iinnttoo tthhee ssttrreeeett..
AAfftteerr aa qquuiieett mmoommeenntt::
LLIILLAA
II jjuusstt lliisstteenneedd ...... aanndd bbeelliieevveedd
eevveerryytthhiinngg tthheeyy ttoolldd mmee.. ''SShhee
ssttoollee tthhee mmoonneeyy..'' ''WWee ddoonn''tt wwaanntt
ttoo ggeett hheerr iinn ttrroouubbllee..'' ''NNoo ddoonn''tt
bbrriinngg tthhee ppoolliiccee iinn'' ......
SSAAMM
IItt wwaass hheerr bboossss'' iiddeeaa nnoott ttoo rreeppoorrtt
iitt ttoo tthhee ppoolliiccee??
LLIILLAA
NNoo.. TThhee mmaann wwhhoossee mmoonneeyy sshhee ...... hhee
ttaallkkeedd ssoo lloouudd aanndd ffaasstt,, aanndd II ......
II sshhoouulldd''vvee ccaalllleedd tthhee ppoolliiccee..
SSAAMM
HHee mmuusstt hhaavvee hhaadd aa ddaarrnn ggoooodd rreeaassoonn
ffoorr wwaannttiinngg tthheemm kkeepptt oouutt ooff iitt ......
AAllll tthhaatt ccaasshh ......
LLIILLAA
II oouugghhtt ttoo ccaallll tthhee ppoolliiccee rriigghhtt
nnooww!!
SSAAMM
NNoo..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6666..
LLIILLAA
WWhhyy nnoott?? SSaamm,, iiss sshhee hhiiddiinngg hheerree??
AArree yyoouu ttwwoo ppllaannnniinngg ttoo ggoo aawwaayy
wwiitthh tthhee mmoonneeyy??
SSAAMM
HHooww ccoouulldd II ggoo aawwaayy?? II''mm iinn ddeebbtt
uupp ttoo mmyy ......
((SSmmiilleess aatt tthhee
iinnccoonnggrruuiittyy ooff hhiiss
rreeppllyy,, tthheenn ggooeess
sseerriioouuss))
IIff sshhee ddiidd sstteeaall tthhaatt mmoonneeyy ......
IItt''ss hhaarrdd ttoo bbeelliieevvee sshhee ddiidd
bbeeccaauussee iitt''ss hhaarrdd ttoo sseeee wwhhyy sshhee
wwoouulldd.. UUnnlleessss sshhee hhaadd ssoommee wwiilldd
iiddeeaa tthhaatt iitt wwoouulldd hheellpp mmee ......
uuss ......
LLIILLAA
SShhee hhaavveenn''tt eevveenn ccaalllleedd yyoouu??
SSAAMM
II ddiiddnn''tt sseeee hheerr ...... aanndd II ddiiddnn''tt
hheeaarr ffrroomm hheerr!! BBeelliieevvee tthhaatt!!
LLIILLAA
II nneeeedd ttoo ...... II nneeeedd ttoo bbeelliieevvee
ssoommeetthhiinngg.. TThhiiss iiss tthhee ffiirrsstt ttiimmee
II''vvee eevveerr ccoommee uupp aaggaaiinnsstt aannyytthhiinngg
II ccoouullddnn''tt ...... uunnddeerrssttaanndd..
SSAAMM
YYoouu''vvee lleedd aa cchhaarrmmeedd lliiffee..
LLIILLAA
NNoo.. II jjuusstt tthhiinnkk ...... aannyytthhiinngg ccaann
bbee eexxppllaaiinneedd.. BBuutt MMaarryy,, ddooiinngg aa
tthhiinngg lliikkee tthhiiss ...... II ddoonn''tt kknnooww
hhooww ttoo hhaannddllee ......
SSAAMM
MMaayybbee wwee ccaann hhaannddllee iitt ttooggeetthheerr..
((HHee ssmmiilleess
eennccoouurraaggiinnggllyy))
LLIILLAA
((AA rruueeffuull sshhrruugg))
II ccaammee ffllyyiinngg uupp hheerree eexxppeeccttiinngg ttoo
ggeett ssoommee eexxppllaannaattiioonn ...... ffoorr aallll II
kknnooww,, sshhee mmaayy bbee ttrryyiinngg ttoo ggeett iinn
ttoouucchh wwiitthh mmee,, aatt hhoommee.. II''dd bbeetttteerr
ggoo hhoommee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6677..
SSAAMM
((AA tthhoouugghhttffuull ppaauussee))
II tthhiinnkk sshhee''llll ccoonnttaacctt mmee iiff sshhee
ccoonnttaaccttss aannyybbooddyy.. WWhhyy ddoonn''tt yyoouu
ssttaayy hheerree.. WWhheenn sshhee sshhoowwss uupp ......
oorr ccaallllss ...... bbee hheerree..
LLIILLAA
((AA lloonngg ssttuuddyy,, hheerr
ssuussppiicciioonn ooff hhiimm
eevvaappoorraattiinngg))
YYoouu wwaanntt mmee ttoo ssttaayy hheerree??
SSAAMM
SShhee''llll nneeeedd bbootthh ooff uuss..
LLIILLAA
((ccoonnssiiddeerrss,, tthheenn::))
WWhheerree ...... ccaann II ssttaayy??
SSAAMM
((bbrriigghhttllyy))
FFiirrsstt rraattee hhootteell,, ffiiffttyy yyaarrddss uupp
tthhee ssttrreeeett.. CCoommee oonn..
((aass hhee rreeaacchheess ffoorr tthhee
cclloosseedd--ffoorr--lluunncchh ssiiggnn))
AAfftteerr wwee cchheecckk yyoouu iinn wwee''llll ggoo ttoo
tthhee ddrruuggssttoorree aanndd ggeett yyoouu aa
ssaannddwwiicchh.. TThheenn wwee''llll ccoommee bbaacckk
hheerree ...... aanndd wwaaiitt..
HHee hhaannggss tthhee ssiiggnn oonn tthhee ddoooorr,, uusshheerrss LLiillaa oouutt,, cclloosseess
ddoooorr bbeehhiinndd hhiimm..
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. SSTTRREEEETT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThheeyy eemmeerrggee ffrroomm tthhee ssttoorree aanndd wwaallkk aalloonngg ttoo tthhee hhootteell..
AAss tthheeyy eenntteerr,, AArrbbooggaasstt iiss iinn tthhee aacctt ooff ttaakkiinngg oovveerr aa
wwhhiittee FFoorrdd sseeddaann ffrroomm aa rreennttaall ccaarr mmaann.. TThheeyy ggllaannccee aatt
hhiimm aanndd hhee rreettuurrnnss aa ccyynniiccaall llooookk..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. HHOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
OOuuttssiiddee aannootthheerr hhootteell wwee sseeee AArrbbooggaasstt aalliigghhtt ffrroomm tthhee
wwhhiittee ccaarr aanndd ggoo iinnttoo nneeww hhootteell..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6688..
EEXXTT.. CCOOUUNNTTRRYYSSIIDDEE -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee wwhhiittee ccaarr ssppeeeeddiinngg aalloonngg tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. NNEEWW MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
AArrbbooggaasstt ggooiinngg iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee -- wwee sseeee tthhee ssiiggnn aabboovvee
hhiimm..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
AA hhiigghh sshhoott sshhoowwiinngg tthhee ffrreeeewwaayy aanndd BBaatteess hhoouussee aanndd
mmootteell oonn tthhee ssiiddee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy.. AA ppaauussee aanndd tthheenn aaccrroossss
tthhee bboottttoomm ooff tthhee ppiiccttuurree aa wwhhiittee ccaarr ssppeeeeddss bbyy oonn tthhee
ffrreeeewwaayy..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. HHOOTTEELL -- ((DDUUSSKK))
AAnnootthheerr HHootteell.. AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess iinn..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee wwhhiittee ccaarr ssppeeeeddiinngg aalloonngg tthhee ffrreeeewwaayy aaggaaiinn ggooiinngg iinn
tthhee ooppppoossiittee ddiirreeccttiioonn ttoo llaasstt ttiimmee.. NNoorrmmaann,, aa ttiinnyy
ffiigguurree,, iiss sseeeenn ggooiinngg uupp tthhee sstteeppss ttoo hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss hhoouussee..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. BBOOAARRDDIINNGG HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
AArrbbooggaasstt''ss sseeaarrcchh iiss ggeettttiinngg ddoowwnn iinn tthhee ssccaallee.. TThhiiss iiss
aann eennttrraannccee ttoo aa cchheeeessyy bbooaarrddiinngg hhoouussee.. ""RRoooommss ttoo
RReenntt,,"" eettcc.. HHee llooookkss aatt hhiiss lliisstt aanndd tthheenn ggooeess iinn..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 6699..
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee wwhhiittee ccaarr ggooeess bbyy oonn tthhee ffrreeeewwaayy aaggaaiinn..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. RROOOOMMIINNGG HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess iinn..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((TTWWIILLIIGGHHTT))
HHeeaavvyy ttrraaffffiicc oonn tthhee ffrreeeewwaayy.. AA bbeeaatt oorr ttwwoo -- aaggaaiinn tthhee
wwhhiittee ccaarr.. IItt sslloowwss uupp ooppppoossiittee tthhee ddiissttaanntt mmootteell.. IItt
mmaakkeess aa ttuurrnn aanndd ggooeess bbaacckk oouutt ooff sscceennee.. AA ppaauussee aanndd iitt
rreeaappppeeaarrss oonn tthhee oolldd rrooaadd aanndd sslloowwllyy mmaakkeess iittss wwaayy
ttoowwaarrdd tthhee BBaatteess'' MMootteell..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE BBAATTEESS'' HHOOUUSSEE AANNDD MMOOTTEELL -- ((TTWWIILLIIGGHHTT))
WWee nnooww sseeee NNoorrmmaann.. HHee hhaass bbrroouugghhtt oouutt aann oolldd rroocckkiinngg
cchhaaiirr aanndd hhaass ppllaacceedd iitt oonn tthhee ooffffiiccee ppoorrcchh aanndd iiss
ssiittttiinngg hhuunncchheedd iinn iitt.. AAnndd hhee iiss ddaarrnniinngg oonnee ooff hhiiss oowwnn
ssoocckkss.. CCAAMMEERRAA HHOOLLDDSS.. BBeeyyoonndd tthhee ppoorrcchh,, aanndd NNoorrmmaann,, wwee
sseeee tthhee oolldd hhoouussee aanndd ccaann bbaarreellyy mmaakkee oouutt,, iinn tthhee
ttwwiilliigghhtt ddiimmnneessss,, tthhee ffiigguurree ooff hhiiss mmootthheerr sseeaatteedd aatt tthhee
wwiinnddooww.. HHeerree,, ttoooo,, tthheerree iiss tthhaatt qquuaalliittyy ooff qquuiieett ppeeaaccee
ssuurrrroouunnddeedd bbyy aa vvaagguuee ffoorreebbooddiinngg..
NNooww NNoorrmmaann llooookkss uupp aatt tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff tthhee aapppprrooaacchhiinngg ccaarr..
AAnndd ccoonnttiinnuueess llooookkiinngg aass tthhee ccaarr ccoommeess ttoo aa ssttoopp aanndd
AArrbbooggaasstt ggeettss oouutt.. AArrbbooggaasstt ggiivveess tthhee ppllaaccee aa qquuiicckk
oonnccee--oovveerr,, ggaazzeess aatt NNoorrmmaann,, ssttaarrttss ffoorrwwaarrdd.. IInn hhiiss
sstteeppss aanndd mmaannnneerr tthheerree iiss tthhaatt bboorreedd,, rroouuttiinnee--llooggggeedd
qquuaalliittyy ooff aa mmaann wwhhoo hhaass sseeeenn ttoooo mmaannyy mmootteellss aanndd aasskkeedd
qquueessttiioonn ooff ttoooo mmaannyy hhootteell mmaannaaggeerrss oovveerr ttoooo sshhoorrtt aa
ppeerriioodd ooff ttiimmee..
NNoorrmmaann rriisseess aass AArrbbooggaasstt ccoommeess ffoorrwwaarrdd..
NNOORRMMAANN
((sshhoovviinngg ssoocckk iinn hhiiss
ppoocckkeett))
II aallwwaayyss ffoorrggeett ttoo ppuutt tthhee ssiiggnn oonn,,
bbuutt wwee ddoo hhaavvee vvaaccaannccyy..
((CChheeeerrffuullllyy))
TTwweellvvee iinn ffaacctt.. TTwweellvvee ccaabbiinnss,,
ttwweellvvee vvaaccaanncciieess..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7700..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((pplleeaassaannttllyy))
IInn tthhee ppaasstt ttwwoo ddaayyss II''vvee bbeeeenn ttoo
ssoo mmaannyy mmootteellss,, mmyy eeyyeess aarree bblleeaarryy
wwiitthh nneeoonn.. TThhiiss iiss tthhee ffiirrsstt oonnee
tthhaatt llooookkeedd lliikkee iitt wwaass hhiiddiinngg ffrroomm
tthhee wwoorrlldd aatt llaarrggee..
NNOORRMMAANN
II ddoonn''tt rreeaallllyy ffoorrggeett tthhee ssiiggnn,, iitt
jjuusstt ddooeessnn''tt sseeeemm ...... aannyy uussee..
((PPooiinnttss))
TThhiiss uusseedd ttoo bbee tthhee mmaaiinn hhiigghhwwaayy..
((SSttaarrttss ffoorr ooffffiiccee))
WWaanntt ttoo rreeggiisstteerr,, pplleeaassee??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SSiitt ddoowwnn.. II ddoonn''tt wwaanntt ttoo ttrroouubbllee
yyoouu,, jjuusstt wwaanntt ttoo aasskk ......
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo ttrroouubbllee.. TTooddaayy''ss lliinneenn ddaayy.. II
cchhaannggee aallll tthhee bbeeddss oonnccee aa wweeeekk,,
wwhheetthheerr tthheeyy''vvee bbeeeenn uusseedd oorr nnoott
...... ddaammppnneessss.. II hhaattee tthhee ssmmeellll ooff
ddaammppnneessss..
((OOppeenniinngg ooffffiiccee ddoooorr))
IItt''ss ssuucckk aa ddaannkk ssmmeellll..
NNoorrmmaann iiss hhoollddiinngg tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn,, ssoo AArrbbooggaasstt wwaallkkss iinn..
NNoorrmmaann ffoolllloowwss..
IINNTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((TTWWIILLIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann sswwiittcchheess oonn tthhee oovveerrhheeaadd lliigghhtt,, ssttaarrttss ffoorr tthhee
lliinneenn cclloosseett,, ssuuddddeennllyy ppaauusseess,, ttuurrnnss,, ssttuuddiieess AArrbbooggaasstt,,
wwhhoo hhaass rreemmaaiinneedd ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee ddoooorr..
NNOORRMMAANN
YYoouu oouutt ttoo bbuuyy aa mmootteell??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
NNoo..
NNOORRMMAANN
OOhh.. II tthhoouugghhtt ...... yyoouu ssaaiidd yyoouu''dd
bbeeeenn ttoo ssoo mmaannyy iinn ttwwoo ddaayyss ......
WWhhaatt wwaass iitt yyoouu wwaanntteedd ttoo aasskk??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7711..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
II''mm llooookkiinngg ffoorr aa mmiissssiinngg ppeerrssoonn..
((ttaakkeess oouutt aanndd ooppeennss
wwaalllleett aanndd eexxtteennddss iitt
aass hhee ssppeeaakkss))
MMyy nnaammee''ss AArrbbooggaasstt,, pprriivvaattee
iinnvveessttiiggaattoorr......
((ttaakkeess bbaacckk wwaalllleett
wwhheenn NNoorrmmaann ddooeessnn''tt
llooookk aatt iitt))
TTrryyiinngg ttoo ttrraaccee aa yyoouunngg ggiirrll wwhhoo''ss
bbeeeenn mmiissssiinngg aallmmoosstt aa wweeeekk.. FFrroomm
PPhhooeenniixx..
((AA llooookk aatt NNoorrmmaann''ss
ffrriigghhtteenneedd eexxpprreessssiioonn))
IItt''ss aa pprriivvaattee mmaatttteerr ...... ffaammiillyy
wwaannttss ttoo ffoorrggiivvee hheerr......
((ssmmiilleess))
SShhee iissnn''tt iinn ttrroouubbllee..
NNOORRMMAANN
((ffoorrcciinngg aa ssmmiillee))
II ddiiddnn''tt tthhiinnkk tthhee ppoolliiccee wweenntt
sseeaarrcchhiinngg ffoorr ppeeooppllee wwhhoo wweerreenn''tt iinn
ttrroouubbllee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
II''mm nnoott tthhee ppoolliiccee..
NNOORRMMAANN
OOhh..
HHee wwaaiittss aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ooppeennss cclloosseett,, ssttaarrttss ccoouunnttiinngg
oouutt sshheeeettss aanndd ppiillllooww ccaasseess,, kkeeeeppss hhiiss bbaacckk ttoo AArrbbooggaasstt..
AArrbbooggaasstt ttaakkeess aa pphhoottooggrraapphh oouutt ooff hhiiss ppoocckkeett,, ttaallkkss aass
hhee ccrroosssseess ttoo NNoorrmmaann..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
WWee hhaavvee rreeaassoonn ttoo bbeelliieevvee sshhee ccaammee
tthhiiss wwaayy ...... mmiigghhtt hhaavvee ssttooppppeedd iinn
tthhiiss aarreeaa ......
((eexxtteennddss pphhoottooggrraapphh,,
wwhhiicchh NNoorrmmaann ddooeessnn''tt
ggllaannccee aatt))
DDiidd sshhee ssttoopp hheerree??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo.. NNoo oonnee hhaass ssttooppppeedd hheerree iinn
wweeeekkss ......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
MMiinndd llooookkiinngg aatt tthhee ppiiccttuurree bbeeffoorree
ccoommmmiittttiinngg yyoouurrsseellff??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7722..
NNOORRMMAANN
CCoommmmiittttiinngg mmyysseellff ttoo wwhhaatt?? YYoouu
ssuurree ttaallkk lliikkee aa PPoolliicceemmaann..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
LLooookk aatt tthhee ppiiccttuurree.. PPlleeaassee..
NNoorrmmaann ggllaanncceess,, bbrriieeffllyy,, ttuurrnnss aawwaayy,, lliiffttss sshheeeettss aanndd
ppiillllooww ccaasseess ooffff tthhee sshheellff hhoollddss tthheemm cclloossee,, aallmmoosstt
pprrootteeccttiivveellyy..
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo.. AAtt lleeaasstt II ddoonn''tt rreeccaallll..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SShhee mmiigghhtt hhaavvee uusseedd aann aalliiaass.. MMaarryy
CCrraannee''ss tthhee rreeaall nnaammee,, bbuutt sshhee
mmiigghhtt''vvee rreeggiisstteerreedd........
NNOORRMMAANN
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
II ddoonn''tt eevveenn bbootthheerr wwiitthh gguueessttss
rreeggiisstteerriinngg aannyy mmoorree ...... II mmeeaann,,
lliittttllee bbyy lliittttllee,, yyoouu ddrroopp tthhee
ffoorrmmaalliittiieess..
((mmoorree rreellaaxxeedd,, bbeeccaauussee
AArrbbooggaasstt iiss lliisstteenniinngg
wwiitthh aa pplleeaassaanntt ssmmiillee))
II sshhoouullddnn''tt eevveenn bbootthheerr ttoo cchhaannggee
tthhee lliinneenn.. II gguueessss hhaabbiittss ddiiee
hhaarrdd.. WWhhiicchh rreemmiinnddss mmee ......
HHee ggooeess ttoo tthhee wwaallll,, fflliippss aa lliigghhtt sswwiittcchh..
NNOORRMMAANN
TThhee vvaaccaannccyy ssiiggnn.. JJuusstt iinn ccaassee..
WWee hhaadd aa ccoouuppllee tthhee ootthheerr nniigghhtt,,
ssaaiidd iiff tthhee ssiiggnn hhaassnn''tt bbeeeenn oonn
tthheeyy''dd hhaavvee tthhoouugghhtt tthhiiss wwaass aann oolldd
ddeesseerrtteedd mmiinniinngg ttoowwnn oorr ssoommeetthhiinngg..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
NNooww tthheerree''ss aa ccoouuppllee eevveenn rreemmaarrkkiinngg
aabboouutt yyoouurr ssiiggnn,, aanndd sseeee hhooww eeaassiillyy
yyoouu ffoorrggoott tthheemm??
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhhaatt??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYoouu tthhoouugghhtt nnoo oonnee hhaass ssttooppppeedd hheerree
iinn wweeeekkss.. NNooww,, ttrryy ttoo rreemmeemmbbeerr iiff
tthhiiss ggiirrll......
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7733..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT ((ccoonntt''dd))
((AA ppaauussee,, aa ssttuuddyy))
MMaayybbee sshhee eevveenn ssiiggnneedd tthhee rreeggiisstteerr
...... bbeeccaauussee hhaabbiittss ddiiee hhaarrdd.. LLeett''ss
cchheecckk iitt,, hhuuhh??
NNoorrmmaann ssaayyss nnootthhiinngg.. AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, ppuullllss
tthhee rreeggiissttrryy bbooookk aarroouunndd,, fflliippss bbaacckk aa ppaaggee oorr ttwwoo..
NNoorrmmaann ssiimmppllyy ssttaarreess aatt tthhee mmaann.. AArrbbooggaasstt hhuummss ffaaiinnttllyy,,
pplleeaassaannttllyy,, aass hhee eexxaammiinneess tthhee ppaaggeess.. TThheenn::
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYeess ssiirr!! MMaarriiee SSaammuueellss..
IInntteerreessttiinngg aalliiaass..
HHee ttaakkeess aa sslliipp ooff ppaappeerr oouutt ooff hhiiss ppoocckkeett,, llaayyss iitt
bbeessiiddee tthhee ssiiggnnaattuurree iinn tthhee rreeggiissttrryy bbooookk,, aallll tthhee wwhhiillee
nnooddddiinngg aanndd ssmmiilliinngg nniicceellyy,, aass iiff tthhiiss ddiissccoovveerryy wwiillll
mmaakkee NNoorrmmaann aass hhaappppyy aass iitt iiss mmaakkiinngg hhiimm..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
DDoonn''tt kknnooww wwhheerree sshhee ggoott ""MMaarriiee,,""
bbuutt ""SSaammuueellss"" ffiigguurreess.. HHeerr bbooyy
ffrriieenndd''ss nnaammee iiss SSaamm..
((TTuurrnnss ttoo NNoorrmmaann,, tthhee
ssmmiillee ggoonnee))
WWaass sshhee iinn ddiissgguuiissee?? OOrr ddoo yyoouu
wwaanntt ttoo cchheecckk tthhee ppiiccttuurree aaggaaiinn??
NNOORRMMAANN
II ddiiddnn''tt lliiee ttoo yyoouu.. II jjuusstt hhaavvee
ttrroouubbllee kkeeeeppiinngg ttrraacckk ooff ...... ttiimmee..
AArrbbooggaasstt hhaass rreeaacchheedd hhiimm,, tthhee ppiiccttuurree eexxtteennddeedd.. NNoorrmmaann
llooookkss dduuttiiffuullllyy aatt iitt..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt wwaass rraaiinniinngg aanndd hheerr hhaaiirr ddiiddnn''tt
llooookk lliikkee tthhaatt ...... ddaammppeedd oouutt,, II
gguueessss..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
TTeellll mmee aallll aabboouutt hheerr..
NNOORRMMAANN
SShhee aarrrriivveedd kkiinndd ooff llaattee,, wweett aanndd
hhuunnggrryy aanndd sshhee wwaass vveerryy ttiirreedd aanndd
wweenntt rriigghhtt ttoo bbeedd aanndd lleefftt eeaarrllyy..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
HHooww eeaarrllyy??
NNOORRMMAANN
VVeerryy eeaarrllyy.. DDaawwnn..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7744..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
OOff wwhhiicchh mmoorrnniinngg??
NNOORRMMAANN
TThhee ffoolllloowwiinngg mmoorrnniinngg.. SSuunnddaayy..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
NNoo oonnee mmeett hheerr??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
OOrr aarrrriivveedd wwiitthh hheerr..
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SShhee ddiiddnn''tt ccaallll aannyyoonnee?? EEvveenn
llooccaallllyy??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYoouu ddiiddnn''tt ssppeenndd tthhee wwhhoollee nniigghhtt
wwiitthh hheerr ddiidd yyoouu??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo!! OOff aallll......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
HHooww ddoo yyoouu kknnooww sshhee ddiiddnn''tt mmaakkee aa
ccaallll??
NNOORRMMAANN
SShhee wwaass ttiirreedd.. SShhee ssaaiidd sshhee hhaadd aa
lloonngg ddrriivvee aahheeaadd ooff hheerr,, iinn tthhee
mmoorrnniinngg ...... YYeess,, nnooww II''mm
rreemmeemmbbeerriinngg vveerryy cclleeaarrllyy bbeeccaauussee
II''mm ppiiccttuurriinngg.. WWhheenn yyoouu mmaakkee aa
ppiiccttuurree ooff tthhee mmoommeenntt iinn yyoouurr mmiinndd,,
yyoouu ccaann rreemmeemmbbeerr eevveerryy ddeettaaiill.. SShhee
wwaass ssiittttiinngg bbaacckk tthheerree,, nnoo sshhee wwaass
ssttaannddiinngg uupp,, wwiitthh ssoommee ssaannddwwiicchh
ssttiillll iinn hheerr hhaanndd,, aanndd sshhee ssaaiidd sshhee
hhaadd ttoo ddrriivvee aa lloonngg wwaayy..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
BBaacckk wwhheerree??
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhhaatt ddoo yyoouu mmeeaann??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7755..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYoouu ssaaiidd sshhee wwaass ssiittttiinngg ""bbaacckk
tthheerree,,"" oorr ssttaannddiinngg rraatthheerr........
NNOORRMMAANN
OOhh.. MMyy pprriivvaattee ppaarrlloorr.. SShhee hhaadd aann
aawwffuull hhuunnggeerr ...... ssoo II mmaaddee hheerr ssoommee
ssuuppppeerr.. AAnndd tthheenn sshhee wweenntt ttoo bbeedd
aanndd lleefftt iinn tthhee mmoorrnniinngg.. II ddiiddnn''tt
eevveenn sseeee hheerr lleeaavvee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
HHooww ddiidd sshhee ppaayy yyoouu??
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhhaatt??
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
CCaasshh oorr cchheecckk?? FFoorr tthhee ccaabbiinn......
NNOORRMMAANN
CCaasshh..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
AAnndd wwhheenn sshhee lleefftt,, sshhee nneevveerr ccaammee
bbaacckk..
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhhyy sshhoouulldd sshhee?? II''mm ssoorrrryy,, II hhaavvee
wwoorrkk ttoo ddoo,, MMrr.. ...... iiff yyoouu ddoonn''tt
mmiinndd......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
II ddoo mmiinndd.. IIff iitt ddoonn''tt jjeellll,, iitt
aaiinn''tt aassppiicc!!
((ssmmiilleess))
TThhiiss aaiinn''tt jjeelllliinngg..
NNOORRMMAANN
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww wwhhaatt yyoouu eexxppeecctt mmee ttoo
kknnooww aabboouutt ...... ppeeooppllee ccoommee aanndd
ggoo ......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SShhee iissnn''tt ssttiillll hheerree,, iiss sshhee??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoott aatt aallll!!
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SSuuppppoossee II wwaanntteedd ttoo sseeaarrcchh tthhee
ccaabbiinnss,, aallll ttwweellvvee ...... wwoouulldd II nneeeedd
aa wwaarrrraanntt??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7766..
NNOORRMMAANN
((aass iiff pplleeaassaannttllyy
eexxaassppeerraatteedd))
LLooookk,, iiff yyoouu wwoonn''tt bbeelliieevvee mmee,, ggoo
aahheeaadd.. YYoouu ccaann hheellpp mmee mmaakkee bbeeddss
iiff yyoouu lliikkee..
((llaauugghhss,, sshhaakkeess hhiiss
hheeaadd))
CCoommee oonn..
HHee ssttaarrttss oouutt.. AArrbbooggaasstt ppaauusseess,, mmoommeennttaarriillyy ccoonnffuusseedd bbyy
tthhee yyoouunngg mmaann''ss ooppeennnneessss..
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL PPOORRCCHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann wwaallkkss ddoowwnn tthhee ppoorrcchh,, hheessiittaatteess bbeeffoorree CCaabbiinn OOnnee,,
wwaallkkss oonn aa bbiitt ttoowwaarrdd CCaabbiinn TTwwoo,, ssttooppss,, ttuurrnnss ttoo sseeee iiff
AArrbbooggaasstt iiss ffoolllloowwiinngg.. AArrbbooggaasstt hhaass ccoommee oouutt oonnttoo tthhee
ppoorrcchh,, bbuutt iiss nnoott ffoolllloowwiinngg.. HHee hhaass wwaallkkeedd ttoo tthhee
ooppppoossiittee eenndd ooff tthhee ppoorrcchh aanndd iiss ssttaannddiinngg aatt iittss eeddggee,,
llooookkiinngg uupp aatt tthhee oolldd hhoouussee.. TThhee uuppssttaaiirrss wwiinnddooww iiss iinn
ddaarrkknneessss.. TThhee nneeoonn ooff tthhee VVaaccaannccyy aanndd MMootteell ssiiggnnss
ssppllaasshh ssttrraannggee lliigghhtt oovveerr tthhee sscceennee..
NNOORRMMAANN
CChhaannggee yyoouurr mmiinndd??
AArrbbooggaasstt ddooeess nnoott rreeppllyy.. NNoorrmmaann bbeeccoommeess aapppprreehheennssiivvee,,
ssttaarrttss ttoo AArrbbooggaasstt,, ffoorrcciinngg hhiimmsseellff ttoo rreemmaaiinn ccaallmm aanndd
cchheeeerrffuull..
NNOORRMMAANN
II gguueessss II''vvee ggoott oonnee ooff tthhoossee ffaacceess
yyoouu ccaann''tt hheellpp bbeelliieevviinngg..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((ttoo NNoorrmmaann,, bbuutt
ccoonnttiinnuuiinngg ttoo ssttaarree
aatt tthhee hhoouussee))
AAnnyyoonnee aatt hhoommee??
NNOORRMMAANN
II lliivvee tthheerree.. AAlloonnee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
SSoommeeoonnee iiss ssiittttiinngg iinn tthhaatt wwiinnddooww..
NNOORRMMAANN
MMyy mmootthheerr..
AArrbbooggaasstt ttuurrnnss,, ggaazzeess sseerriioouussllyy aatt hhiimm..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7777..
NNOORRMMAANN
SShhee''ss ...... iillll.. CCoonnffiinneedd ttoo hheerr
rroooomm.. IItt''ss pprraaccttiiccaallllyy lliivviinngg
aalloonnee..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((aafftteerr aa ppaauussee))
IIff tthhiiss ggiirrll MMaarryy CCrraannee wweerree hheerree,,
yyoouu''dd hhaavvee nnoo rreeaassoonn ttoo hhiiddee hheerr
wwoouulldd yyoouu??
NNOORRMMAANN
OOff ccoouurrssee nnoott..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
IIff sshhee ppaaiidd yyoouu wweellll??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNooww,, llooookk ......!!
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
OOrr iiff sshhee hhaadd yyoouu ssaayy ...... ggaallllaannttllyy
pprrootteeccttiinngg hheerr ...... yyoouu wwoouullddnn''tt bbee
ffoooolleedd ...... yyoouu''dd kknnooww sshhee wwaass jjuusstt
uussiinngg yyoouu.. WWoouullddnn''tt yyoouu??
NNOORRMMAANN
II''mm nnoott aa ffooooll!! AAnndd II''mm nnoott
ccaappaabbllee ooff bbeeiinngg ffoooolleedd!! NNoott eevveenn
bbyy wwoommeenn!!
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
II ddiiddnn''tt mmeeaann tthhaatt aass aa sslluurr oonn
yyoouurr mmaannhhoooodd.. II''mm ssoorrrryy..
NNOORRMMAANN
((ddiissttuurrbbeedd nnooww))
TThhaatt''ss aallll rriigghhtt.. mmaayybbee sshhee ccoouulldd
hhaavvee ffoooolleedd mmee.. BBuutt ......
((aa rruueeffuull ssmmiillee))
SShhee ddiiddnn''tt ffooooll mmyy mmootthheerr..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
YYoouurr mmootthheerr mmeett hheerr??
((qquuiicckkllyy))
CCaann II ttaallkk ttoo yyoouurr mmootthheerr??
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo.. II ttoolldd yyoouu,, sshhee''ss ccoonnffiinneedd......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
JJuusstt ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt.. SShhee mmiigghhtt hhaavvee
ppiicckkeedd uupp aa hhiinntt yyoouu''dd mmiissss..
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7788..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT ((ccoonntt''dd))
SSiicckk oolldd wwoommeenn aarree sshhaarrpp.. CCoommee oonn,,
II wwoonn''tt ddiissttuurrbb......
NNOORRMMAANN
NNoo!! JJuusstt nnoo!! II hhaavvee oonnee ooff tthhoossee
bbrreeaakkiinngg ppooiinnttss lliikkee aannyy ootthheerr mmaann,,
bbeelliieevvee iitt oorr nnoott,, aanndd II''mm nneeaarr iitt..
TThheerree''ss jjuusstt ssoo mmuucchh ppuusshhiinngg II ccaann
ttaakkee aanndd II tthhiinnkk ......
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
AAllll rriigghhtt!!
((ssttaarrttss aawwaayy,, ttoowwaarrdd
hhiiss ccaarr,, ppaauusseess))
MMiigghhtt ssaavvee mmee aa lloott ooff lleegg--wwoorrkk iiff
II ccoouulldd jjuusstt ttaallkk ttoo yyoouurr mmootthheerr..
BBuutt II''dd nneeeedd aa wwaarrrraanntt ffoorr tthhaatt,,
wwoonn''tt II??
NNoorrmmaann ddooeess nnoott rreessppoonndd.. AArrbbooggaasstt ggeettss iinn hhiiss ccaarr,,
ssttaarrttss tthhee mmoottoorr.. NNoorrmmaann llooookkss uupp,, ssttuuddiieess tthhee mmaann''ss
ffaaccee,, hhiiss oowwnn ffaaccee sshhoowwiinngg aapppprreehheennssiioonn.. AArrbbooggaasstt bbaacckkss
tthhee ccaarr aarroouunndd vveerryy sslloowwllyy,, hhiiss ggaazzee ddiivviiddeedd bbeettwweeeenn tthhee
oolldd hhoouussee aanndd tthhee lliigghhtteedd wwiinnddooww ooff CCaabbiinn TTwwoo.. AAss hhee
ttuurrnnss tthhee ccaarr oouutt,, hhiiss hheeaaddlliigghhttss lliigghhtt uupp tthhee ppoorrcchh..
NNoorrmmaann ssttaannddss,, wwaattcchhiinngg hhiimm ddrriivvee aawwaayy..
EEXXTT.. PPHHOONNEE BBOOOOTTHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee ccaarr ppuullllss uupp aanndd AArrbbooggaasstt ggeettss oouutt ooff ccaarr,, lleeaavviinngg
mmoottoorr rruunnnniinngg.. AAss hhee ssttaarrttss ttoo wwaallkk aaccrroossss tthhee hhiigghhwwaayy,,
CCAAMMEERRAA PPUULLLLSS AAWWAAYY aanndd wwee
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. HHIIGGHHWWAAYY WWIITTHH TTEELLEEPPHHOONNEE BBOOOOTTHH -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AArrbbooggaasstt ggeettss ttoo tthhee pphhoonnee bbooootthh,, eenntteerrss.. CCAAMMEERRAA SSTTAARRTTSS
FFOORRWWAARRDD,, aanndd wwee sseeee AArrbbooggaasstt rreemmoovvee aa ssmmaallll nnootteebbooookk
ffrroomm hhiiss ppoocckkeett,, cchheecckk oonn aa nnuummbbeerr,, ddrroopp aa ddiimmee iinn tthhee
sslloott aanndd ddiiaall tthhiiss nnuummbbeerr.. AAss wwee rreeaacchh pphhoonnee bbooootthh,,
CCUUTT TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 7799..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
MMiissss CCrraannee,, pplleeaassee..
((lliisstteennss))
SShhee lleeaavvee aa nnuummbbeerr??
((lliisstteennss))
TThhaannkkss..
((hhaannggss uupp,, ddiiaallss
aaggaaiinn,, wwaaiittss))
LLiillaa tthheerree,, MMrr.. LLoooommiiss?? AArrbbooggaasstt..
((wwaaiittss))
LLiillaa?? LLooookk,, tthhiiss iissnn''tt mmuucchh,, bbuutt
iitt mmiigghhtt mmaakkee yyoouu ffeeeell aa lliittttllee
bbeetttteerr.. MMaarryy wwaass uupp hheerree.. SSppeenntt
llaasstt SSaattuurrddaayy nniigghhtt aatt BBaatteess''
MMootteell,, oouutt hheerree oonn tthhee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy..
((lliisstteennss))
YYoouunngg ffeellllooww rruunnss iitt,, ssaaiidd MMaarryy
ssppeenntt tthhee nniigghhtt,, lleefftt,, ppeerriioodd!!
((lliisstteennss))
II ddiidd qquueessttiioonn hhiimm,, bbeelliieevvee mmee.. II
tthhiinnkk II ggoott aallll tthheerree wwaass ttoo ggeett..
JJuusstt hhaavvee ttoo ttrryy ttoo ppiicckk uupp tthhee
sscceenntt ffrroomm hheerree..
((lliisstteennss))
WWeellll ...... mmaayybbee tthhaatt''ss bbeeccaauussee II
ddoonn''tt ffeeeell eennttiirreellyy ssaattiissffiieedd..
HHee''ss ggoott aa ssiicckk oolldd mmootthheerr,,
ccoonnffiinneedd ttyyppee,, aanndd II tthhiinnkk sshhee ssaaww
MMaarryy aanndd ttaallkkeedd ttoo hheerr.. SShhaammee,, ttoooo
...... ccoonnffiinneedd oolldd wwoommeenn lloovvee ttoo ttaallkk
ttoo ssttrraannggeerrss..
((lliisstteennss))
II wwaass,, bbuutt II tthhiinnkk II''llll ggoo bbaacckk ttoo
tthhee mmootteell,, ffiirrsstt..
((lliisstteennss))
NNoo,, yyoouu ssttaayy ppuutt,, LLiillaa.. WWiitthh
LLoooommiiss.. II sshhoouulldd bbee bbaacckk iinn aann
hhoouurr..
((lliisstteennss))
AAllll rriigghhtt.. AAnndd LLiillaa ...... YYoouu''llll bbee
hhaappppyy ttoo kknnooww wwhhaatt II tthhiinnkk.. II
tthhiinnkk oouurr ffrriieenndd SSaamm LLoooommiiss ddiiddnn''tt
eevveenn kknnooww MMaarryy wwaass hheerree..
((ssmmiilleess))
SSeeee yyoouu iinn aann hhoouurr.. OOrr lleessss..
HHee hhaannggss uupp,, ggeettss oouutt ooff tthhee pphhoonnee bbooootthh..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8800..
EEXXTT.. BBAATTEESS'' MMOOTTEELL -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AA ddiissttaanntt vviieeww ooff tthhee HHoouussee aanndd MMootteell.. TThheerree iiss aa lliigghhtt
oonn iinn tthhee hhoouussee.. TThheerree iiss aallssoo aa lliigghhtt oonn iinn NNoorrmmaann''ss
ooffffiiccee.. WWee sseeee NNoorrmmaann eemmeerrggee ffrroomm hhiiss ooffffiiccee aanndd mmoovvee
aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ddiissttaanntt ccaabbiinnss.. HHee ccaarrrriieess
sshheeeettss oonn hhiiss aarrmm.. HHee ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee llaasstt ccaabbiinn aanndd
sswwiittcchheess tthhee lliigghhtt oonn.. IInnttoo tthhee ffoorreeggrroouunndd tthhee hhoooodd ooff
tthhee wwhhiittee FFoorrdd eenntteerrss tthhee sscceennee aanndd ssttooppss.. AArrbbooggaasstt
ggeettss oouutt.. HHee ggooeess oovveerr ttoo tthhee MMootteell ooffffiiccee..
EEXXTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess iinn..
IINNTT.. OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AArrbbooggaasstt llooookkss aarroouunndd tthhee eemmppttyy ooffffiiccee aanndd ccaallllss..
AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
BBaatteess!!
HHee ggooeess oovveerr ttoo tthhee ddoooorr ttoo tthhee ppaarrlloorr aanndd eenntteerrss.. HHee
llooookkss aarroouunndd tthhee bbiirrdd--rriiddddeenn rroooomm.. HHee ssttooppss sshhoorrtt aass hhee
sseeeess::
CC..UU.. -- TTHHEE OOLLDD SSAAFFEE IINN TTHHEE CCOORRNNEERR
CC..UU.. -- AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
ggooeess oovveerr ttoo iitt.. HHee ffiinnddss iitt uunnlloocckkeedd.. WWiitthh aa qquuiicckk,,
ccaauuttiioouuss llooookk aarroouunndd hhee ooppeennss iitt..
CC..UU.. -- TTHHEE EEMMPPTTYY SSAAFFEE
CC..UU.. -- AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
ssttrraaiigghhtteennss uupp aanndd ggooeess oouutt..
EEXXTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AArrbbooggaasstt ccoommeess oouutt aanndd llooookkss ooffff.. HHee sseeeess::
TTHHEE LLAASSTT LLIITT CCAABBIINN
TThhee ddoooorr aajjaarr..
CC..UU.. -- AARRBBOOGGAASSTT -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
wwoouulldd ggoo aalloonngg bbuutt hhee ssttooppss wwiitthh aa nneeww tthhoouugghhtt.. HHee
ttuurrnnss aarroouunndd aanndd llooookkss ooffff..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8811..
LL..SS.. -- TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE FFRROOMM HHIISS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
CC..UU.. -- AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
ccoommeess ttoo aa ddeecciissiioonn.. HHee ggooeess ooffff..
LL..SS.. AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
ddaasshheess uupp tthhee ssttoonnee sstteeppss ttoo tthhee HHoouussee..
MMEEDDIIUUMM SSHHOOTT
CCAAMMEERRAA HHOOLLDDSS aass AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess uupp oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh.. TThhee
hhoouussee iiss ddaarrkk wwiitthhiinn eexxcceepptt,, aass wweeee ccaann nnooww sseeee,, ffoorr aa
ffaaiinntt ssppiillll ooff lliigghhtt iinn tthhee ffooyyeerr,, lliigghhtt wwhhiicchh ccoommeess
ffrroomm tthhee uuppssttaaiirrss hhaallll.. AArrbbooggaasstt ggooeess ttoo tthhee lliivviinngg
rroooomm wwiinnddooww,, llooookkss iinn,, sseeeess oonnllyy ddaarrkknneessss.. TThheenn hhee ggooeess
ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,, lliisstteennss ffoorr aalloonngg mmoommeenntt,, hheeaarrss nnootthhiinngg..
VVeerryy sslloowwllyy,, aallmmoosstt ppaaiinnffuullllyy,, hhee ttuurrnnss tthhee kknnoobb ooff tthhee
ddoooorr aanndd ppuusshheess ggeennttllyy wwiitthh hhiiss aarrmm aanndd sshhoouullddeerr.. TThhee
ddoooorr bbeeggiinnss ttoo ooppeenn.. HHee aalllloowwss iitt ttoo ooppeenn jjuusstt eennoouugghh
ffoorr hhiimm ttoo sslliipp tthhrroouugghh aanndd iinnttoo tthhee ffooyyeerr..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. FFOOYYEERR OOFF BBAATTEESS'' HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AArrbbooggaasstt ggrraadduuaallllyy eeaasseess tthhee ddoooorr cclloosseedd,, ssttaannddss aaggaaiinnsstt
iitt,, wwaaiittiinngg.. HHee llooookkss uupp iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee lliigghhtt,,
sseeeess nnoo oonnee.. TThhee ddoooorr aatt tthhee hheeaadd ooff tthhee ssttaaiirrss iiss
cclloosseedd.. AArrbbooggaasstt lliisstteennss,, hhoollddss hhiiss bbrreeaatthh,, hheeaarrss wwhhaatt
ccoouulldd bbee hhuummaann ssoouunnddss ccoommiinngg ffrroomm uuppssttaaiirrss bbuutt rreeaalliizzeess
tthheessee ccoouulldd aallssoo bbee tthhee ssoouunnddss ooff aann oolldd hhoouussee aafftteerr
ssuunnsseett.. AAfftteerr aa ccaarreeffuull wwaaiitt,, hhee ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ssttaaiirrss,,
ssttaarrttss uupp,, sslloowwllyy,, gguuaarrddeeddllyy,, ppllaacciinngg aa ffoooott ssqquuaarreellyy oonn
eeaacchh sstteepp ttoo tteesstt iitt ffoorr ssqquueeaakkss oorr ggrrooaannss bbeeffoorree
ppllaacciinngg hhiiss ffuullll wweeiigghhtt oonn iitt.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS,,
rreemmaaiinniinngg oonn fflloooorr lleevveell bbuutt TTRRAAVVEELLLLIINNGG AALLOONNGG tthhee
ssttaaiirrwwaayy aass AArrbbooggaasstt mmaakkeess hhiiss wwaayy uupp..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. SSTTAAIIRRWWAAYY AANNDD UUPPSSTTAAIIRRSS LLAANNDDIINNGG -- EEXXTTRREEMMEELLYY HHIIGGHH AANNGGLLEE
WWee sseeee AArrbbooggaasstt ccoommiinngg uupp tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. AAnndd nnooww wwee sseeee,,
ttoooo,, tthhee ddoooorr ooff tthhee mmootthheerr''ss rroooomm,, ooppeenniinngg,, ccaarreeffuullllyy
aanndd sslloowwllyy..
AAss AArrbbooggaasstt rreeaacchheess tthhee llaannddiinngg,, tthhee ddoooorr ooppeennss aanndd tthhee
mmootthheerr sstteeppss oouutt,, hheerr hhaanndd rraaiisseess hhiigghh,, tthhee bbllaaddee ooff aann
eennoorrmmoouuss kknniiffee ffllaasshhiinngg..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8822..
CC..UU.. -- AA BBIIGG HHEEAADD OOFF AANN AASSTTOONNIISSHHEEDD AARRBBOOGGAASSTT
TThhee kknniiffee ssllaasshheess aaccrroossss hhiiss cchheeeekk aanndd nneecckk.. BBlloooodd
ssppuurrttss.. TThhee ssuuddddeenn aattttaacckk tthhrroowwss hhiimm ooffff bbaallaannccee.. HHee
ssttuummbblleess bbaacckk aanndd ssttaaggggeerrss ddoowwnn tthhee wwhhoollee ooff tthhee
ssttaaiirrccaassee.. HHee ffrraannttiiccaallllyy ggrrooppeess ffoorr tthhee bbaalluussttrraaddee aass
hhee ggooeess bbaacckkwwaarrddss ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. TThhee CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS
hhiimm aallll tthhee wwaayy.. AA wwiicckkeedd kknniiffee kkeeeeppss tthhrruussttiinngg iittsseellff
iinnttoo tthhee ffoorreeggrroouunndd.. AAss hhee ccoollllaappsseess aatt tthhee bboottttoomm,, tthhee
bbllaacckk hheeaadd aanndd sshhoouullddeerrss ooff MMrrss.. BBaatteess pplluunnggeess iinnttoo tthhee
ffoorreeggrroouunndd aass tthhee CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS IINN ttoo ccoonnttaaiinn tthhee rraaiissiinngg
aanndd ddeesscceennddiinngg mmuurrddeerr wweeaappoonn..
FFAADDEE OOUUTT..
FFAADDEE IINN::
IINNTT.. BBAACCKK RROOOOMM OOFF HHAARRDDWWAARREE SSTTOORREE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
LLiillaa iiss ssiittttiinngg cclloossee bbyy tthhee pphhoonnee,, aanndd llooookkss aass iiff sshhee
hhaassnn''tt mmoovveedd ffrroomm iitt iinn tthhee llaasstt hhoouurr.. SSaamm iiss ppaacciinngg,,
ooccccaassiioonnaallllyy ssttooppppiinngg aatt tthhee wwiinnddooww,, ggllaanncciinngg oouutt,,
ppaacciinngg aaggaaiinn.. TThhee aasshh ttrraayy cclloossee ttoo LLiillaa iiss ffiilllleedd..
TThheerree iiss aa tthhiicckk aattmmoosspphheerree ooff ssmmookkee,, tteennssiioonn aanndd
wweeaarriinneessss iinn tthhee ssmmaallll,, ootthheerrwwiissee ccoozzyy rroooomm..
SSAAMM
((aatt wwiinnddooww,, qquuiieettllyy))
SSoommeettiimmeess SSaattuurrddaayy nniigghhtt hhaass aa
lloonneellyy ssoouunndd.. EEvveerr nnoottiiccee,, LLiillaa??
LLIILLAA
((uunnaabbllee ttoo kkeeeepp uupp
ssmmaallll ttaallkk))
SSaamm.. HHee ssaaiidd aann hhoouurr.. OOrr lleessss..
SSAAMM
IItt''ss bbeeeenn tthhrreeee..
LLIILLAA
AArree wwee jjuusstt ggooiinngg ttoo ggoo oonn ssiittttiinngg
hheerree??
SSAAMM
((ssuuddddeennllyy cchheeeerrffuull))
HHee''llll bbee bbaacckk.. LLeett''ss ssiitt ssttiillll aanndd
hhaanngg oonn,, ookkaayy??
LLIILLAA
YYoouu hhaavvee aann aawwffuullllyy nniiccee hhaabbiitt,, SSaamm..
SSAAMM
HHuunnddrreeddss!! WWhhiicchh oonnee iiss yyoouurr ppeett??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8833..
LLIILLAA
WWhheenneevveerr II ssttaarrtt ccoonntteemmppllaattiinngg tthhee
ppaanniicc bbuuttttoonn,, yyoouurr bbaacckk ssttrraaiigghhtteennss
uupp aanndd yyoouurr eeyyeess ggeett tthhaatt GGoodd--LLooookkss--
oouutt--ffoorr--eevveerryybbooddyy llooookk aanndd ...... II
ffeeeell bbeetttteerr..
SSAAMM
II ffeeeell bbeetttteerr wwhheenn yyoouu ffeeeell bbeetttteerr..
LLIILLAA
((aa ppaauussee -- tthheenn sshhee
rriisseess))
WWhheerree''ss tthhee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy??
SSAAMM
YYoouu wwaanntt ttoo rruunn oouutt tthheerree,, bbuusstt iinn
oonn AArrbbooggaasstt aanndd tthhee ssiicckk oolldd llaaddyy,,
sshhaakkee hheerr uupp aanndd mmaayybbee ssppooiill
eevveerryytthhiinngg AArrbbooggaasstt''ss bbeeeenn bbuuiillddiinngg
ffoorr tthhee llaasstt tthhrreeee hhoouurrss..
LLIILLAA
YYeess..
SSAAMM
TThhaatt wwoouullddnn''tt bbee aa wwiissee tthhiinngg ttoo ddoo..
LLIILLAA
PPaattiieennccee ddooeessnn''tt rruunn iinn oouurr ffaammiillyy..
SSaamm,, II''mm ggooiinngg oouutt tthheerree!!
SSAAMM
AArrbbooggaasstt ssaaiidd ......
LLIILLAA
AAnn hhoouurr!! OOrr lleessss!!
SSaamm ssttaarreess aatt hheerr,, ffrroowwnnss iinn ccoonncceerrnn oovveerr hheerr vveerryy rreeaall
aannxxiieettyy,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee pphhoonnee,, ddiiaallss ooppeerraattoorr..
SSAAMM
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
GGoott tthhee nnuummbbeerr ooff tthhee mmootteell oouutt oonn
tthhee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy?? BBaatteess,, II tthhiinnkk..
((wwaaiittss))
LLIILLAA
SSaamm!! WWhhyy ccaallll wwhheenn wwee ccaann ggoo??
SSAAMM
AAnndd mmaayybbee ppaassss AArrbbooggaasstt oonn tthhee rrooaadd??
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
TThhaannkkss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8844..
HHee pprreesssseess ddoowwnn tthhee rreecceeiivveerr,, rreelleeaasseess iitt,, ddiiaallss BBaatteess''
MMootteell.. TThhee ffaaiinntt ootthheerr--eenndd rriinnggiinngg ttoonneess ccaann bbee hheeaarrdd,,
rreeppeeaatteeddllyy,, aannnnooyyiinnggllyy.. HHee wwaaiittss..
SSAAMM
((ttoo LLiillaa))
PPrroobbaabbllyy oonn hhiiss wwaayy bbaacckk rriigghhtt nnooww..
LLIILLAA
SSaamm,, II''mm ggooiinngg..
SSAAMM
((hhaannggss uupp aanndd ppiicckkss uupp
hhiiss jjaacckkeett))
YYoouu''llll nneevveerr ffiinndd iitt..
HHee ssttaarrttss ffoorr tthhee ddoooorr.. LLiillaa ffoolllloowwss aafftteerr hhiimm iinnttoo tthhee
ssttoorree..
IINNTT.. SSTTOORREE
HHee ppaauusseess hhaallffwwaayy ddoowwnn,, ttuurrnnss,, ppuuttss hhiiss hhaannddss oonn hheerr
aarrmmss..
SSAAMM
SSttaayy hheerree..
LLIILLAA
WWhhyy ccaann''tt II ggoo oouutt tthheerree wwiitthh yyoouu??
SSAAMM
((llooookkss aatt hheerr))
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww......
((hhee ccoolllleeccttss hhiimmsseellff))
OOnnee ooff uuss hhaass ttoo bbee hheerree iinn ccaassee
AArrbbooggaasstt''ss oonn tthhee wwaayy..
LLIILLAA
((nneerrvvoouussllyy))
JJuusstt wwaaiitt hheerree??
SSAAMM
((aa wwaarrmm ssmmiillee))
CCoonntteemmppllaattee yyoouurr ...... ppaanniicc bbuuttttoonn..
HHee hhuurrrriieess ddoowwnn ttoo tthhee ssttrreeeett ddoooorr aanndd oouutt.. CCAAMMEERRAA
HHOOLLDDSS oonn LLiillaa aass sshhee ssttaarreess aafftteerr SSaamm.. AAss sshhee ssttaannddss
aalloonnee iinn tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd ssttoorree,, aallll tthhee hhaarrddwwaarree sseeeemmss ttoo
ttaakkee oonn ssiinniisstteerr sshhaappeess..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8855..
CC.. UU..
AAmmoonngg ssoommee bbaatthhrroooomm ffiittttiinnggss aa nnoozzzzllee ffrroomm aa sshhoowweerr
ffaallllss oonnttoo tthhee fflloooorr..
MMEEDDIIUUMM SSHHOOTT
LLiillaa ttuurrnnss aanndd ppiicckkss iiff ffrroomm tthhee fflloooorr aanndd ppuuttss iitt bbaacckk
iinn iittss ppllaaccee.. SShhee ttuurrnnss aanndd aaggaaiinn llooookkss ttoo tthhee ddeesseerrtteedd
ssttrreeeett wwiitthh aa ttoouucchh ooff aannxxiieettyy.. SShhee ggiivveess aa sslliigghhtt
uunnccoonnsscciioouuss sshhiivveerr..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE SSWWAAMMPP -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TTeellll aanndd lloonneellyy ssttiillll aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee mmoooonnlliigghhtt,, tthhee ffiigguurree
ooff NNoorrmmaann,, ssiillhhoouueetttteedd.. HHee ddooeessnn''tt mmoovvee,, mmeerreellyy ssttaannddss
tthheerree aatt tthhee eeddggee ooff tthhee sswwaammpp,, ssttaarriinngg ddoowwnn aatt tthhee nnooww
ccaallmm aanndd qquuiieett ffaaccee ooff iitt..
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL AANNDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AAllll lliigghhtt aarree oouutt,, eexxcceepptt tthhee lliigghhtt iinn NNoorrmmaann''ss mmootthheerr''ss
rroooomm.. AAnndd hheerr ffiigguurree ccaann bbee sseeeenn ssiittttiinngg iinn tthhee wwiinnddooww,,
rreellaaxxeedd iinn aa hhiigghh--bbaacckk cchhaaiirr,, hheerr ffaaccee ttuurrnneedd iinnttoo tthhee
rroooomm.. AAfftteerr aa sseeccoonndd,, wwee hheeaarr tthhee SSOOUUNNDD OOFF AA MMOOTTOORR,, aanndd
tthheenn SSaamm''ss ssmmaallll ppiicckk--uupp ttrruucckk sswwiinnggss iinnttoo tthhee ddrriivveewwaayy..
SSaamm ssttooppss tthhee mmoottoorr,, aauuttoommaattiiccaallllyy sswwiittcchheess ooffff
hheeaaddlliigghhttss,, ppaauusseess aass hhee oobbsseerrvveess tthhee ssiilleennccee aanndd
ddaarrkknneessss ooff tthhee aarreeaa.. TThheenn hhee hhooppss oouutt ooff tthhee ccaabb,, ggooeess
qquuiicckkllyy ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee,, kknnoocckkss oonn tthhee ddoooorr.. AAss hhee wwaaiittss
ffoorr aa rreessppoonnssee,, hhee llooookkss ddoowwnn tthhee lloonngg ppoorrcchh,, ssttuuddiieess
tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd ccaabbiinnss,, kknnoocckkss aaggaaiinn,, lloouuddeerr,, llooookkss iinn tthhee
ootthheerr ddiirreeccttiioonn aanndd sseeeess tthhee hhoouussee aanndd tthhee ffiigguurree aatt tthhee
oonnee lliitt wwiinnddooww.. HHee ssttaarreess aa mmoommeenntt tthheenn ccaallllss lloouuddllyy::
SSAAMM
AArrbbooggaasstt??
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE SSWWAAMMPP
TThhee ssiillhhoouueettttee ooff NNoorrmmaann.. HHee iiss ssttiillll.. OOvveerr sshhoott,, vveerryy
ddiimmllyy,, ccoommeess tthhee SSOOUUNNDD OOFF SSAAMM''SS VVOOIICCEE,, ccaalllliinngg aaggaaiinn ffoorr
AArrbbooggaasstt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8866..
NNoorrmmaann ttuurrnnss sslloowwllyy uunnttiill,, iinn ssiillhhoouueettttee,, wwee sseeee hhiiss
pprrooffiillee,, hhiiss cchhiinn lloowweerreedd ffuurrttiivveellyy aass hhee llooookkss oovveerr hhiiss
sshhoouullddeerr iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee hhoouussee.. TThheerree iiss
ssiilleennccee ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, aanndd tthheenn aaggaaiinn tthhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff SSaamm
PPOOUUNNDDIINNGG aatt tthhee ddoooorr..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
IINNTT.. HHAARRDDWWAARREE SSTTOORREE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee ssttoorree iiss iinn ddaarrkknneessss,, oonnllyy tthhee ggllooww ffrroomm tthhee bbaacckk
rroooomm ssppiilllliinngg iinn..
LL.. SS..
WWiitthh CCAAMMEERRAA ppllaacceedd wwiitthh iittss bbaacckk ttoo tthhee ssttrreeeett ddoooorr,, wwee
ccaann sseeee tthhee ddiissttaanntt ttiinnyy ffiigguurree ooff LLiillaa sseeaatteedd aanndd
wwaaiittiinngg iinn tthhee bbaacckk rroooomm bbeeyyoonndd.. TThheerree iiss aa SSOOUUNNDD ooff aa
ccaarr ppuulllliinngg uupp.. TThhee ttiinnyy ffiigguurree jjuummppss uupp aanndd rruunnss aallll
tthhee wwaayy ffrroomm tthhee bbaacckk rroooomm ddoowwnn tthhee aaiissllee ooff hhaarrddwwaarree
aanndd ccoommeess iinnttoo aa BBIIGG HHEEAADD.. WWee sseeee LLiillaa''ss ddeessppeerraattee
aannxxiioouuss llooookk..
MMEEDDIIUUMM SSHHOOTT
FFrroomm hheerr vviieewwppooiinntt wwee sseeee SSaamm aalliigghhttiinngg ffrroomm hhiiss ttrruucckk
aanndd ccoommiinngg ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ddoooorr ooff tthhee ssttoorree.. HHee eenntteerrss.. HHee
aanndd LLiillaa eexxcchhaannggee qquuiieett ggllaanncceess..
SSAAMM
HHee ddiiddnn''tt ccoommee bbaacckk hheerree??
LLIILLAA
((wwoorrrriieeddllyy))
SSaamm..
SSAAMM
NNoo AArrbbooggaasstt.. NNoo BBaatteess.. AAnndd oonnllyy
tthhee oolldd llaaddyy aatt hhoommee......
((ffrroowwnniinngg))
AA ssiicckk oolldd llaaddyy uunnaabbllee ttoo aannsswweerr
tthhee ddoooorr ...... oorr uunnwwiilllliinngg..
LLIILLAA
WWhheerree ccoouulldd hhee hhaavvee ggoonnee??
SSAAMM
MMaayybbee hhee ggoott ssoommee ddeeffiinniittee lleeaadd..
MMaayybbee hhee wweenntt rriigghhtt oonn ......
LLIILLAA
WWiitthhoouutt ccaalllliinngg mmee??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8877..
SSAAMM
IInn aa hhuurrrryy..
LLIILLAA
SSaamm,, hhee ccaalllleedd mmee wwhheenn hhee hhaadd
nnootthhiinngg ddeeffiinniittee,, nnootthhiinngg bbuutt aa
ddiissssaattiissffiieedd ffeeeelliinngg.. DDoonn''tt yyoouu
tthhiinnkk hhee''dd hhaavvee ccaalllleedd iiff hhee hhaadd
aannyytthhiinngg......
SSAAMM
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
YYeess.. II tthhiinnkk hhee wwoouulldd hhaavvee..
LLiillaa ggooeess qquuiieett.. SSaamm ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd tthhee bbaacckk rroooomm,,
ppaauusseess aatt tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy,, ttuurrnnss.. LLiillaa hhaass rreemmaaiinneedd bbyy tthhee
ddoooorr,, llooookkiinngg oouutt aatt tthhee ssttrreeeett.. SShhee ffeeeellss hhiiss ppaauussee,,
ttuurrnnss,, aanndd ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt tthheeyy sshhaarree aatt eeaacchh ootthheerr aaccrroossss
tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd rroooomm..
SSAAMM
LLeett''ss ggoo sseeee AAll CChhaammbbeerrss..
LLIILLAA
WWhhoo''ss hhee??
SSAAMM
HHee''ss tthhee DDeeppuuttee SShheerriiffff aarroouunndd hheerree..
AAss hhee ssttaarrttss ffoorrwwaarrdd..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. SSTTRREEEETT TTHHEE SSHHEERRIIFFFF LLIIVVEESS OONN -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
AA ddaarrkk,, qquuiieett,, ttrreeee--cceeiilliinnggeedd ssttrreeeett,, tthhee ssmmaallll nneeaatt
hhoouusseess ddiimm iinn tthhee mmoooonnlliigghhtt.. SSaamm''ss ppiicckk--uupp ttrruucckk ccoommeess
ddoowwnn tthhee ssttrreeeett,, ppuullllss uupp bbeeffoorree tthhee hhoouussee ooff SShheerriiffff
CChhaammbbeerrss.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS IINN oonn SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa aass tthheeyy
rreemmaaiinn ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt iinn tthhee ttrruucckk''ss ccaabb,, ssttaarriinngg qquuiieettllyy
aatt tthhee sslleeeeppiinngg hhoouussee..
SSAAMM
OOuurr DDeeppuuttyy sslleeeeppss..
LLIILLAA
WWeellll??
SSAAMM
NNootthhiinngg.. JJuusstt ...... aallll tthhee lliigghhttss
oouutt ...... mmuusstt bbee aasslleeeepp..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8888..
LLIILLAA
((aa ssmmaallll eexxaassppeerraattiioonn))
DDooeess tthhaatt mmeeaann wwee ccaann''tt ......
SSAAMM
NNoo.. II''mm jjuusstt pprrooccrraassttiinnaattiinngg..
PPeeooppllee hhaattee wwhheenn tthhee ddoooorrbbeellll rriinnggss
iinn tthhee mmiiddddllee ooff tthhee nniigghhtt..
((ggiivveess uupp,, ssttaarrttss oouutt))
CCoommee oonn..
HHee ggeettss oouutt ooff ccaabb,, ggooeess aarroouunndd ttoo hheellpp LLiillaa.. SShhee iiss
aallrreeaaddyy oouutt.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS tthheemm uupp tthhee ssmmaallll ppaatthh ttoo
tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr.. SSaamm pprreesssseess tthhee bbeellll bbuuttttoonn.. BBootthh hhee
aanndd LLiillaa aarree aallmmoosstt kknnoocckkeedd oovveerr bbyy tthhee sshhoocckkiinngg,,
ccllaannggiinngg,, eeaarr--sspplliittttiinngg BBLLAASSTT OOFF TTHHEE BBEELLLL wwiitthhiinn tthhee
hhoouussee,, aa rriinngg wwhhiicchh ssoouunnddss mmoorree lliikkee aa ffiirree aallaarrmm tthhaann
aa ddoooorrbbeellll..
HHee ttrriieess ttoo ssmmiillee,, ffaaiillss.. LLiillaa ddooeessnn''tt eevveenn ttrryy.. TThhee
ddoowwnnssttaaiirrss hhaallll lliigghhtt ggooeess oonn aanndd aa mmoommeenntt llaatteerr tthhee
ddoooorr iiss uunnhheessiittaattiinnggllyy ooppeenneedd bbyy MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS,, aa ssmmaallll,,
lliivveellyy ssttiicckk ooff aa wwoommaann wwrraappppeedd iinn aa tthhiicckk ffllaannnneell rroobbee
aanndd aa ccoorroonnaa ooff hhoossppiittaalliittyy..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
OOhh??
SSAAMM
SSoorrrryy,, MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss.. II hhaattee
bbootthheerriinngg yyoouu ......
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
YYoouu ddiiddnn''tt!!
((aa ccrroossss llooookk uupp aatt
tthhee bbeellll))
IItt''ss ttiinnkkeerrbbeellll..
((aa qquuiicckk ssmmiillee aatt LLiillaa))
AAll wwaannttss ttoo bbee ssuurree hhee''llll hheeaarr iitt
iiff aannyyoonnee rriinnggss iitt iinn tthhee mmiiddddllee ooff
tthhee nniigghhtt..
((ttoo SSaamm))
WWeellll ccoommee oonn iinn,, aatt lleeaasstt!!
AAss sshhee ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr wwiiddee,,
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. DDOOWWNNSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLL OOFF SSHHEERRIIFFFF''SS HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
FFaatt rroosseess ssppllaatttteerr tthhee wwaallllppaappeerr.. TThhee ssttaaiirrss aarree
ccaarrppeetteedd.. TThhee lliigghhttiinngg iiss bbrriigghhtt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 8899..
TThheerree iiss aa ppeerrffeeccttllyy ffiittttiinngg wwaallll pphhoonnee bbyy tthhee ppaarrlloorr
aarrcchh.. MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss ggooeess ttoo tthhee ssttaaiirrwwaayy,, yyeellllss uupp..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
AAllbbeerrtt!!
((aa ttiinnyy wwaaiitt,, aa ssmmiillee
aass SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa eenntteerr))
AAll CChhaammbbeerrss!!
SSaamm iiss aabboouutt ttoo cclloossee tthhee ddoooorr bbeehhiinndd hhiimm.. MMrrss..
CChhaammbbeerrss mmoottiioonnss ffoorr hhiimm nnoott ttoo,, ssccuurrrriieess aaccrroossss tthhee
hhaallll,, lleeaannss oouuttssiiddee,, pprreesssseess tthhee ddoooorrbbeellll.. TThhee RRIINNGG
wwiitthhiinn tthhee hhoouussee iiss eevveenn mmoorree sshhaatttteerriinngg.. SShhee cclloosseess
tthhee ddoooorr,, ssttaarrttss ttoo tthhee ssttaaiirrwwaayy,, ppaauusseess aass tthhee SSOOUUNNDDSS
ooff mmoovveemmeenntt aabboovvee CCOOMMEE OOVVEERR SSHHOOTT..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
CCuussttoommeerrss!!
SSHHEERRIIFFFF CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS ccoommeess ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss,, iinn aa bbaatthhrroobbee
wwhhiicchh mmaattcchheess hhiiss wwiiffee''ss.. HHee iiss aa ttaallll,, nnaarrrrooww mmaann wwiitthh
aa ffaaccee oorriiggiinnaallllyy ddeessttiinneedd ffoorr MMoouunntt RRuusshhmmoorree.. HHee nnooddss
aatt SSaamm,, llooookkss aatt hhiimm wwiitthh wwiiddee--aawwaakkee eeyyeess aanndd aa nnoo--
nnoonnsseennssee ccoonncceerrnn..
SSAAMM
WWee hhaavvee aa pprroobblleemm..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((ttoo LLiillaa))
LLeett''ss ggoo oouutt bbaacckk aanndd hhaavvee ssoommee
ccooccaa wwhhiillee tthhee mmeenn aarree ttaallkkiinngg..
LLIILLAA
NNoo,, tthhaannkk yyoouu.. IItt''ss mmyy pprroobblleemm,,
ttoooo..
SSAAMM
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww wwhheerree ttoo ssttaarrtt ......
((aa llooookk aatt LLiillaa))
EExxcceepptt aatt tthhee bbeeggiinnnniinngg..
LLIILLAA
YYeess..
SSAAMM
((ttoo SShheerriiffff))
TThhiiss iiss LLiillaa CCrraannee,, ffrroomm PPhhooeenniixx..
SShhee''ss bbeeeenn hheerree ffoorr aa ffeeww ddaayyss,,
llooookkiinngg ffoorr hheerr ssiisstteerr.. TThheerree''ss aa
pprriivvaattee ddeetteeccttiivvee hheellppiinngg ...... aanndd,,
wweellll,, wwee ggoott aa ccaallll ttoonniigghhtt,, ffrroomm
tthhiiss ddeetteeccttiivvee,, ssaayyiinngg hhee''dd ttrraacceedd
MMaarryy ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9900..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
MMaarryy iiss LLiillaa''ss ssiisstteerr??
SSAAMM
YYeess.. HHee ttrraacceedd hheerr ttoo tthhaatt mmootteell,,
oouutt oonn tthhee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy ......
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((ttoo tthhee SShheerriiffff))
BBaatteess'' MMootteell..
((ttoo LLiillaa))
HHee hhaass aa mmiinndd lliikkee aa mmeecchhaanniiccaall
bbrraaiinn aanndd tthhee mmoorree iinnffoorrmmaattiioonn yyoouu
ffeeeedd iitt ...... GGoo oonn,, SSaamm..
SSAAMM
HHee ttrraacceedd hheerr tthheerree aanndd ccaalllleedd uuss
ttoo ssaayy hhee wwaass ggooiinngg ttoo qquueessttiioonn
MMrrss.. BBaatteess ......
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((aa pplleeaassaanntt sshhoocckk))
NNoorrmmaann ttooookk aa wwiiffee??
SSAAMM
NNoo.. AAnn oolldd wwoommaann,, hhiiss mmootthheerr..
((ttoo SShheerriiffff,, qquuiicckkllyy))
TThhaatt wwaass eeaarrllyy tthhiiss eevveenniinngg.. AAnndd
wwee hhaavveenn''tt sseeeenn oorr hheeaarrdd ffrroomm hhiimm
ssiinnccee.. II wweenntt oouutt ttoo tthhee mmootteell,,
jjuusstt ggoott bbaacckk.. NNoo oonnee wwaass iinn tthhee
ooffffiiccee,, aanndd ......
LLIILLAA
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg,,
aannxxiioouussllyy))
WWiillll yyoouu hheellpp uuss?? II tthhiinnkk
ssoommeetthhiinngg''ss wwrroonngg oouutt tthheerree!!
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((aafftteerr aa ccoonnssiiddeerraattee
ppaauussee))
NNooww.. YYoouurr ssiisstteerr iiss mmiissssiinngg hhooww
lloonngg??
LLIILLAA
SShhee lleefftt PPhhooeenniixx aa wweeeekk aaggoo
yyeesstteerrddaayy.. AAnndd nnoo ttrraaccee uunnttiill ......
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
HHooww''dd yyoouu aanndd tthhiiss ddeetteeccttiivvee ccoommee
ttoo ttrraaccee hheerr ttoo FFaaiirrvvaallee??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9911..
SSAAMM
TThheeyy tthhoouugghhtt sshhee''dd bbee ccoommiinngg ttoo mmee..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
lleefftt PPhhooeenniixx uunnddeerr hheerr oowwnn sstteeaamm??
LLIILLAA
YYeess..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((aa ppaauussee))
SShhee aaiinn''tt mmiissssiinngg ssoo mmuucchh aass sshhee''ss
rruunn aawwaayy..
SSAAMM
YYeess..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
FFrroomm wwhhaatt??
LLIILLAA
((aa llooookk aatt ssaamm,, tthheenn::))
SShhee ssttoollee ssoommee mmoonneeyy..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
AA lloott??
LLIILLAA
FFoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
AAnndd tthhee ppoolliiccee hhaavveenn''tt bbeeeenn aabbllee
ttoo ......
SSAAMM
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
EEvveerryyoonnee ccoonncceerrnneedd tthhoouugghhtt ...... iiff
tthheeyy ccoouulldd ggeett hheerr ttoo ggiivvee bbaacckk tthhee
mmoonneeyy ...... tthheeyy ccoouulldd aavvooiidd
iinnvvoollvviinngg hheerr wwiitthh tthhee ppoolliiccee..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
EExxppllaaiinnss tthhee pprriivvaattee ddeetteeccttiivvee.. HHee
ttrraacceedd hheerr ttoo tthhee BBaatteess ppllaaccee..
WWhhaatt''dd hhee eexxaaccttllyy ssaayy wwhheenn hhee
ccaalllleedd yyoouu??
LLIILLAA
MMaarryy hhaadd bbeeeenn tthheerree,, oonnee nniigghhtt,, aanndd
hhaadd lleefftt..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
WWiitthh tthhee ffoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9922..
LLIILLAA
HHee ddiiddnn''tt mmeennttiioonn tthhee mmoonneeyy..
((aannxxiioouussllyy))
WWhhaatt hhee ssaaiidd oonn tthhee pphhoonnee iissnn''tt
iimmppoorrttaanntt,, iiss iitt?? HHee wwaass ssuuppppoosseedd
ttoo ccoommee bbaacckk aafftteerr hhee ssppookkee ttoo tthhee
mmootthheerr,, aanndd hhee ddiiddnn''tt!! TThhaatt''ss wwhhaatt
II wwaanntt yyoouu ttoo ddoo ssoommeetthhiinngg aabboouutt!!
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
LLiikkee wwhhaatt??
LLIILLAA
GGoo oouutt tthheerree!! FFiinndd ssoommeebbooddyy,, aasskk
ssoommee qquueessttiioonnss!!
((aa ppaauussee))
II''mm ssoorrrryy iiff II sseeeemm oovveerr--aannxxiioouuss ttoo
yyoouu.. II kkeeeepp tthhiinnkkiinngg ......
ssoommeetthhiinngg''ss wwrroonngg.. II hhaavvee ttoo kknnooww
wwhhaatt!!
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
II tthhiinnkk ssoommeetthhiinngg''ss wwrroonngg,, ttoooo,,
MMiissss.. BBuutt nnoott tthhee ssaammee tthhiinngg.. II
tthhiinnkk yyoouurr pprriivvaattee ddeetteeccttiivvee iiss
wwhhaatt''ss wwrroonngg..
((AAss LLiillaa iiss aabboouutt ttoo
oobbjjeecctt))
II tthhiinnkk hhee ggoott hhiimmsseellff aa hhoott lleeaadd
aass ttoo wwhheerree yyoouurr ssiisstteerr wwaass ggooiinngg
...... pprroobbaabbllyy ffrroomm NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess ......
aanndd ccaalllleedd yyoouu ttoo kkeeeepp yyoouu ssttiillll
wwhhiillee hhee ttooookk ooffff aafftteerr hheerr aanndd tthhee
mmoonneeyy..
LLIILLAA
HHee ssaaiidd hhee wwaass ddiissssaattiissffiieedd ...... aanndd
wwaass ggooiinngg bbaacckk..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((ttoo SShheerriiffff))
WWhhyy ddoonn''tt yyoouu ccaallll NNoorrmmaann aanndd lleett
hhiimm ssaayy jjuusstt wwhhaatt hhaappppeenneedd,, iiff hhee
ddiidd ggiivvee tthhee mmaann aa hhoott lleeaadd aanndd hhee
jjuusstt ssccooootteedd ooffff ...... iitt''llll mmaakkee tthhee
ggiirrll ffeeeell bbeetttteerr,, AAllbbeerrtt..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
AAtt tthhiiss hhoouurr??
SSAAMM
HHee wwaass oouutt wwhheenn II wwaass tthheerree.. IIff
hhee''ss bbaacckk hhee pprroobbaabbllyy iissnn''tt eevveenn iinn
bbeedd yyeett..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9933..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
HHee wwaassnn''tt oouutt wwhheenn yyoouu wweerree tthheerree..
HHee jjuusstt wwaassnn''tt aannsswweerriinngg tthhee ddoooorr
iinn tthhee ddeeaadd ooff nniigghhtt ...... lliikkee ssoommee
ppeeooppllee ddoo.. TThhiiss ffeellllooww lliivveess lliikkee
aa hheerrmmiitt ......
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
RReecclluussee.. KKiinnddeerr wwoorrdd..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((ttoo SSaamm))
YYoouu mmuusstt rreemmeemmbbeerr tthhaatt bbaadd bbuussiinneessss
oouutt tthheerree.. AAbboouutt tteenn yyeeaarrss aaggoo ......
SSAAMM
II''vvee oonnllyy bbeeeenn hheerree ffiivvee.. RRiigghhtt
nnooww iitt ffeeeellss lliikkee tteenn,, bbuutt ......
LLIILLAA
AAllll rriigghhtt!! TThheenn ccaallll!! AAtt lleeaasstt,,
ccaallll!!
MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss ggooeess ttoo pphhoonnee,, ddiiaallss ooppeerraattoorr..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
FFlloorrrriiee,, tthhee SShheerriiffff wwaannttss yyoouu ttoo
ccoonnnneecctt hhiimm wwiitthh tthhee BBaatteess MMootteell..
SShhee hhaannddss tthhee rreecceeiivveerr ttoo tthhee SShheerriiffff.. HHee ttaakkeess iitt,,
rreelluuccttaannttllyy,, lliisstteennss ttoo tthhee ddiimm ssoouunndd ooff RRIINNGGIINNGG oonn tthhee
ootthheerr eenndd.. AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt::
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
NNoorrmmaann?? SShheerriiffff CChhaammbbeerrss..
((lliisstteennss))
BBeeeenn jjuusstt ffiinnee,, tthhaannkkss.. LLiisstteenn,, wwee
ggoott ssoommee wwoorrrriieess hheerree.. DDiidd yyoouu
hhaavvee aa mmaann ssttoopp oouutt tthheerree
ttoonniigghhtt ......
((lliisstteennss))
WWeellll,, tthhiiss oonnee wwoouullddnn''tt bbee aa
ccuussttoommeerr,, aannyywwaayy.. AA pprriivvaattee
ddeetteeccttiivvee,, nnaammee ooff ......
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
AArrbbooggaasstt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9944..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
AArrbbooggaasstt..
((lliisstteennss))
AAnndd aafftteerr hhee lleefftt??
((lliisstteennss))
NNoo,, iitt''ss ookkaayy,, NNoorrmmaann.. HHooww''ss iitt
bbeeeenn ggooiinngg oouutt tthheerree??
((lliisstteennss))
WWeellll,, II tthhiinnkk yyoouu oouugghhttaa uunnllooaadd
tthhaatt ppllaaccee aanndd ooppeenn uupp cclloosseerr iinn ttoo
tthhee aaccttiioonn,, aa ssmmaalllleerr ppllaaccee,, yyoouu
kknnooww ...... bbuutt ......
LLIILLAA
PPlleeaassee!!
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((iinnttoo pphhoonnee))
SSoorrrryy II ggoott yyoouu uupp,, bbooyy.. GGoo bbaacckk
ttoo sslleeeepp.. YYeeaahh,, bbee ggllaadd ttoo..
((hhaannggss uupp,, ttuurrnnss ttoo
MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss))
SSaaiidd ttoo ggiivvee yyoouu hhiiss rreeggaarrddss..
SSAAMM
((ffaaiinntt iirroonnyy))
WWaass tthhaatt aallll??
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
TThhiiss ddeetteeccttiivvee wwaass oouutt tthheerree aanndd
NNoorrmmaann ttoolldd hhiimm aabboouutt tthhee ggiirrll aanndd
tthhee ddeetteeccttiivvee tthhaannkkeedd hhiimm aanndd wweenntt
aawwaayy..
LLIILLAA
AAnndd hhee ddiiddnn''tt ggoo bbaacckk?? DDiiddnn''tt sseeee
tthhee mmootthheerr??
TThhee SShheerriiffff llooookkss lloonngg aatt LLiillaa,, sshhaakkeess hhiiss hheeaadd
ssyymmppaatthheettiiccaallllyy..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
YYoouu sshhoouulldd''vvee ccaalllleedd iinn tthhee ppoolliiccee
tthhee sseeccoonndd yyoouu ffoouunndd yyoouurr ssiisstteerr
hhaass sskkiippppeedd.. YYoouu ggoo ssttaarrttiinngg
pprriivvaattee iinnvveessttiiggaattiioonnss,, uussiinngg
ppeeooppllee yyoouu ddoonn''tt eevveenn kknnooww ......
LLIILLAA
WWhhaatt ddiiffffeerreennccee ddooeess tthhaatt ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9955..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
YYoouurr DDeetteeccttiivvee ttoolldd yyoouu aa
nnaakkeeddffaacceedd lliiee..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
BBaarreeffaacceedd..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
HHee ttoolldd yyoouu hhee wwaassnn''tt ccoommiinngg rriigghhtt
bbaacckk ccaauussee hhee wwaanntteedd ttoo qquueessttiioonn
NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess'' mmootthheerr,, rriigghhtt??
LLIILLAA
YYeess..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
((aa ppaauussee,, tthheenn ccaallmmllyy))
NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess'' mmootthheerr hhaass bbeeeenn ddeeaadd
aanndd bbuurriieedd iinn GGrreeeennllaawwnn CCeemmeetteerryy
ffoorr tthhee llaasstt tteenn yyeeaarrss!!
TThheerree iiss aa lloonngg ssiilleennccee.. SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa ssttaarree aatt tthhee
SShheerriiffff..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
II hheellppeedd NNoorrmmaann ppiicckk oouutt tthhee ddrreessss
sshhee wwaass bbuurriieedd iinn.. PPeerriiwwiinnkkllee bblluuee..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
IItt aaiinn''tt oonnllyy llooccaall hhiissttoorryy,, SSaamm,,
iitt''ss tthhee oonnllyy mmuurrddeerr--aanndd--ssuuiicciiddee
ccaassee iinn FFaaiirrvvaallee lleeddggeerrss!! MMrrss..
BBaatteess ppooiissoonneedd tthhiiss gguuyy sshhee wwaass ......
iinnvvoollvveedd wwiitthh,, wwhheenn sshhee ffoouunndd oouutt
hhee wwaass mmaarrrriieedd,, tthheenn ttooookk aa hheellppiinngg
ooff tthhee ssaammee ssttuuffff hheerrsseellff..
SSttrryycchhnniinnee.. UUggllyy wwaayy ttoo ddiiee..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
NNoorrmmaann ffoouunndd tthheemm ddeeaadd ttooggeetthheerr..
IInn bbeedd..
SSAAMM
YYoouu mmeeaann tthhaatt oolldd wwoommaann II ssaaww
ssiittttiinn'' iinn tthhee wwiinnddooww wwaassnn''tt NNoorrmmaann
BBaatteess'' mmootthheerr??
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((hhooppeeffuullllyy,, hhaappppiillyy))
mmaayybbee yyoouu ssaaww MMaarryy!!
SSAAMM
II''dd kknnooww tthhee ddiiffffeerreennccee bbeettwweeeenn
MMaarryy aanndd aann oolldd wwoommaann..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9966..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
NNooww wwaaiitt aa mmiinnuuttee,, SSaamm.. YYoouu ssuurree
yyoouu ssaaww aann oolldd wwoommaann??
SSAAMM
YYeess!! IInn tthhee hhoouussee bbeehhiinndd tthhee
mmootteell.. II ppoouunnddeedd aanndd ccaalllleedd bbuutt
sshhee ...... jjuusstt iiggnnoorreedd mmee..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
AAnndd yyoouu wwaanntt ttoo tteellll mmee yyoouu ssaaww
NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess'' mmootthheerr..
LLIILLAA
IItt mmuusstt''vvee bbeeeenn.. AArrbbooggaasstt ssaaiidd ssoo,,
ttoooo ...... aanndd hhee ssaaiidd tthhee yyoouunngg mmaann
wwoouullddnn''tt lleett hhiimm sseeee hheerr bbeeccaauussee
sshhee wwaass iillll!!
TThhee SShheerriiffff ssttaarreess aatt bbootthh ooff tthheemm,, aanndd wwhheenn hhee ffiinnaallllyy
ssppeeaakkss tthheerree iiss aann aallmmoosstt iinnaauuddiibbllee ttoonnee oorr iirroonnyy iinn hhiiss
vvooiiccee..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
WWeellll,, iiff tthhee wwoommaann uupp tthheerree iiss MMrrss..
BBaatteess ...... wwhhoo''ss tthhaatt wwoommaann bbuurriieedd
oouutt aatt GGrreeeennllaawwnn CCeemmeetteerryy??
QQUUIICCKK CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS PPAARRLLOORR BBEEHHIINNDD OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann ssiittss iinn tthhee ddiimm,, oonnee--llaammpp lliigghhtt,, tthhee pphhoonnee nneexxtt
ttoo hhiimm,, hhiiss hhaanndd ssttiillll nneeaarr iitt aass iiff hhee hhaadd nnoott bbeeeenn
aabbllee ttoo mmoovvee hhiiss hhaanndd aafftteerr hhaannggiinngg uupp.. HHee iiss ssttaarriinngg
aatt tthhee sshhrriikkee--lliikkee bbiirrdd wwhhiicchh iiss ppeerrcchheedd oonn tthhee llaammpp
sshhaaddee.. DDeecciissiioonn aanndd rreessoolluuttiioonn aarree bbeeggiinnnniinngg ttoo sshhooww iinn
hhiiss ffaaccee.. SSuuddddeennllyy hhee rriisseess,, ssttaarrttss qquuiicckkllyy oouutt ooff tthhee
rroooomm,, ttrriieess ttoo sswwiittcchh ooffff tthhee llaammpp aass hhee ggooeess aanndd iinn ssoo
ddooiinngg ssuucccceeeeddss oonnllyy iinn kknnoocckkiinngg tthhee bbiirrdd ooffff tthhee sshhaaddee..
HHee wwaattcchheess iitt ffaallll,, ddooeess nnoott ttrryy ttoo ccaattcchh iitt.. IItt hhiittss
tthhee fflloooorr wwiitthh aa tthhuudd aanndd ssaawwdduusstt ssppiillllss oouutt.. HHee ssttaarreess
ssaaddllyy aatt iitt,, ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn tteennddss ddoowwnn,, ssccooooppss uupp
tthhee ssaawwdduusstt,, ttrriieess ttoo pprreessss iitt iinnttoo tthhee sspplliitt sseeaamm,,
ppiicckkss uupp tthhee bbiirrdd,, ppuuttss iitt iinn aa ddrraawweerr.. TThheenn hhee ppuuttss
oouutt tthhee llaammpp,, ggooeess oouutt,, ccrroosssseess tthhee ddaarrkkeenneedd ooffffiiccee aanndd
ggooeess oouuttssiiddee..
CCUUTT TTOO::
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9977..
EEXXTT.. MMOOTTEELL AANNDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess ooffff tthhee ppoorrcchh,, wwaallkkss ttoo tthhee ppaatthh aanndd
ddiirreeccttllyy uupp ttoo tthhee hhoouussee,, ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr aanndd ggooeess iinn..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. DDOOWWNNSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLLWWAAYY AANNDD SSTTAAIIRRWWAAYY -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
SSHHOOOOTTIINNGG UUPP TTHHEE SSTTAAIIRRSS
NNoorrmmaann ggooeess uupp,, ppaauusseess oonnee mmoommeenntt oouuttssiiddee hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss
ddoooorr,, tthheenn ooppeennss iitt aanndd ggooeess iinn,, lleeaavviinngg tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn..
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt wwee hheeaarr oonnllyy NNoorrmmaann''ss llooww,, qquuiieett vvooiiccee,, hhiiss
wwoorrddss iinnddiissttiinngguuiisshhaabbllee.. TThheenn wwee hheeaarr tthhee ccoolldd sshhoott ooff
hhiiss mmootthheerr''ss ddeerriissiivvee llaauugghhtteerr..
MMOOTTHHEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE
II aamm ssoorrrryy,, bbooyy,, bbuutt yyoouu ddoo mmaannaaggee
ttoo llooookk lluuddiiccrroouuss wwhheenn yyoouu ggiivvee mmee
oorrddeerrss!!
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
PPlleeaassee,, mmootthheerr ......
MMOOTTHHEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE
((SShhaarrpp,, llaauugghhtteerr aallll
ggoonnee))
NNoo!! II wwiillll nnoott hhiiddee iinn tthhee ffrruuiitt
cceellllaarr!!
((AA sshhrriillll llaauugghh))
TThhiinnkk II''mm ffrruuiittyy,, hhuuhh??
((HHaarrdd,, ccoolldd aaggaaiinn))
II''mm ssttaayyiinngg rriigghhtt hheerree!! TThhiiss iiss mmyy
rroooomm aanndd nnoo oonnee wwiillll ddrraagg mmee oouutt ooff
iitt ...... lleeaasstt ooff aallll mmyy bbiigg bboolldd ssoonn!!
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
((RRiissiinngg nnooww,, aannxxiioouussllyy))
TThheeyy''llll ccoommee nnooww,, MMootthheerr.. HHee ccaammee
aafftteerr tthhee ggiirrll aanndd nnooww ssoommeeoonnee wwiillll
ccoommee aafftteerr hhiimm!! HHooww lloonngg ddoo yyoouu
tthhiinnkk yyoouu ccaann ggoo oonn ...... MMootthheerr,,
pplleeaassee,, jjuusstt ffoorr aa ffeeww ddaayyss,, jjuusstt
ssoo tthheeyy wwoonn''tt ffiinndd yyoouu!!
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9988..
MMOOTTHHEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE
((MMiimmiicckkiinngg))
JJuusstt ffoorr aa ffeeww ddaayyss ......
((FFuurriioouuss))
IInn tthhaatt ddaannkk ffrruuiitt cceellllaarr?? NNoo!!
YYoouu hhiidd mmee tthheerree oonnccee,, bbooyy,, aanndd yyoouu
wwoonn''tt ddoo iitt aaggaaiinn!! NNoott eevveerr aaggaaiinn!!
NNooww ggeett oouutt!!
((AA ppaauussee,, qquuiieett))
II ttoolldd yyoouu ttoo ggeett oouutt,, bbooyy!!
((AA lloonnggeerr ppaauussee))
NNoorrmmaann!! WWhhaatt ddoo yyoouu tthhiinnkk yyoouu''rree
ggooiinngg ttoo ddoo?? DDoonn''tt yyoouu ttoouucchh mmee!!
DDoonn''tt!! NNoorrmmaann!!
((AA ppaauussee,, tthheenn
ccaajjoolliinnggllyy))
AAllll rriigghhtt,, ssoonn,, ppuutt mmee ddoowwnn aanndd
II''llll ggoo.. II''llll ggoo oonn mmyy oowwnn ttwwoo
ffeeeett.. II ccaann ggoo oonn mmyy oowwnn ttwwoo ffeeeett,,
ccaann''tt II??
DDuurriinngg aallll tthhiiss tthhee CCAAMMEERRAA hhaass bbeeeenn sslloowwllyy ccrreeeeppiinngg uupp
tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. IItt ddooeess nnoott ssttoopp aatt tthhee ttoopp hhoowweevveerr,, bbuutt
ccoonnttiinnuueess oonn tthhee ssaammee hhiigghh aannggllee tthhaatt wwee hhaadd iinn SScceennee 5577..
SShhee ssttaarrttss ttoo llaauugghh,, aa tteerrrriibbllee ssoouunndd lliikkee aann oobbsscceennee
mmeellooddyy..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE
II''llll ccaarrrryy yyoouu,, mmootthheerr..
NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess oouutt ooff tthhee rroooomm,, hhiiss mmootthheerr hheelldd iinn hhiiss
aarrmmss,, hheerr hheeaadd lleeaanniinngg aaggaaiinnsstt hhiiss sshhoouullddeerr.. HHee ccaarrrriieess
hheerr ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss,, aalloonngg tthhee lloowweerr llaannddiinngg ttoo tthhee
cceellllaarr ssttaaiirrss,, aanndd tthheenn ddoowwnn tthhoossee ssttaaiirrss ttoo tthhee
bbaasseemmeenntt..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. FFAAIIRRVVAALLEE PPRREESSBBYYTTEERRIIAANN CCHHUURRCCHH -- ((MMOORRNNIINNGG))
AAnn oovveerrccaasstt mmoorrnniinngg,, bbuutt aa ssuunnnnyy--ffaacceedd ccrroowwdd.. TThhee
sseerrvviiccee iiss jjuusstt oovveerr,, tthheerree iiss ccoonntteennttmmeenntt,, aanndd ppeeaaccee,,
aanndd jjuusstt aa lliittttllee II--wweenntt--ttoo--cchhuurrcchh--ssmmuuggnneessss iinn tthhee ffaacceess
ooff tthhee cchhuurrcchhggooeerrss aass tthheeyy ccoommee oouutt ooff tthhee cchhaappeell,, aanndd
sspprreeaadd tthheeiirr sseeppaarraattee wwaayyss aawwaayy..
AAmmoonnggsstt tthhee ccrroowwdd,, wwaaiittiinngg aanndd sseeaarrcchhiinngg tthhee ffaacceess,, aarree
SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa.. IInn tthheeiirr eexxpprreessssiioonnss tthheerree iiss nnoo ppeeaaccee,,
nnoo ccoonntteennttmmeenntt.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS IINN CCLLOOSSEE.. TThheeyy aarree nnoott
ssppeeaakkiinngg.. LLiillaa llooookkss aass iiff sshhee hhaass hhaadd nnoo sslleeeepp..
SSuuddddeennllyy,, SSaamm bbeeccoommeess aalleerrtt,, ttaakkeess LLiillaa''ss aarrmm,, ssttaarrttss
ttoowwaarrdd tthhee cchhuurrcchh..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 9999..
CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS WWIITTHH TTHHEEMM,, ssttooppss aass tthheeyy aapppprrooaacchh SShheerriiffff
aanndd MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss.. TThhee SShheerriiffff ssttaarreess rraatthheerr
ssyymmppaatthheettiiccaallllyy aatt LLiillaa.. MMrrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss ssmmiilleess nniicceellyy..
SSAAMM
WWee tthhoouugghhtt,, iiff yyoouu ddiiddnn''tt mmiinndd,,
wwee''dd ggoo oouutt ttoo tthhee mmootteell wwiitthh yyoouu..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
HHee''ss aallrreeaaddyy bbeeeenn..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
WWeenntt oouutt bbeeffoorree sseerrvviiccee..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
HHaavvee yyoouu ttwwoo hhaadd bbrreeaakkffaasstt??
SSAAMM
((TToo SShheerriiffff,, nnoott aa
qquueessttiioonn))
YYoouu ddiiddnn''tt ffiinndd aannyytthhiinngg..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
NNootthhiinngg.. HHeerree,, lleett''ss cclleeaarr tthhee
ppaatthh..
HHee mmoovveess aawwaayy aanndd tthhee ootthheerrss ffoollllooww.. CCAAMMEERRAA PPAANNSS tthheemm
ttoo tthhee ccuurrbb..
LLIILLAA
((IInntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
DDiidd hhee ssaayy aannyytthhiinngg aabboouutt mmyy ssiisstteerr??
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
JJuusstt wwhhaatt hhee ttoolldd yyoouurr ddeetteeccttiivvee..
SShhee uusseedd aa ffaakkee nnaammee,, ssaaww tthhee
rreeggiisstteerr mmyysseellff.. SSaaww tthhee wwhhoollee
ppllaaccee,, aass aa mmaatttteerr ooff ffaacctt.. TThhaatt
bbooyy iiss aalloonnee tthheerree..
SSAAMM
NNoo mmootthheerr..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
YYoouu mmuusstt''vvee sseeeenn aann iilllluussiioonn,, SSaamm..
NNooww,, II kknnooww yyoouu''rree nnoott tthhee sseeeeiinngg--
iilllluussiioonn ttyyppee ...... BBuutt nnoo wwoommaann wwaass
tthheerree aanndd II ddoonn''tt bbeelliieevvee iinn
gghhoossttss,, ssoo tthheerree iitt iiss!!
LLIILLAA
II ssttiillll ffeeeell ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110000..
SSHHEERRIIFFFF
CCaann sseeee yyoouu ddoo.. SSoorrrryy II ccoouullddnn''tt
mmaakkee yyoouu ffeeeell bbeetttteerr.. YYoouu wwaanntt ttoo
ccoommee ttoo mmyy ooffffiiccee tthhiiss aafftteerrnnoooonn
aanndd rreeppoorrtt aa mmiissssiinngg ppeerrssoonn ...... AAnndd
tthhee tthheefftt,, iiss wwhhaatt yyoouu wwaanntt ttoo ddoo!!
SSoooonneerr yyoouu ddrroopp tthhiiss tthhiinngg iinn tthhee
llaapp ooff tthhee llaaww,, tthhaatt''ss tthhee ssoooonneerr
yyoouu''llll ssttaanndd aa cchhaannccee ooff yyoouurr
ssiisstteerr bbeeiinn'' ppiicckkeedd uupp.. HHooww aabboouutt
tthhaatt??
LLIILLAA
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww..
MMRRSS.. CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
IItt''ss SSuunnddaayy.. CCoommee oovveerr aanndd ddoo tthhee
rreeppoorrttiinngg aatt tthhee hhoouussee,, ''rroouunndd
ddiinnnneerr ttiimmee.. MMaakkee iitt nniicceerr.. YYoouu
ttoooo,, SSaamm..
SShhee ssmmiilleess bbrriigghhttllyy,, aass iiff hhaavviinngg iinnvviitteedd tthheemm oovveerr ttoo
ddiissccuussss tthhiiss yyeeaarr''ss cchhaarriittyy ffaannddaannggoo,, ttaakkeess tthhee
SShheerriiffff''ss aarrmm,, ssttaarrttss aawwaayy.. TThhee SShheerriiffff nnooddss aass hhee ggooeess..
SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa aarree aalloonnee nnooww,, aatt tthhee ccuurrbb,, bbeeffoorree tthhee
ddeesseerrtteedd cchhaappeell.. FFoorr aa lloonngg mmoommeenntt tthheeyy jjuusstt ssttaanndd
tthheerree,, tthheeiirr ffaacceess aass ggrraayy aanndd oovveerrccaasstt aass tthhee sskkyy..
SSAAMM
MMaayybbee II aamm tthhee sseeeeiinngg--iilllluussiioonnss
ttyyppee..
LLIILLAA
YYoouu''rree nnoott..
SSaamm ttaakkeess hheerr aarrmm,, ssttaarrttss wwaallkkiinngg hheerr uupp tthhee ssttrreeeett
ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ssppoott wwhheerree hhiiss ppiicckk--uupp ttrruucckk iiss ppaarrkkeedd..
CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS tthheemm..
SSAAMM
WWaanntt mmee ttoo ddrroopp yyoouu aatt tthhee hhootteell??
OOrr yyoouu wwaanntt ttoo ccoommee oovveerr ttoo tthhee
ssttoorree??
LLiillaa ddooeess nnoott aannsswweerr.. TThheeyy rreeaacchh tthhee ttrruucckk.. LLiillaa llooookkss
ddiirreeccttllyy aatt SSaamm aass hhee hheellppss hheerr iinnttoo tthhee ccaabb..
LLIILLAA
II wwoonn''tt ffeeeell ssaattiissffiieedd uunnlleessss II ggoott
oouutt tthheerree,, SSaamm..
SSAAMM
NNeeiitthheerr wwiillll II..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110011..
HHee ssllaammss tthhee ddoooorr,, hhuurrrriieess aarroouunndd ttrruucckk,, ggeettss iinnttoo
ddrriivveerr''ss sseeaatt,, ssttaarrttss mmoottoorr.. AAss tthhee ttrruucckk ddrriivveess ooffff,,
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
SSAAMM AANNDD LLIILLAA IINN TTRRUUCCKK -- ((PPRROOCCEESSSS -- HHIIGGHHWWAAYY))
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, bbootthh aarree ssiilleenntt;; SSaamm wwaattcchhiinngg tthhee rrooaadd aass
iiff tthheerree wweerree ootthheerr ccaarrss oonn iitt,, LLiillaa ssttaarriinngg aatt nnootthhiinngg
iinn ppaarrttiiccuullaarr,, eexxcceepptt ppeerrhhaappss hheerr oowwnn iinnnneerr ffeeaarr..
LLIILLAA
II wwoonnddeerr iiff wwee''llll eevveerr sseeee MMaarryy
aaggaaiinn..
SSAAMM
OOff ccoouurrssee wwee wwiillll..
LLIILLAA
AAlliivvee..
SSaamm llooookkss aass iiff hhee''dd lliikkee ttoo ssaayy ssoommeetthhiinngg hhuummoorroouuss,,
ssoommeetthhiinngg ttoo cchheeeerr hheerr.. HHee ccaannnnoott.. HHee rreemmaaiinnss ssiilleenntt..
LLIILLAA
WWee lliivveedd ttooggeetthheerr aallll oouurr lliivveess..
WWhheenn wwee wwookkee uupp oonnee mmoorrnniinngg aanndd
ffoouunndd oouurrsseellvveess oorrpphhaannss,, MMaarryy qquuiitt
ccoolllleeggee aanndd ggoott aa jjoobb,, ssoo II ccoouulldd
ggoo ttoo ccoolllleeggee..
SSAAMM
WWhheerree''dd yyoouu ggoo ttoo ccoolllleeggee??
LLIILLAA
II ddiiddnn''tt.. II ggoott aa jjoobb,, ttoooo..
((AA ppaauussee))
II wwoonnddeerr iiff tthhaatt hhuurrtt hheerr,, mmyy nnoott
lleettttiinngg hheerr ssaaccrriiffiiccee ffoorr mmee?? SSoommee
ppeeooppllee aarree ssoo wwiilllliinngg ttoo ssuuffffeerr ffoorr
yyoouu tthhaatt tthheeyy ssuuffffeerr mmoorree iiff yyoouu
ddoonn''tt lleett tthheemm..
SSAAMM
((AAllmmoosstt ttoo hhiimmsseellff))
SShhee wwaass wwiilllliinngg ttoo lliicckk tthhee ssttaammppss..
LLiillaa llooookkss qquuiizzzziiccaallllyy aatt hhiimm,, iiss ttoooo ccoonncceerrnneedd ttoo
ppuurrssuuee iitt..
LLIILLAA
II wwoonnddeerr ssoo mmaannyy tthhiinnggss aabboouutt hheerr
nnooww..
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110022..
LLIILLAA ((ccoonntt''dd))
WWhhyy sshhee nneevveerr ttoolldd mmee aabboouutt yyoouu ......
FFuunnnnyy,, wwhheenn yyoouu tthhiinnkk tthheerree''ss aann
aannsswweerr ttoo eevveerryytthhiinngg,, yyoouu tthhiinnkk yyoouu
kknnooww aallll tthhee aannsswweerrss..
SSAAMM
WWee wweerree ggooiinngg ttoo ggeett mmaarrrriieedd.. AArree
ggooiinngg ttoo ggeett mmaarrrriieedd!!
LLIILLAA
DDoo yyoouu kknnooww hhooww II ffoouunndd oouutt aabboouutt
yyoouu?? II ffoouunndd oonnee ooff yyoouurr lleetttteerrss
...... iitt wwaass aa nniiccee lleetttteerr,, SSaamm..
SSAAMM
TThhiiss iiss tthhee oolldd hhiigghhwwaayy..
LLIILLAA
II ssuuppppoossee ...... wwhheenn yyoouu wweerree aabbllee ttoo
mmaarrrryy hheerr sshhee''dd hhaavvee pprreesseenntteedd yyoouu,,
aallll sshhiinnyy aanndd pprrooppeerr ...... sshhee aallwwaayyss
ttrriieedd ttoo bbee pprrooppeerr..
SSAAMM
WWaattcchh yyoouurr tteennsseess..
LLIILLAA
HHuuhh??
SSAAMM
SShhee aallwwaayyss ttrriieess ttoo bbee pprrooppeerr..
SSaamm sslloowwss tthhee ttrruucckk ttoo aa ssttoopp,, ssiigghhss,, ssttaarrttss ttoo lliigghhtt uupp
aa cciiggaarreettttee.. LLiillaa llooookkss qquueessttiioonniinnggllyy aanndd iimmppaattiieennttllyy
aatt hhiimm..
LLIILLAA
YYoouu ggooiinngg ttoo wwaaiitt hheerree ffoorr mmee??
SSAAMM
II''mm ggooiinngg wwiitthh yyoouu.. BBuutt wwee''dd
bbeetttteerr ddeecciiddee wwhhaatt wwee''rree ggooiinngg ttoo
ssaayy aanndd ddoo wwhheenn wwee wwaallkk iinn ......
LLIILLAA
WWee''rree ggooiinngg ttoo rreeggiisstteerr.. AAss mmaann
aanndd wwiiffee.. AAnndd ggeett sshhoowwnn ttoo aa ccaabbiinn
...... aanndd tthheenn sseeaarrcchh eevveerryy iinncchh ooff
tthhaatt ppllaaccee,, iinnssiiddee aanndd ...... oouuttssiiddee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110033..
SSAAMM
YYoouu wwoonn''tt bbeelliieevvee iitt ......
((SSttaarrttss mmoottoorr))
BBuutt tthhiiss wwiillll bbee tthhee ffiirrsstt ttiimmee
II''vvee eevveerr ppuulllleedd oonnee ooff tthhoossee mmaann--
aanndd--wwiiffee--rreennttiinngg--ccaabbiinn ccaappeerrss!!
LLIILLAA
((AA ttiinnyy ssmmiillee,, ffiirrsstt
iinn hhoouurrss))
II bbeelliieevvee iitt..
AAss ttrruucckk ssttaarrttss ttoo ddrriivvee oonn,,
CCUUTT TTOO::
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE BBAATTEESS MMOOTTEELL AANNDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee ppllaaccee iiss eemmppttyy aanndd ssiilleenntt aanndd wwaasshheedd ddiirrttyy bbyy tthhee
ddeeeepp ggrraayy ooff tthhee cclloouuddyy sskkyy.. WWee sseeee SSaamm''ss ttrruucckk ttuurrnniinngg
iinnttoo tthhee ddrriivveewwaayy aanndd ppuulllliinngg ttoo aa ssttoopp.. AAfftteerr aa
mmoommeenntt,, SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa ggeett oouutt ooff tthhee ttrruucckk..
FFRREESSHH AANNGGLLEE
CClloossee oonn SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa aass tthheeyy mmeeeett oonn tthhee ppoorrcchh ssiiddee ooff
tthhee ttrruucckk.. TThhee mmootteell ooffffiiccee aanndd tthhee hhoouussee bbeeyyoonndd ccaann bbee
sseeeenn iinn bb..gg.. ooff sshhoott.. SSaamm aanndd LLiillaa mmeerreellyy ssttaarree ffoorr aa
mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn ttuurrnn aanndd ggaazzee uupp aatt tthhee hhoouussee.. TThheerree iiss nnoo
ffiigguurree iinn tthhee wwiinnddooww aanndd tthhee sshhaaddee iiss ddrraawwnn.. SSaammee ggooeess
ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee ddoooorr,, ppeeeerrss iinn,, kknnoocckkss,, ooppeennss ddoooorr,,
eenntteerrss.. LLiillaa rreemmaaiinnss oonn tthhee ddrriivveewwaayy,, bbeessiiddee tthhee ttrruucckk..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTHHEERR''SS RROOOOMM -- ((DDAAYY))
CClloossee aannggllee oonn NNoorrmmaann ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee wwiinnddooww.. HHee hhaass
ppuulllleedd tthhee ccuurrttaaiinnss vveerryy sslliigghhttllyy aappaarrtt,, iiss ssttaarriinngg oouutt
aanndd ddoowwnn aatt tthhee mmootteell,, hhiiss eeyyeess ssttuuddyyiinngg tthhee lloonnee ffiigguurree
ooff LLiillaa,, wwhhoo iiss ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee ttrruucckk aanndd llooookkiinngg uupp aatt
tthhee hhoouussee.. NNoorrmmaann ssttuuddiieess hheerr,, aanndd aass hheerr eeyyeess llooookk uupp
aatt tthhiiss vveerryy wwiinnddooww hhee cclloosseess tthhee ccuurrttaaiinnss,, ttuurrnnss aawwaayy..
WWee sseeee tthhee ssuussppiicciioonn aanndd ffeeaarr iinn hhiiss ffaaccee,, tthhee ssuurrggee ooff
ppaanniicc aanndd hhiiss ssttrruuggggllee ttoo ccoonnttaaiinn iitt.. TThheenn hhee ggooeess
aawwaayy.. CCAAMMEERRAA rreemmaaiinnss oonn wwiinnddooww,, sshhoooottiinngg oouutt aanndd ddoowwnn,,
aanndd tthhrroouugghh tthhee ffrraaiill ccuurrttaaiinnss wwee ccaann sseeee SSaamm aass hhee
ccoommeess oouutt ooff tthhee mmootteell ooffffiiccee aanndd jjooiinnss LLiillaa..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110044..
EEXXTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- CCLLOOSSEE OONN SSAAMM AANNDD LLIILLAA
SSAAMM
((UUnnccoonnsscciioouussllyy
wwhhiissppeerriinngg))
II wwoonnddeerr wwhheerree NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess ddooeess
hhiiss hheerrmmiittiinngg??
LLIILLAA
SSoommeeoonnee wwaass aatt tthhaatt wwiinnddooww.. II ssaaww
tthhee ccuurrttaaiinn mmoovvee..
SSaamm ttaakkeess LLiillaa''ss aarrmm..
SSAAMM
CCoommee oonn..
HHee ssttaarrttss wwiitthh hheerr ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ppaatthh wwhhiicchh lleeaaddss ttoo tthhee
oolldd hhoouussee.. CCAAMMEERRAA PPAANNSS wwiitthh tthheemm,, aanndd aass tthheeyy ttuurrnn
aarroouunndd tthhee ooffffiiccee ccoorrnneerr,, tthheeyy sseeee NNoorrmmaann ccoommiinngg ddoowwnn
tthhee ppaatthh ttoowwaarrdd tthheemm.. TThheeyy ppaauussee aanndd NNoorrmmaann ppaauusseess.. HHee
ddooeess nnoott ssmmiillee,, nnoorr ssppeeaakk.. HHiiss uussuuaall ggrriinn aanndd ssoofftt
ffrriieennddlliinneessss aarree ggoonnee;; ccoonnttaaiinnmmeenntt aanndd iimmppaassssiivviittyy lliiee
iinn tthheeiirr ppllaaccee..
SSAAMM
((CChheeeerrffuullllyy))
JJuusstt ccoommiinngg uupp ttoo rriinngg ffoorr yyoouu..
NNOORRMMAANN
((CCoommiinngg ffoorrwwaarrdd))
II ssuuppppoossee yyoouu wwaanntt aa ccaabbiinn..
SSAAMM
WWee''dd hhooppeedd ttoo mmaakkee iitt ssttrraaiigghhtt ttoo
SSaann FFrraanncciissccoo,, bbuutt wwee ddoonn''tt lliikkee
tthhee llooookk ooff tthhaatt sskkyy.. LLooookkss lliikkee
aa bbaadd ddaayy ccoommiinngg ...... ddooeessnn''tt iitt..
NNoorrmmaann wwaallkkss ppaasstt SSaamm,, ggiivviinngg hhiimm tthhee ssoorrtt ooff qquuiicckk,,
ddiissaapppprroovviinngg ggllaannccee oonnee ggiivveess aa mmaann wwhhoo iiss oobbvviioouussllyy
llyyiinngg,, ggooeess oonnttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh aanndd iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee.. SSaamm aanndd
LLiillaa ffoollllooww NNoorrmmaann..
IINNTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
NNoorrmmaann ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,, ggooeess bbeehhiinndd iitt,, ttaakkeess tthhee
kkeeyy ttoo ccaabbiinn nnuummbbeerr ttwweellvvee ooffff tthhee kkeeyybbooaarrdd.. SSaamm aanndd
LLiillaa hhaavvee eenntteerreedd aanndd aarree aallmmoosstt ttoo tthhee ddeesskk--ccoouunntteerr bbyy
tthhiiss ttiimmee..
NNOORRMMAANN
II''llll ttaakkee yyoouu ttoo ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110055..
SSAAMM
BBeetttteerr ssiiggnn iinn ffiirrsstt,, hhaassnn''tt wwee??
SSaamm eeyyeess ssccaann tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, llooookkiinngg ffoorr aa rreeggiissttrraattiioonn
bbooookk..
NNOORRMMAANN
IItt iissnn''tt nneecceessssaarryy..
SSAAMM
((IInntteerrrruuppttiinngg wwiitthh aa
ffrriieennddllyy cchheeeerrffuullnneessss))
UUhh,, uuhh!! MMyy bboossss iiss ppaayyiinngg ffoorr tthhiiss
ttrriipp ...... nniinneettyy ppeerrcceenntt bbuussiinneessss
...... aanndd hhee wwaannttss pprraaccttiiccaallllyy
nnoottaarriizzeedd rreecceeiippttss.. II bbeetttteerr ssiiggnn
iinn aanndd ggeett aa rreecceeiipptt..
NNoorrmmaann ssttaarreess aatt SSaamm,, aass iiff hhee''dd lliikkee ttoo yyeellll aatt hhiimm,,
ccaallll hhiimm ""lliiaarr.."" IInnsstteeaadd hhee rreeaacchheess uunnddeerr tthhee ddeesskk
ccoouunntteerr,, bbrriinnggss oouutt tthhee rreeggiissttrraattiioonn bbooookk.. LLiillaa mmoovveess
cclloosseerr,, ssttuuddiieess tthhee bbooookk aass SSaamm ssiiggnnss iinn.. SSaamm ssiiggnnss
""JJooee aanndd MMrrss.. JJoohhnnssoonn.."" TThhee ssiiggnnaattuurree aanndd cciittyy ooff
""MMaarriiee SSaammuueellss"" aanndd aafftteerr iitt,, tthhee nnoottaattiioonn ""CCaabbiinn OOnnee,,""
ccaann bbee cclleeaarrllyy sseeeenn tthhrreeee rreeggiissttrraattiioonnss aabboovvee SSaamm''ss..
WWhheenn SSaamm hhaass ffiinniisshheedd hhee cclloosseess bbooookk,, hhaannddss iitt bbaacckk ttoo
NNoorrmmaann.. NNoorrmmaann ddooeess nnoott ttaakkee iitt,, ssttaarrttss oouutt ffrroomm bbeehhiinndd
ccoouunntteerr..
NNOORRMMAANN
II''llll ggeett yyoouurr bbaaggss..
SSAAMM
HHaavveenn''tt aannyy..
NNOORRMMAANN
((aafftteerr aa ssttaarree))
II''llll sshhooww yyoouu tthhee ccaabbiinn..
AAss hhee ssttaarrttss ffoorr tthhee ddoooorr,, SSaamm llaauugghhss.. NNoorrmmaann ssttooppss,,
ttuurrnnss,, llooookkss aatt hhiimm..
SSAAMM
FFiirrsstt ttiimmee II''vvee sseeeenn iitt hhaappppeenn..
((ttoo LLiillaa))
CChheecckk iinn aannyy ppllaaccee iinn tthhiiss ccoouunnttrryy
wwiitthhoouutt bbaaggss,, aanndd yyoouu hhaavvee ttoo ppaayy
iinn aaddvvaannccee..
SSaamm ssmmiilleess aass iiff aatt aa ffuunnnnyy rreemmaarrkk,, ttaakkeess aa bbiillll oouutt ooff
hhiiss ppoocckkeett..
NNOORRMMAANN
TTeenn ddoollllaarrss ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110066..
NNoorrmmaann rreettuurrnnss ttoo SSaamm,, ttaakkeess tthhee eexxtteennddeedd bbiillll,, iiss aabboouutt
ttoo ssttaarrtt oouutt aaggaaiinn..
SSAAMM
TThhaatt rreecceeiipptt ......??
NNoorrmmaann ggooeess rreelluuccttaannttllyy bbeehhiinndd ccoouunntteerr,, llaayyss ddoowwnn tthhee
kkeeyy ttoo ccaabbiinn ttwweellvvee,, ttaakkeess aa rreecceeiipptt bbooookk oouutt ooff tthhee
ddrraawweerr uunnddeerr ccoouunntteerr,, ssttaarrttss ttoo wwrriittee.. LLiillaa sstteeppss uupp ttoo
tthhee ddeesskk,, ppiicckkss uupp tthhee kkeeyy,, qquuiicckkllyy,, ssttaarrttss oouutt..
LLIILLAA
II''llll ssttaarrtt aahheeaadd..
NNoorrmmaann llooookkss uupp,, ggaazzeess hheerr aass sshhee ggooeess oouutt ddoooorr..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa ccoommeess aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh,, ppaauusseess bbeeffoorree ccaabbiinn oonnee,,
ttrriieess tthhee ddoooorr.. IItt ooppeennss.. SShhee cclloosseess iitt qquuiicckkllyy aass sshhee
hheeaarrss SSaamm aanndd NNoorrmmaann ccoommiinngg oouutt ooff tthhee mmootteell ooffffiiccee,,
ccoonnttiinnuueess oonn ddoowwnn tthhee ppoorrcchh..
SSAAMM
((TToo NNoorrmmaann,, wwhhoo iiss
ffoolllloowwiinngg))
DDoonn''tt bbootthheerr yyoouurrsseellff ...... wwee''llll
ffiinndd iitt..
HHee ggooeess oonn ddoowwnn tthhee ppoorrcchh,, ddooeessnn''tt eevveenn ggllaannccee aatt ccaabbiinn
oonnee,, wwaallkkss qquuiicckkllyy aanndd ccaattcchheess uupp ttoo LLiillaa jjuusstt aass sshhee
rreeaacchheess ccaabbiinn ttwweellvvee.. CCAAMMEERRAA RREEMMAAIINNSS wwiitthh NNoorrmmaann,, wwhhoo
iiss ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee ooffffiiccee ddoooorr,, llooookkiinngg aafftteerr SSaamm aanndd
LLiillaa,, hhiiss ffaaccee aalleerrtt aanndd nnoo lloonnggeerr iimmppaassssiivvee.. HHee wwaaiittss
aa mmoommeenntt,, aafftteerr tthheeyy hhaavvee cclloosseedd tthheeiirr ccaabbiinn ddoooorr,, tthheenn
ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ppiicckkuupp ttrruucckk.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS wwiitthh hhiimm.. HHee
ssttuuddiieess tthhee ttrruucckk,, tthheenn lleeaannss iinn tthhrroouugghh tthhee ddrriivveerr''ss
wwiinnddooww,, ttwwiissttss tthhee rreeggiissttrraattiioonn ccaarrdd aarroouunndd,, rreeaaddss iitt..
IItt ggiivveess tthhee ccoorrrreecctt nnaammee aanndd aaddddrreessss ooff SSaamm LLoooommiiss..
NNoorrmmaann ccoommeess bbaacckk oouutt ooff tthhee wwiinnddooww,, ggllaanncceess oonnccee mmoorree
ttoowwaarrdd ccaabbiinn ttwweellvvee,, tthheenn aatt tthhee oolldd hhoouussee.. HHiiss
ssuussppiicciioonnss aarree ccoonnffiirrmmeedd,, aanndd nnooww tthheerree iiss tthhee
rreellaaxxaattiioonn ooff rreelliieeff iinn hhiiss ffaaccee.. HHee ttaakkeess oonn aa
ppuurrppoosseeffuull aaiirr,, ttuurrnnss,, ssttrriiddeess uupp tthhee ppaatthh,, uupp oonnttoo tthhee
ppoorrcchh ooff tthhee hhoouussee,, ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr,, ggooeess iinn..
IINNTT.. CCAABBIINN TTWWEELLVVEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa iiss aatt tthhee ccaabbiinn''ss rreeaarr wwiinnddooww,, llooookkiinngg oouutt,,
ssttrraaiinniinngg ffoorr aa gglliimmppssee ooff tthhee oolldd hhoouussee,, wwhhiicchh ccaannnnoott
bbee sseeeenn ffrroomm tthhee wwiinnddooww ooff tthhiiss ccaabbiinn..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110077..
SShhee ttuurrnnss,, ffrruussttrraatteedd,, aannxxiioouuss.. SSaamm iiss ssttaannddiinngg aatt tthhee
ffoooott ooff tthhee bbeedd,, ssttaarriinngg aatt tthhee ssmmooootthh ccoovveerrlleett,, hhiiss
bbrrooww ccrreeaasseedd iinn aa ssaaddnneessss..
LLIILLAA
WWee sshhoouulldd hhaavvee aasskkeedd ffoorr CCaabbiinn OOnnee
...... TThhee oonnee MMaarryy wwaass iinn..
SSAAMM
II''mm ggllaadd wwee ddiiddnn''tt..
HHee ppuullllss hhiiss eeyyeess ffrroomm tthhee bbeedd,, ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk,,
ssiittss wweeaarriillyy,, lliigghhttss aa cciiggaarreettttee.. LLiillaa wwaattcchheess hhiimm ffoorr
aa mmoommeenntt,, ffeeeellss aa rreeaall ccoommppaassssiioonn,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee bbeedd,, ssiittss
oonn iittss eeddggee,, ttuurrnnss aaggaaiinn aanndd llooookkss aatt SSaamm''ss bbaacckk..
LLIILLAA
WWee hhaavvee ttoo ggoo iinnttoo tthhaatt ccaabbiinn aanndd
sseeaarrcchh iitt,, SSaamm ...... nnoo mmaatttteerr wwhhaatt
wwee''rree aaffrraaiidd ooff ffiinnddiinngg aanndd nnoo
mmaatttteerr hhooww mmuucchh iitt mmaayy hhuurrtt..
SSAAMM
II kknnooww..
((AA ppaauussee))
DDoo yyoouu tthhiinnkk iiff ssoommeetthhiinngg hhaappppeenneedd,,
iitt hhaappppeenneedd tthheerree??
LLIILLAA
((AA ppaauussee,, tthheenn::))
SSaamm,, iiff yyoouu oowwnneedd aa uusseelleessss
bbuussiinneessss lliikkee tthhiiss mmootteell ...... oonnee
yyoouu pprroobbaabbllyy ccoouullddnn''tt eevveenn sseellll ......
wwhhaatt wwoouulldd yyoouu nneeeedd ttoo ggeett aawwaayy,, ttoo
ssttaarrtt aa nneeww bbuussiinneessss,, ssoommeewwhheerree
eellssee??
((AAss SSaamm ssttuuddiieess hheerr))
FFoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss??
SSAAMM
HHooww ccoouulldd wwee pprroovvee ......
((AAnn aallmmoosstt hhooppeelleessss
llaauugghh))
WWeellll,, iiff hhee ooppeennss aa nneeww mmootteell oonn
tthhee nneeww hhiigghhwwaayy ...... ssaayy,, aa yyeeaarr
ffrroomm nnooww ......
LLIILLAA
TThheerree mmuusstt bbee ssoommee pprrooooff tthhaatt
eexxiissttss rriigghhtt nnooww!! SSoommeetthhiinngg tthhaatt
pprroovveess hhee ggoott tthhaatt mmoonneeyy aawwaayy ffrroomm
MMaarryy ...... SSoommee wwaayy!!
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110088..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt mmaakkeess yyoouu ssoouunndd ssoo cceerrttaaiinn??
LLIILLAA
AArrbbooggaasstt!! SSaamm,, hhee lliikkeedd mmee ...... oorr
ffeelltt ssoorrrryy ffoorr mmee ...... aanndd hhee wwaass
ssttaarrttiinngg ttoo ffeeeell tthhee ssaammee aabboouutt
yyoouu.. II hheeaarrdd iitt wwhheenn hhee ccaalllleedd ......
iinn hhiiss vvooiiccee,, aa ccaarriinngg.. HHee
wwoouullddnn''tt hhaavvee ggoonnee aannyywwhheerree oorr ddoonnee
aannyytthhiinngg wwiitthhoouutt tteelllliinngg uuss..
UUnnlleessss hhee wwaass ssttooppppeedd.. AAnndd hhee wwaass
ssttooppppeedd,, ssoo hhee mmuusstt hhaavvee ffoouunndd oouutt
ssoommeetthhiinngg!!
SSaamm ccoonnssiiddeerrss aa mmoommeenntt,, nnooddss aaggrreeeemmeenntt,, rriisseess..
SSAAMM
WWee''llll ssttaarrtt wwiitthh CCaabbiinn OOnnee..
HHee ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr,, ooppeennss iitt sslliigghhttllyy,, llooookkss oouutt,, tthheenn,,
bbaacckk ttoo LLiillaa::
SSAAMM
IIff hhee sseeeess uuss ...... wwee''rree jjuusstt ttaakkiinngg
tthhee aaiirr..
LLiillaa ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr.. HHee hhoollddss iitt ooppeenn aanndd sshhee ggooeess
oouutt..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
SSaamm cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr,, jjooiinnss LLiillaa,, ttaakkeess hheerr hhaanndd..
TTooggeetthheerr tthheeyy wwaallkk aalloonngg tthhee ppoorrcchh iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff
CCaabbiinn OOnnee.. CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS.. TThheeyy ppaauussee bbeeffoorree tthhee ddoooorr
ooff CCaabbiinn OOnnee.. SSaamm mmoottiioonnss LLiillaa ttoo wwaaiitt,, ttoo hhoolldd ssttiillll,,
tthheenn ggooeess oonn ttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee,, ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr,, ccaallllss iinn::
SSAAMM
BBaatteess??
HHee wwaaiittss,, tthheerree iiss nnoo rreessppoonnssee.. HHee ggooeess iinn aanndd iinn aa
mmoommeenntt ccoommeess bbaacckk oouutt,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr,, ggooeess ttoo LLiillaa..
SShhee hhaass aallrreeaaddyy ooppeenneedd tthhee ddoooorr ooff CCaabbiinn OOnnee aanndd hhaass
ssttaarrtteedd ttoo eenntteerr..
IINNTT.. CCAABBIINN OONNEE -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee bblliinnddss aarree cclloosseedd aanndd tthhee rroooomm iiss aallmmoosstt nniigghhtt--ddaarrkk..
SSaamm ccoommeess iinn aafftteerr LLiillaa,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr bbeehhiinndd hhiimm..
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt tthheeyy jjuusstt ggaazzee aatt tthhee rroooomm,, aass iiff wwiilllliinngg
iitt ttoo tteellll tthheemm ssoommee ssaattiissffaaccttoorryy ssttoorryy..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 110099..
NNeeiitthheerr ssppeeaakkss.. TThheenn,, iinn ddaarrkk ssiilleennccee,, tthheeyy bbeeggiinn ttoo
sseeaarrcchh,, ggooiinngg mmeetthhooddiiccaallllyy aanndd tthhoorroouugghhllyy tthhrroouugghh aallll
ddrraawweerrss,, tthhee cclloosseett,, tthhee ddeesskk,, sseeaarrcchhiinngg uunnddeerr tthhee bbeedd
aanndd iinn ddaarrkk ccoorrnneerrss,, nnoott kknnoowwiinngg wwhhaatt tthheeyy eexxppeecctt ttoo
ffiinndd aanndd yyeett eexxppeeccttiinngg ttoo ffiinndd ssoommee tthhiinngg.. LLiillaa ooppeennss
tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm ddoooorr,, llooookkss iinn.. TThhee wwiinnddoowwlleessss rroooomm iiss
vveerryy ddaarrkk.. SShhee sswwiittcchheess oonn tthhee lliigghhtt,, ggooeess iinn.. SSaamm
mmoovveess ttoowwaarrdd tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, iiss aabboouutt ttoo ffoollllooww hheerr iinn
wwhheenn hhee nnoottiicceess wwhhiicchh rroooomm iitt iiss aanndd aauuttoommaattiiccaallllyy
ccaattcchheess hhiimmsseellff uupp,, bbaacckkss oouutt..
SSAAMM
SSoorrrryy..
LLIILLAA
HHoossppiittaall cclleeaann..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt??
LLIILLAA
TThhee bbaatthhrroooomm.. LLooookk aatt hhooww cclleeaann iitt
iiss.. TThhee oonnee iinn oouurr ccaabbiinn iiss cclleeaann
...... bbuutt tthhiiss iiss cclleeaann!!
SSaamm ggooeess iinn,, ggllaanncceess aarroouunndd,, nnooddss.. LLiillaa ggooeess tthhrroouugghh
tthhee mmeeddiicciinnee ccaabbiinneett,, ffiinnddss nnootthhiinngg bbuutt aa ggllaassss aanndd ttwwoo
ttiinnyy ttaabbss ooff ssooaapp.. SSaamm lleeaannss aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee ddoooorr--jjaammbb,,
llooookkss aatt tthhee ttuubb,, tthhee sshhoowweerr ppiippee aabboovvee iitt.. HHee
ccoonnttiinnuueess ttoo ssttaarree,, mmoorree iinntteerreesstteedd ssuuddddeennllyy,, aass iiff
bbootthheerreedd bbyy ssoommee ooffff--kkeeyy eevviiddeennccee hhee ccaann''tt ppuutt hhiiss
ffiinnggeerr oonn.. TThheenn hhee llooookkss aatt tthhee sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn rroodd..
AAnndd rreeaalliizzeess tthheerree iiss nnoo sshhoowweerr ccuurrttaaiinn.. HHee ffrroowwnnss,, iiss
aabboouutt ttoo ssaayy ssoommeetthhiinngg wwhheenn LLiillaa,, wwhhoo hhaass bbeeeenn
mmoommeennttaarriillyy oouutt ooff sshhoott,, iinntteerrrruuppttss..
SSaamm ttuurrnnss,, CCAAMMEERRAA TTUURRNNSS,, aanndd wwee sseeee LLiillaa iiss ssttaannddiinngg
aabboovvee tthhee ttooiilleett bboowwll,, aa ttiinnyy ppiieeccee ooff wweett ppaappeerr ssttuucckk
ttoo tthhee ttiipp ooff hheerr rriigghhtt iinnddeexx ffiinnggeerr..
SSAAMM
WWhhaatt iiss iitt??
LLIILLAA
IItt ddiiddnn''tt ggeett wwaasshheedd ddoowwnn.. IItt''ss
ffiigguurriinngg ...... tthhee kkiinndd yyoouu tteeaarr uupp
aanndd ggeett rriidd ooff..
((EExxtteennddiinngg hheerr ffiinnggeerr
ttoowwaarrdd SSaamm))
SSoommee ffiigguurree hhaass bbeeeenn aaddddeedd ttoo oorr
ssuubbttrraacctteedd ffrroomm ...... ffoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111100..
SSaamm lliiffttss tthhee ppiieeccee ooff ppaappeerr ooffff hheerr ffiinnggeerr,, ssttuuddiieess iitt,,
ttaakkeess oouutt hhiiss wwaalllleett,, pprreesssseess tthhee wweett ssccrraapp ttoo hhiiss
ddrriivveerr''ss lliicceennssee sshhiieelldd,, ppuuttss iitt bbaacckk iinn tthhee wwaalllleett aanndd
ppuuttss tthhee wwaalllleett aawwaayy..
LLIILLAA
TThhaatt''ss pprrooooff MMaarryy wwaass hheerree!! IItt
wwoouulldd bbee ttoooo wwiilldd aa ccooiinncciiddeennccee ffoorr
ssoommeebbooddyy eellssee ttoo ......
SSAAMM
((RReemmiinnddiinngg))
BBaatteess nneevveerr ddeenniieedd MMaarryy wwaass hheerree..
LLIILLAA
((RReemmiinnddeedd))
YYeess..
((AA tthhoouugghhtt))
BBuutt mmaayybbee tthhiiss pprroovveess tthhaatt BBaatteess
ffoouunndd oouutt aabboouutt tthhee mmoonneeyy..
SSAAMM
DDoo wwee ssiimmppllyy aasskk hhiimm wwhheerree hhee''ss
hhiiddddeenn iitt??
LLIILLAA
SSaamm,, tthhaatt oolldd wwoommaann,, wwhhooeevveerr sshhee
iiss.. II tthhiinnkk sshhee ttoolldd AArrbbooggaasstt
ssoommeetthhiinngg!! AAnndd II wwaanntt hheerr ttoo tteellll
uuss tthhee ssaammee tthhiinngg!!
SShhee ssttaarrttss oouutt ooff tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm.. SSaamm ttaakkeess hhoolldd ooff hheerr
aarrmm,, ssttooppss hheerr..
SSAAMM
YYoouu ccaann''tt ggoo uupp tthheerree..
LLIILLAA
WWhhyy nnoott??
SSAAMM
BBaatteess..
CCAAMMEERRAA SSTTAARRTTSS TTOO PPAANN AAWWAAYY ffrroomm tthheemm,, mmoovveess sslloowwllyy oovveerr
tthhee rroooomm,, vveerryy sslloowwllyy..
LLIILLAA''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
LLeett''ss ffiinndd hhiimm.. OOnnee ooff uuss ccaann kkeeeepp
hhiimm ooccccuuppiieedd wwhhiillee tthhee ootthheerr ggeettss
ttoo tthhee wwoommaann..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111111..
SSAAMM''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
YYoouu wwoonn''tt bbee aabbllee ttoo hhoolldd hhiimm ssttiillll
iiff hhee ddooeessnn''tt wwaanntt ttoo bbee hheelldd.. AAnndd
II ddoonn''tt lliikkee yyoouu ggooiinngg iinnttoo tthhaatt
hhoouussee aalloonnee,, LLiillaa..
CCAAMMEERRAA HHAASS PPAANNNNEEDD cclleeaarr aaccrroossss ttoo tthhee ooppppoossiittee wwaallll nnooww,,
aanndd iiss mmoovviinngg uupp cclloosseerr aanndd cclloosseerr ttoo tthhee ttiinnyy--fflloowweerreedd
wwaallll ppaappeerr,, ffiinnaallllyy cclloossiinngg iinn oonn oonnee ssmmaallll rroosseebbuudd..
LLIILLAA''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
II ccaann hhaannddllee aa ssiicckk oolldd wwoommaann..
NNooww wwee sseeee tthhaatt tthhee rroosseebbuudd hhaass bbeeeenn ccuutt oouutt,, tthhaatt tthhiiss
iiss tthhee rreevveerrssee ssiiddee ooff tthhee hhoollee NNoorrmmaann ppeeeeppeedd tthhrroouugghh ttoo
wwaattcchh MMaarryy.. AAnndd wwee sseeee tthhee ppuuppiill ooff NNoorrmmaann''ss eeyyee nnooww..
SSAAMM''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
AAllll rriigghhtt.. II''llll ffiinndd BBaatteess aanndd
kkeeeepp hhiimm ooccccuuppiieedd..
TThhee eeyyee mmoovveess aawwaayy aanndd tthheerree iiss aa bbrriieeff ffllaasshh ooff lliigghhtt
bbeeffoorree tthhee hhoollee iiss ccoovveerreedd,, oonn tthhee ootthheerr ssiiddee,, bbyy tthhee
wwaallll--hhuunngg ppaaiinnttiinngg..
FFRREESSHH AANNGGLLEE -- LLIILLAA AANNDD SSAAMM
TThheeyy aarree aabboouutt ttoo ssttaarrtt oouutt.. SSaamm ssttooppss hheerr aaggaaiinn..
SSAAMM
WWaaiitt aa mmiinnuuttee.. IIff yyoouu ggeett aannyytthhiinngg
oouutt ooff tthhee mmootthheerr ......
((AA tthhoouugghhtt))
CCaann yyoouu ffiinndd yyoouurr wwaayy bbaacckk ttoo ttoowwnn??
((AAss LLiillaa nnooddss yyeess))
IIff yyoouu ddoo ggeett aannyytthhiinngg,, ddoonn''tt ssttoopp
ttoo tteellll mmee..
LLiillaa nnooddss qquuiicckkllyy,, hhuurrrriieess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr.. SSaamm ggeettss ttoo iitt
ffiirrsstt,, ooppeennss iitt aa sslliigghhtt ccrraacckk,, llooookkss oouutt,, tthheenn ooppeennss iitt
wwiiddee eennoouugghh ffoorr LLiillaa aanndd HHiimmsseellff ttoo ppaassss tthhrroouugghh..
EEXXTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL -- ((DDAAYY))
AAnnggllee cclloossee oonn ccaabbiinn oonnee aass LLiillaa ccoommeess oouutt,, ttuurrnnss ttoo hheerr
lleefftt,, ggooeess aalloonngg ppoorrcchh ttoowwaarrdd ccaabbiinn ttwweellvvee.. SSaamm rreemmaaiinnss
aatt tthhee ddoooorr,, tthheenn ttuurrnnss rriigghhtt,, hheeaaddiinngg ffoorr tthhee ppaatthh.. AAss
hhee ppaasssseess tthhee ooffffiiccee,, hhee iiss sshhoocckkeedd ttoo sseeee NNoorrmmaann
ssttaannddiinngg jjuusstt iinnssiiddee tthhee ooppeenn ddoooorr..
NNOORRMMAANN
LLooookkiinngg ffoorr mmee??
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111122..
SSAAMM
((RReeccoovveerriinngg))
YYeess,, mmaatttteerr ooff ffaacctt..
((TThhee ffrriieennddllyy ggrriinn))
TThhee wwiiffee''ss ttaakkiinngg aa nnaapp aanndd ...... II
ccaann nneevveerr kkeeeepp qquuiieett eennoouugghh ffoorr hheerr
...... ssoo II tthhoouugghhtt II''dd llooookk yyoouu uupp
aanndd ...... ttaallkk..
NNOORRMMAANN
SSaattiissffiieedd wwiitthh yyoouurr ccaabbiinn??
SSAAMM
FFiinnee..
SSaamm ssttaarrttss iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee.. JJuusstt bbeeffoorree ggooiinngg iinn,, hhee
ggllaanncceess ddoowwnn tthhee lloonngg ppoorrcchh,, sseeeess LLiillaa ssttaannddiinngg oouuttssiiddee
tthhee ddoooorr ooff ccaabbiinn ttwweellvvee,, wwaavveess hheerr aa ttiinnyy ""aallll cclleeaarr""
ssiiggnnaall..
LLIILLAA
CCAAMMEERRAA AANNGGLLEESS ttoo iinncclluuddee LLiillaa aanndd hheerr ppooiinntt ooff vviieeww..
SShhee wwaattcchheess SSaamm ddiissaappppeeaarr iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee,, wwaaiittss uunnttiill
sshhee hheeaarrss tthhee ddoooorr cclloossee,, tthheenn llooookkss aabboouutt ffoorr aannootthheerr
wwaayy ttoo rreeaacchh tthhee hhoouussee.. SShhee sseeeess tthhee ssmmaallll aalllleeyy aatt tthhee
eenndd ooff tthhiiss LL ooff ccaabbiinnss,, ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd iitt..
EEXXTT.. RREEAARR OOFF MMOOTTEELL -- SS..CC..UU.. LLIILLAA -- ((DDAAYY))
BBeehhiinndd tthhee mmootteell LLiillaa hheessiittaatteess.. SShhee llooookkss aahheeaadd..
LLOONNGG SSHHOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee oolldd hhoouussee ssttaannddiinngg aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee sskkyy..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa mmoovveess ffoorrwwaarrdd..
LLOONNGG SSHHOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee CCAAMMEERRAA aapppprrooaacchhiinngg tthhee hhoouussee..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa ggllaanncceess ttoowwaarrdd tthhee bbaacckk ooff NNoorrmmaann''ss ppaarrlloorr.. SShhee
mmoovveess oonn..
LLOONNGG SSHHOOTT -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee hhoouussee ccoommiinngg nneeaarreerr..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111133..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa llooookkss uupp aatt tthhee hhoouussee.. SShhee mmoovveess ffoorrwwaarrdd
ppuurrppoosseeffuullllyy..
SS..LL..SS.. -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee hhoouussee aanndd tthhee ppoorrcchh..
CCLLOOSSEE UUPP -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa ssttooppss aatt tthhee hhoouussee aanndd llooookkss uupp.. SShhee ggllaanncceess bbaacckk..
SShhee ttuurrnnss ttoo tthhee hhoouussee aaggaaiinn..
SS..LL..SS.. -- ((DDAAYY))
TThhee CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOUUNNTTSS tthhee sstteeppss ttoo tthhee ppoorrcchh..
CC..UU.. -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa ppuuttss oouutt hheerr hhaanndd..
SS..CC..UU.. -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa''ss hhaanndd ppuusshheess tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn.. WWee sseeee tthhee hhaallllwwaayy..
LLiillaa EENNTTEERRSS PPAASSTT CCAAMMEERRAA..
IINNTT.. DDOOWWNNSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLLWWAAYY OOFF OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr,, rreemmaaiinnss bbyy iitt ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, qquuiieett,,
lliisstteenniinngg.. HHeerr eeyyeess ssccaann tthhee llaayyoouutt,, tthhee cclloosseedd ddoooorr
wwhhiicchh lleeaaddss ooffff tthhee hhaallllwwaayy,, ttoo tthhee ddiinniinngg rroooomm oonn tthhee
rriigghhtt aanndd tthhee ppaarrlloorr oonn tthhee lleefftt.. DDoowwnn aatt tthhee eenndd ooff
tthhee hhaallll iiss tthhee kkiittcchheenn,, tthhee ddoooorr wwiiddee ooppeenn,, tthhee rroooomm
bbeeyyoonndd ddiimm aanndd ssiilleenntt.. SShhee nnoottiicceess tthhee ssttaaiirrss lleeaaddiinngg
ddoowwnn ttoo tthhee bbaasseemmeenntt,, ssttaarreess aatt tthheemm,, tthheenn bbaacckk ttoo tthhee
ssttaaiirrss lleeaaddiinngg ttoo tthhee sseeccoonndd fflloooorr.. SShhee ssttaarrttss ffoorrwwaarrdd,,
aanndd sseeeemmss aabboouutt ttoo iinnvveessttiiggaattee tthhee ppaarrlloorr aanndd ddiinniinngg
rroooomm..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
NNoorrmmaann iiss bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, ssttaannddiinngg,, ssttaarriinngg aatt SSaamm
wwhhoo iiss ssiittttiinngg rreellaaxxeeddllyy oonn aa ssmmaallll ssooffaa.. NNoorrmmaann hhaass
tthhee llooookk ooff oonnee wwhhoo iiss pprrootteeccttiinngg hhiimmsseellff,, aass iiff tthhee
ccoouunntteerr wweerree aa pprrootteeccttiivvee wwaallll aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee tthhrreeaatteenniinngg
wwoorrlldd aaccrroossss iitt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111144..
SSAAMM
((CChheeeerrffuullllyy,, aass iiff
aafftteerr aa sseellff--
ccoonnsscciioouuss ppaauussee))
II''vvee bbeeeenn ddooiinngg aallll tthhee ttaallkkiinngg ssoo
ffaarr,, hhaavveenn''tt II??
NNOORRMMAANN
YYeess..
SSAAMM
II aallwwaayyss tthhoouugghhtt iitt wwaass tthhee ppeeooppllee
wwhhoo aarree aalloonnee ssoo mmuucchh wwhhoo ddoo aallll
tthhee ttaallkkiinngg wwhheenn tthheeyy ggeett tthhee
cchhaannccee.. YYeett tthheerree yyoouu aarree,, ddooiinngg
aallll tthhee lliisstteenniinngg!!
((AA ppaauussee))
YYoouu aarree aalloonnee hheerree,, aarreenn''tt yyoouu??
((AAss NNoorrmmaann ddooeess nnoott
rreeppllyy))
IItt wwoouulldd ddrriivvee mmee ccrraazzyy..
NNOORRMMAANN
TThhaatt wwoouulldd bbee aa rraatthheerr eexxttrreemmee
rreeaaccttiioonn,, wwoouullddnn''tt iitt??
SSAAMM
((LLiigghhttllyy))
JJuusstt aann eexxpprreessssiioonn ......
((MMoorree sseerriioouussllyy))
WWhhaatt II mmeeaanntt wwaass ...... II''dd ddoo jjuusstt
aabboouutt aannyytthhiinngg ...... ttoo ggeett aawwaayy..
WWoouullddnn''tt yyoouu??
IINNTT.. DDOOWWNNSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLLWWAAYY AANNDD SSTTAAIIRRSS OOFF OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa iiss hhaallffwwaayy uupp tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. AAss sshhee cclliimmbbss sshhee iiss
ssttaarrttlleedd bbyy tthhee ccrreeaakkss aanndd ggrrooaannss ooff tthhee oolldd wwoooodd ooff tthhee
sstteeppss.. SShhee sstteeppss mmoorree ccaarreeffuullllyy.. CCAAMMEERRAA rreemmaaiinnss aatt
ffoooott ooff ssttaaiirr,, TTIILLTTIINNGG UUPP aass LLiillaa cclliimmbbss.. SShhee ppaauusseess aatt
tthhee hheeaadd ooff tthhee ssttaaiirr.. TThhee ddoooorr oonn hheerr rriigghhtt,, wwhhiicchh
ooppeennss iinnttoo tthhee mmootthheerr''ss rroooomm,, iiss cclloosseedd.. TToo hheerr lleefftt iiss
aannootthheerr ddoooorr,, hhaallff--ooppeenn.. DDiirreeccttllyy bbeeffoorree hheerr iiss aa tthhiirrdd
ddoooorr,, cclloosseedd.. SShhee hhoollddss aa lloonngg mmoommeenntt,, ttrryyiinngg ttoo
ppiiccttuurree iinn hheerr mmiinndd wwhhiicchh rroooomm wwoouulldd llooookk oouutt oonn tthhee
ffrroonntt ooff tthhee hhoouussee,, ddeecciiddeess,, cchhoooosseess tthhee ccoorrrreecctt ddoooorr,,
tthhee oonnee oonn hheerr rriigghhtt.. SShhee ggooeess ttoo iitt,, kknnoocckkss lliigghhttllyy..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTHHEERR''SS RROOOOMM -- ((DDAAYY)) -- CCLLOOSSEE AANNGGLLEE OONN DDOOOORR
WWee hheeaarr LLiillaa''ss sseeccoonndd kknnoocckk,, tthheenn,, ffaaiinnttllyy,, hheerr ssoofftt
ccaallll..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111155..
LLIILLAA''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
MMrrss.. BBaatteess??
TThheerree iiss qquuiieett ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn tthhee ddoooorr bbeeggiinnss ttoo
ooppeenn,, aanndd wwee sseeee LLiillaa.. SShhee ssttaannddss oonn tthhee tthhrreesshhoolldd,,
llooookkiinngg iinn aatt tthhee rroooomm,, iinnssttaannttllyy ddiissttuurrbbeedd bbyy iitt,,
aallmmoosstt cchhiilllleedd,, hheerr eexxpprreessssiioonn iinnddiiccaattiinngg aann iimmppuullssee ttoo
cclloossee tthhee ddoooorr aanndd ggoo aawwaayy ffrroomm tthhiiss rroooomm ffoorreevveerr..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, sshhee eenntteerrss,, lleeaavviinngg tthhee ddoooorr ooppeenn bbeehhiinndd
hheerr.. CCAAMMEERRAA PPUULLLLSS BBAACCKK AANNDD AAWWAAYY aanndd wwee nnooww sseeee tthhee rroooomm
aass LLiillaa sseeeess iitt..
IItt iiss oorrnnaattee,, ddaammaasskk--aanndd--mmaahhooggaannyy,, tthhiicckk aanndd wwaarrmm aanndd
rriippee,, aann oollllaa ppooddrriiddaa ooff mmiissmmaatteedd ffuurrnniisshhiinnggss aanndd bbrriicc--aa--
bbrraacc ooff tthhee llaasstt cceennttuurryy.. TThhee bbeedd iiss ffoouurr ppoosstteerr,, bbuutt
uunnccaannoopplleedd;; tthhee ddrreessssiinngg ttaabbllee iiss ffaannccyy aanndd fflloouunncceedd
wwiitthh ssaattiinn;; tthheerree iiss aa ggrreeaatt cchhiiffffoonniieerr,, aa bbiigg--ddoooorreedd
wwaarrddrroobbee,, aa llaarrggee,, oovvaall,, ffuullll--lleennggtthh ppiieerr--ggllaassss ((tthhiiss
aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee wwaallll ddiirreeccttllyy ooppppoossiittee tthhee ddoooorr)),, aa ssaattiinn
rreeccaammiieerr,, aann uupphhoollsstteerreedd aarrmmcchhaaiirr bbyy tthhee wwiinnddooww,, aa wwhhiittee
mmaarrbbllee ffiirreeppllaaccee,, iittss ggrraattee ccoolldd bbuutt ppiilleedd wwiitthh aasshheess..
AAnndd tthheerree iiss iinn tthhee rroooomm aann uunnmmiissttaakkaabbllyy lliivvee qquuaalliittyy,,
aass iiff eevveenn tthhoouugghh iitt iiss pprreesseennttllyy uunnooccccuuppiieedd,, iitt hhaass nnoott
bbeeeenn lloonngg vvaaccaatteedd bbyy ssoommee mmuussttyy pprreesseennccee..
LLiillaa ggllaanncceess aatt tthhee bbeedd.. TThhee ddaammaasskk ccoovveerrlleett iiss tthhrroowwnn
oovveerr iitt,, bbuutt iitt iiss nnoott nneeaatt,, tthheerree iiss tthhee iimmpprriinntt ooff aa
bbooddyy oonn iitt,, aa bbooddyy wwhhiicchh oobbvviioouussllyy hhaass sslleepptt iinn aa ccuurrlleedd--
uupp,, wwoommbb--lliikkee ppoossiittiioonn.. LLiillaa ssttaarreess aatt iitt ffoorr aa mmoommeenntt,,
tthheenn ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddrreessssiinngg ttaabbllee.. IIttss ttoopp iiss ssccaatttteerreedd
wwiitthh bbooxxeess aanndd jjaarrss ooff ccoossmmeettiiccss aanndd ccrreeaammss,, ttrraacceess ooff
ffrreesshh ppoowwddeerr,, aann ooppeenneedd bboottttllee oorr ppeerrffuummee,, aa ccoommbb,, aanndd
aa bbrruusshh wwiitthh ttrraacceess ooff hhaaiirr iinn iittss bbrriissttlleess.. LLiillaa mmoovveess
oonn,, ccaattcchheess aa gglliimmppssee ooff hheerrsseellff iinn tthhee ppiieerr--ggllaassss,, iiss
ssttaarrttlleedd,, ttuurrnnss aawwaayy,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee cchhiiffffoonniieerr,, iiss aabboouutt
ttoo ooppeenn aa ddrraawweerr,, sseeeess tthhee hhiigghh wwaarrddrroobbee oouutt ooff tthhee
ccoorrnneerr ooff hheerr eeyyeess,, ggooeess ttoo iitt,, hheessiittaannttllyy.. SShhee ooppeennss
oonnee ddoooorr.. FFrreesshh,, cclleeaann,, wweellll pprreesssseedd ddrreesssseess hhaanngg
nneeaattllyy.. LLiillaa ooppeennss tthhee ootthheerr ddoooorr.. TThhee sswweeaatteerrss aanndd
ddrreesssseess aanndd rroobbeess hhaanngg ffrreeeellyy,, nnoonnee iinn mmootthh--pprrooooff,,
ssttoorraaggee--ttyyppee bbaaggss.. TThheerree iiss eevveenn aa wweellll--bbrruusshheedd ccoollllaarr
ooff ffooxxeess.. AAlloonngg tthhee fflloooorr ooff tthhee wwaarrddrroobbee iiss aa lliinnee ooff
cclleeaann,, ppoolliisshheedd sshhooeess.. LLiillaa ssttaarreess,, tthheenn cclloosseess tthhee
ddoooorr,, ttuurrnnss,, llooookkss oonnccee aaggaaiinn oovveerr tthhee wwhhoollee rroooomm,,
ssttaarrttss oouutt,,
IINNTT.. TTHHEE UUPPSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLLWWAAYY OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa ccoommeess oouutt ooff tthhee mmootthheerr''ss rroooomm,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr
bbeehhiinndd hheerr,, llooookkss ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss,, tthheenn ssttaarrttss aaccrroossss
tthhee hhaallll ttoo tthhee rroooomm wwhhoossee ddoooorr iiss hhaallff--ooppeenn.. TThhee rroooomm
wwiitthhiinn iiss ddaarrkk,, tthhee sshhaaddeess ddrraawwnn ffuullll..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111166..
LLiillaa ppaauusseess oonn tthhee tthhrreesshhoolldd,, rreeaacchheess iinn,, ffeeeellss tthhee
wwaallll,, tthhrroowwss oonn aa sswwiittcchh..
IINNTT.. MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
SSaamm hhaass rriisseenn,, iiss ssttaannddiinngg bbyy tthhee ccoouunntteerr nnooww..
SSAAMM
II''mm nnoott ssaayyiinngg yyoouu sshhoouullddnn''tt bbee
ccoonntteenntteedd hheerree,, II''mm jjuusstt ddoouubbttiinngg
tthhaatt yyoouu aarree.. II tthhiinnkk iiff yyoouu ssaaww
aa cchhaannccee ttoo ggeett oouutt ffrroomm uunnddeerr ......
yyoouu''dd uunnllooaadd tthhiiss ppllaaccee ......
NNOORRMMAANN
((AAnnggrriillyy))
TThhiiss ppllaaccee!! TThhiiss iissnn''tt ''aa ppllaaccee..''
IItt''ss mmyy oonnllyy wwoorrlldd.. II ggrreeww uupp iinn
tthhaatt hhoouussee bbaacckk tthheerree.. II wwaass aa
hhaappppyy cchhiilldd.. MMyy mmootthheerr aanndd II ......
wwee wweerree mmoorree tthhaann hhaappppyy..
SSAAMM
AAnndd nnooww tthhaatt yyoouurr mmootthheerr''ss ddeeaadd??
NNoorrmmaann ssnnaappss aa sshhaarrpp,, ffaasstt,, uuggllyy llooookk aatt hhiimm..
NNOORRMMAANN
MMyy mmootthheerr iiss nnoott ddeeaadd!!
SSAAMM
((SSooffttllyy))
II ddiiddnn''tt tthhiinnkk ssoo..
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS RROOOOMM IINN TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa iiss ssttaannddiinngg iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy,, ssttaarriinngg aatt tthhee rroooomm iinn
ssiicckk ddiissmmaayy.. TThhee rroooomm iiss ggrrootteessqquuee,, aa hhoorrrriibbllee,,
lluuddiiccrroouuss ffaannttaassyy ooff cchhiillddhhoooodd hheelldd bbeeyyoonndd tthhee ppooiinntt ooff
ddeecceennccyy..
IItt iiss aa ssmmaallll rroooomm.. TThhee wwaallllss aarree ffaanncciieedd wwiitthh rroommppiinngg
ssiillhhoouueetttteess ooff tteeddddyy--bbeeaarrss aanndd ssaaiillbbooaattss aanndd ccaarroouusseellss
aanndd ffaatt ccoowwss jjuummppiinngg oovveerr aagghhaasstt mmoooonnss.. TThhee bbeedd iiss
ssmmaallll,, ffaarr ttoooo sshhoorrtt ffoorr aa mmaann ooff NNoorrmmaann''ss hheeiigghhtt.. AAnndd
yyeett tthhee rruummpplleedd ccoovveerrss iinnddiiccaattee tthhaatt iitt iiss iinn tthhiiss bbeedd
tthhaatt NNoorrmmaann sslleeeeppss.. NNeexxtt ttoo tthhee bbeedd iiss aann oolldd--ffaasshhiioonneedd
ttooyy cchheesstt.. OOnn iittss ttoopp tthheerree aarree aa bbiirrdd--iinn--aa--ccaaggee llaammpp,,
aa ppllaaiinn--bboouunndd bbooookk,, aanndd aann aasshh ttrraayy ffiilllleedd wwiitthh aasshheess
aanndd cciiggaarreettttee ssttuubbss.. AA ggrroowwnn mmaann''ss sshhiirrtt hhaannggss oonn aa
cchhiilldd''ss ccllootthheess ttrreeee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111177..
AAggaaiinnsstt oonnee wwaallll tthheerree iiss aa nnaarrrrooww,, hhiigghh bbooookkccaassee ffiilllleedd
wwiitthh tthhiicckk,, uunncchhiillddiisshh--llooookkiinngg bbooookkss.. OOnn tthhee ssmmaallll,,
wwhhiittee cchheesstt ooff ddrraawweerrss tthheerree iiss aann oolldd,, cchhiilldd''ss
vviiccttrroollaa.. TThhee rreeccoorrdd oonn tthhee ttuurrnnttaabbllee iiss ddiissccoovveerreedd,, oonn
cclloossee iinnssppeeccttiioonn,, ttoo bbee BBeeeetthhoovveenn''ss EErrooiiccaa SSyymmpphhoonnyy..
LLiillaa ssttuuddiieess tthhee rroooomm,, ffaasscciinnaatteedd aanndd rreeppeelllleedd.. SShhee
ggllaanncceess aatt tthhee bbooookkccaassee,, ccoommeess iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm,, ggooeess ttoo
tthhee bbooookkccaassee aanndd ppuullllss oouutt aa tthhiicckk,, llaarrggee,, ppllaaiinn--bboouunndd
bbooookk.. SShhee ooppeennss iitt.. HHeerr eeyyeess ggoo wwiiddee iinn sshhoocckk.. AAnndd
tthheenn tthheerree iiss ddiissgguusstt.. SShhee ssllaammss tthhee bbooookk cclloosseedd,, ddrrooppss
iitt..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE MMOOTTEELL OOFFFFIICCEE -- ((DDAAYY))
NNoorrmmaann,, bbeehhiinndd tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, hhaass mmoovveedd bbaacckk aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee
wwaallll.. SSaamm iiss ssttiillll oonn tthhee ootthheerr ssiiddee ooff tthhee ccoouunntteerr,,
bbuutt iiss lleeaanniinngg ffoorrwwaarrdd,, hhiiss eeyyeess hhaarrdd oonn NNoorrmmaann''ss ffaaccee..
NNoorrmmaann''ss ffaaccee iiss nnoo lloonnggeerr eexxpprreessssiioonnlleessss.. IItt hhaass tthhee
ssttaarrkk,, hhiigghh sshheeeenn ooff aa ccoorrnneerreedd aanniimmaall..
SSAAMM
((PPrreessssiinngg))
YYoouu llooookk ffrriigghhtteenneedd.. HHaavvee II bbeeeenn
ssaayyiinngg ssoommeetthhiinngg ffrriigghhtteenniinngg??
NNOORRMMAANN
II ddoonn''tt kknnooww wwhhaatt yyoouu''vvee bbeeeenn
ssaayyiinngg..
SSAAMM
II''vvee bbeeeenn ttaallkkiinngg aabboouutt yyoouurr mmootthheerr
...... aabboouutt yyoouurr mmootteell.. HHooww aarree yyoouu
ggooiinngg ttoo ddoo iitt??
NNOORRMMAANN
DDoo wwhhaatt??
SSAAMM
BBuuyy aa nneeww oonnee!! IInn aa nneeww ttoowwnn!!
WWhheerree yyoouu wwoonn''tt hhaavvee ttoo hhiiddee yyoouurr
mmootthheerr!!
NNOORRMMAANN
SShhuutt uupp!!
SSAAMM
WWhheerree wwiillll yyoouu ggeett tthhee mmoonneeyy ttoo ddoo
tthhaatt,, BBaatteess ...... oorr ddoo yyoouu aallrreeaaddyy
hhaavvee iitt ...... ssoocckkeedd aawwaayy ...... aa lloott
ooff iitt ......
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111188..
NNOORRMMAANN
LLeeaavvee mmee aalloonnee!!
SSAAMM
...... FFoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss!!
NNOORRMMAANN
LLeeaavvee mmee aalloonnee!!
HHee iiss cclloossee ttoo ppaanniicc nnooww.. HHee ttuurrnnss,, sswwiiffttllyy,, ddaasshheess
bbaacckk iinnttoo hhiiss pprriivvaattee ppaarrlloorr.. SSaamm ggooeess qquuiicckkllyy aarroouunndd
tthhee ccoouunntteerr,, ffoolllloowwss..
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS PPRRIIVVAATTEE PPAARRLLOORR -- ((DDAAYY))
NNoorrmmaann hheeaarrss SSaamm ffoolllloowwiinngg,, wwaannttss ttoo rruunn,, ttoo nneevveerr bbee
rreeaacchheedd bbyy tthhiiss mmaann.. HHee ccrroosssseess tthhee ssmmaallll rroooomm,, ddrraawwnn
ttoo tthhee rreeaarr wwiinnddooww,, aass iiff hhee mmiigghhtt ffllyy tthhrroouugghh iitt.. SSaamm
eenntteerrss,, ppaauusseess.. NNoorrmmaann ttuurrnnss,, bbaacckk aaggaaiinnsstt tthhee wwiinnddooww,,
aass uunnaabbllee ttoo ffllyy aawwaayy aass aarree tthhee mmaannyy ssttiillll,, ssttuuffffeedd
bbiirrddss.. SSaamm rreeggiisstteerrss aa bbrriieeff fflliicckkeerr ooff rreeaaccttiioonn wwhheenn
hhee sseeeess tthhee bbiirrddss,, bbuutt ccoonnttiinnuueess ttoo ggaazzee aatt NNoorrmmaann,, hhaarrdd..
SSAAMM
II bbeett yyoouurr mmootthheerr kknnoowwss wwhheerree tthhee
mmoonneeyy iiss.. AAnndd wwhhaatt yyoouu ddiidd ttoo ggeett
iitt.. AAnndd II tthhiinnkk sshhee''llll tteellll uuss..
SSoommeetthhiinngg sseellff--aassssuurreedd aanndd ccoonnffiiddeenntt iinn SSaamm''ss ttoonnee ggiivveess
NNoorrmmaann aa nneeww,, mmoorree tteerrrriiffiieedd aallaarrmm.. HHee ttuurrnnss hhiiss hheeaadd,,
ggllaanncceess oouutt tthhee wwiinnddooww aatt tthhee oolldd hhoouussee.. HHee llooookkss bbaacckk
aatt SSaamm aanndd tthheerree iiss tteerrrroorr iinn hhiiss vvooiiccee..
NNOORRMMAANN
WWhheerree''ss tthhaatt ggiirrll?? TThhee ggiirrll yyoouu
ccaammee wwiitthh!! WWhheerree iiss sshhee??
SSaamm ddooeess nnoott rreessppoonndd,, ssmmiilleess aa hhaallff--ssmmiillee,, ttuurrnnss ttoo
eexxaammiinnee aa ssttuuffffeedd oowwll.. NNoorrmmaann llooookkss bbaacckk aatt tthhee hhoouussee..
NNOORRMMAANN
((AA hhoorrrriibbllee ggrrooaann))
OOhh,, GGoodd!!
IINNTT.. UUPPSSTTAAIIRRSS HHAALLLL OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa,, sshhaakkeenn aanndd ddiissttuurrbbeedd,, aallmmoosstt ssiicckkeenneedd,, iiss ccoommiinngg
oouutt ooff NNoorrmmaann''ss rroooomm.. SShhee hhaass lleefftt tthhee lliigghhtt oonn.. SShhee
ppaauusseess iinn tthhee mmiiddddllee ooff tthhee llaannddiinngg,, llooookkss aatt tthhee cclloosseedd
ddoooorr ooppppoossiittee tthhee ssttaaiirrss,, ggooeess ttoo iitt,, ooppeennss iitt,, sseeeess
tthhaatt iitt iiss tthhee bbaatthhrroooomm,, ppuullllss tthhee ddoooorr ttoo,, ttuurrnnss,,
ssttaarrttss ttoowwaarrdd tthhee ssttaaiirrss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 111199..
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS PPRRIIVVAATTEE PPAARRLLOORR -- ((DDAAYY))
SSaamm iiss llyyiinngg oonn tthhee fflloooorr,, ffaaccee ddoowwnnwwaarrdd,, uunnmmoovviinngg.. AA
ccaannddlleessttiicckk iiss oonn tthhee fflloooorr,, cclloossee bbyy hhiiss hheeaadd,, ssttiillll
rroocckkiinngg aass iiff jjuusstt ddrrooppppeedd.. OOVVEERR SSHHOOTT ccoommeess tthhee SSOOUUNNDD
ooff NNoorrmmaann''ss ffoooottsstteeppss aanndd CCAAMMEERRAA TTUURRNNSS iinn ttiimmee ttoo ccaattcchh
aa bbrriieeff gglliimmppssee ooff hhiimm ggooiinngg oouutt iinnttoo tthhee ooffffiiccee,, aallmmoosstt
aatt aa rruunn..
IINNTT.. SSTTAAIIRRWWAAYY OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa iiss oonn tthhee ttoopp sstteepp,, llooookkiinngg ddoowwnn ttoowwaarrdd CCAAMMEERRAA..
SShhee iiss lliisstteenniinngg,, hhooppiinngg ttoo hheeaarr ssoommee hhuummaann ssoouunndd,, ssoommee
ssoouunndd sshhee mmiigghhtt ffoollllooww,, ppuurrssuuee.. SShhee hheeaarrss nnootthhiinngg.. SShhee
ssttaarrttss ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss.. JJuusstt bbeellooww tthhee hhaallffwwaayy sstteepp,,
sshhee llooookkss aatt tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr,, sseeeess oouutt tthhrroouugghh tthhee ddoooorr
wwiinnddooww::
LLIILLAA''SS VVIIEEWWPPOOIINNTT -- ((DDAAYY))
NNoorrmmaann ccoommiinngg..
IINNTT.. SSTTAAIIRRWWAAYY OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt LLiillaa ppaanniiccss,, tthheenn sshhee hhuurrrriieess ddoowwnn tthhee
sstteeppss,, ccaannnnoott ggoo iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee ffrroonntt ddoooorr,,
rreemmeemmbbeerrss tthhee ssttaaiirrwwaayy bbeehhiinndd hheerr,, ttuurrnnss aanndd rruunnss iinn
tthhaatt ddiirreeccttiioonn.. TThhee SSOOUUNNDD ooff NNoorrmmaann bboouunnddiinngg uupp tthhee
ppoorrcchh sstteeppss ccaann bbee hheeaarrdd.. LLiillaa ttuurrnnss aanndd ddaasshheess ddoowwnn
tthhee ssttaaiirrss wwhhiicchh lleeaadd ttoo tthhee bbaasseemmeenntt,, ggooiinngg ddoowwnn ffaarr
eennoouugghh ttoo ccoonncceeaall hheerrsseellff,, ccrroouucchhiinngg tthheerree..
NNoorrmmaann eenntteerrss tthhee hhaallllwwaayy,, cclloosseess tthhee ddoooorr ssooffttllyy,,
lliisstteennss.. HHee ggllaanncceess oonnccee iinn tthhee ddiirreeccttiioonn ooff tthhee
bbaasseemmeenntt ssttaaiirrss.. HHee sseeeemmss aabboouutt ttoo ssmmiillee,, wwhheenn ssuuddddeennllyy
aallll eexxpprreessssiioonn vvaanniisshheess ffrroomm hhiiss ffaaccee,, aanndd hhee aappppeeaarrss ttoo
eenntteerr aa nnoo--ppllaaccee,, nnoo--ttiimmee ssttaattee.. HHee ccrroosssseess ttoo tthhee
ssttaaiirrwwaayy,, ggooeess uupp..
LLiillaa rreemmaaiinnss ccrroouucchheedd oonn tthhee bbaasseemmeenntt ssttaaiirrss,, lliisstteenniinngg
ttoo tthhee SSOOUUNNDDSS ooff NNoorrmmaann.. HHiiss ffoooottsstteeppss oonn tthhee ssttaaiirrss
ffoolllloowweedd bbyy tthhee ffaasstt nnooiisseess ooff ddoooorrss ooppeenniinngg,, ooff ffaasstt
mmoovviinngg aabboouutt aann uuppssttaaiirrss rroooomm.. CCoonnvviinncceedd tthhaatt hhee iiss
sseeaarrcchhiinngg tthhee uuppssttaaiirrss ffoorr hheerr,, sshhee ddeecciiddeess ttoo cchhaannccee aann
eessccaappee.. SShhee ssttaarrttss uupp tthhee sstteeppss,, iiss aabboouutt ttoo ttuurrnn iinnttoo
tthhee hhaallllwwaayy wwhheenn hheerr eeyyee iiss ccaauugghhtt bbyy aa gglliimmmmeerr ooff lliigghhtt
ddoowwnn iinn tthhee bbaasseemmeenntt.. SShhee ppaauusseess,, llooookkss ddoowwnn,, sseeeess tthhee
ccrraacckk ooff lliigghhtt ccoommiinngg ffrroomm bbeehhiinndd tthhee nnoott eennttiirreellyy
cclloosseedd ddoooorr ttoo tthhee ffrruuiitt cceellllaarr.. TThhee sswwiifftt mmoovviinngg
SSOOUUNNDDSS ooff NNoorrmmaann ccoonnttiinnuuee ttoo ccoommee ffrroomm uuppssttaaiirrss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112200..
LLiillaa iiss ttoorrnn,, kknnoowwss sshhee sshhoouulldd ggeett oouutt ooff tthhee hhoouussee
wwhhiillee sshhee hhaass tthhee cchhaannccee,, iiss uunnaabbllee ttoo rreessiisstt tthhee
iimmppuullssee ttoo cchheecckk tthhaatt hhiiddddeenn--llooookkiinngg rroooomm ddoowwnn bbeellooww,, aa
rroooomm iinn wwhhiicchh,, sshhee ddeessppeerraatteellyy bbeelliieevveess,, tthheerree mmuusstt lliiee
ssoommee aannsswweerr ttoo wwhhaatt hhaappppeenneedd ttoo MMaarryy.. SShhee ttuurrnnss aanndd
ggooeess ssooffttllyy aanndd qquuiicckkllyy ddoowwnn tthhee ssttaaiirrss..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE BBAASSEEMMEENNTT OOFF TTHHEE OOLLDD HHOOUUSSEE -- ((DDAAYY))
LLiillaa rreeaacchheess tthhee bboottttoomm,, ssttooppss,, lliisstteennss,, hheeaarrss tthhee
ssttaaiirrbbooaarrddss ccrreeaakkiinngg aass ffoooottsstteeppss ffaallll hhaarrdd aanndd mmeeaassuurreedd
uuppoonn tthheemm.. SShhee ttuurrnnss,, ppuullllss ooppeenn tthhee ffrruuiitt cceellllaarr ddoooorr,,
llooookkss iinn.. TThhee wwoommaann iiss ssiittttiinngg iinn aa ccoommffoorrttaabbllee cchhaaiirr,,
tthhee bbaacckk ooff tthhee cchhaaiirr,, aanndd tthhee wwoommaann,, ttuurrnneedd ttoo tthhee
ddoooorr.. LLiillaa ccaallllss aa hhaarrsshh,, ffrriigghhtteenneedd wwhhiissppeerr..
LLIILLAA
MMrrss.. BBaatteess......??
LLiillaa ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm..
IINNTT.. TTHHEE FFRRUUIITT CCEELLLLAARR
LLiillaa ggooeess ttoo tthhee cchhaaiirr,, ttoouucchheess iitt.. TThhee ttoouucchh ddiissttuurrbbss
tthhee ffiigguurree.. IItt ssttaarrttss ttoo ttuurrnn,, sslloowwllyy,, ssttiiffffllyy,, aa cclloocckk--
wwiissee mmoovveemmeenntt.. LLiillaa llooookkss aatt iitt iinn hhoorrrroorr.. IItt iiss tthhee
bbooddyy ooff aa wwoommaann lloonngg ddeeaadd.. TThhee sskkiinn iiss ddrryy aanndd ppuulllleedd
aawwaayy ffrroomm tthhee mmoouutthh aanndd tthhee tteeeetthh aarree rreevveeaalleedd aass iinn tthhee
sskkeelleettoonn''ss ssmmiillee.. TThhee eeyyeess aarree ggoonnee ffrroomm tthheeiirr ssoocckkeettss,,
tthhee bbrriiddggee ooff tthhee nnoossee hhaass ccoollllaappsseedd,, tthhee hhaaiirr iiss ddrryy
aanndd wwiilldd,, tthhee cchheeeekkss aarree ssuunnkkeenn,, tthhee lleeaatthheerryy--bbrroowwnn sskkiinn
iiss ppoowwddeerreedd aanndd rroouuggeedd aanndd ffllaakkyy.. TThhee bbooddyy iiss ddrreesssseedd
iinn aa hhiigghh--nneecckk,, cclleeaann,, wweellll--pprreesssseedd ddrreessss,, oobbvviioouussllyy
rreecceennttllyy llaauunnddeerreedd aanndd hhaanndd--iirroonneedd..
TThhee mmoovveemmeenntt ooff tthhiiss ssttuuffffeedd,, iillll--pprreesseerrvveedd ccaaddaavveerr,,
ttuurrnniinngg aass iiff iinn rreessppoonnssee ttoo LLiillaa''ss ccaallll aanndd ttoouucchh,, iiss
aaccttuuaallllyy ggrraacceeffuull,, bbaalllleett--lliikkee,, aanndd tthhee eeffffeecctt iiss
tteerrrriibbllee aanndd oobbsscceennee..
LLiillaa ggaazzeess ffoorr oonnee fflliicckkeerr ooff aa ddeeaatthhllyy mmoommeenntt,, tthheenn
bbeeggiinnss ttoo ssccrreeaamm,, aa hhiigghh,, ppiieerrcciinngg,, ddrreeaaddffuull ssccrreeaamm..
AAnndd LLiillaa''ss ssccrreeaamm iiss jjooiinneedd bbyy aannootthheerr ssccrreeaamm,, aa mmoorree
ddrreeaaddffuull,, hhoorrrriiffyyiinngg ssccrreeaamm wwhhiicchh ccoommeess ffrroomm tthhee ddoooorr
bbeehhiinndd hheerr..
NNOORRMMAANN''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
((ssccrreeaammiinngg))
AAyyeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee AAmm NNoorrmmaa
BBaatteess!!
LLiillaa ttuurrnnss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112211..
NNOORRMMAANN
HHiiss ffaaccee iiss ccoonnttoorrtteedd.. HHee wweeaarrss aa wwiilldd wwiigg,, aa mmoocckkeerryy
ooff aa wwoommaann''ss hhaaiirr.. HHee iiss ddrreesssseedd iinn aa hhiigghh--nneecckk ddrreessss
wwhhiicchh iiss ssiimmiillaarr ttoo tthhaatt wwoorrnn bbyy tthhee ccoorrppssee ooff hhiiss
mmootthheerr.. HHiiss hhaanndd iiss rraaiisseedd hhiigghh,, ppooiisseedd ttoo ssttrriikkee aatt
LLiillaa.. TThheerree iiss aa lloonngg bbrreeaaddkknniiffee iinn iitt..
LLIILLAA
CClloossee oonn hheerr ffaaccee.. SShhee iiss dduummbb--ssttrruucckk.. HHeerr eeyyeess aarree
ssccrreeaammiinngg..
BBAACCKK TTOO NNOORRMMAANN
AAss hhee iiss aabboouutt ttoo ssttaarrtt ffoorrwwaarrdd,, aa mmaann''ss hhaanndd rreeaacchheess iinn
ffrroomm tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy bbeehhiinndd,, ggrraabbss NNoorrmmaann''ss wwrriisstt.. SSaamm
ccoommeess tthhrroouugghh tthhee ddoooorr,, ssttiillll hhoollddiinngg ttiigghhtt ttoo tthhee
wwrriisstt,, ppuulllliinngg bbaacckk tthhee aarrmm aanndd aatt tthhee ssaammee ttiimmee
tthhrroowwiinngg hhiimmsseellff aatt NNoorrmmaann,, ffoooottbbaallll ttaacckkllee ssttyyllee..
AA SSEERRIIEESS OOFF CCUUTTSS -- TTHHEE FFIIGGHHTT
NNoorrmmaann aanndd SSaamm,, ssttrruugggglliinngg.. TThhee wwiilldd ffuurryy iinn NNoorrmmaann''ss
ffaaccee,, tthhee mmaadd nnooiissee ooff hhiiss ssccrreeaammss aanndd vviillee ccuurrsseess.. TThhee
tteerrrriiffiieedd,, ffiigghhtt--ttoo--tthhee--ddeeaatthh llooookk ooff SSaamm.. TThhee ssttiillll,,
ssttaarriinngg LLiillaa..
MMRRSS.. BBAATTEESS
AA cclloossee ooff hheerr ffaaccee,, SShhee aappppeeaarrss ttoo bbee wwaattcchhiinngg aanndd
eennjjooyyiinngg tthhee ffiigghhtt.. OOvveerr tthhee sshhoott,, tthhee SSOOUUNNDDSS ooff tthhee
ssttrruuggggllee,, tthhee ssccrreeaammss ooff NNoorrmmaann..
DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE TTOO::
EEXXTT.. CCOOUURRTTHHOOUUSSEE AATT RREEAADDIINNGG -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThheerree aarree mmaannyy ppeeooppllee ggaatthheerreedd aabboouutt tthhee sstteeppss,, tthhee
ccuurriioouuss aanndd tthhee ccoonncceerrnneedd aanndd tthhee mmoorrbbiidd.. AAtt tthhee ccuurrbb,,
aa ccoouuppllee ooff nneewwssppaappeerr ccaarrss,, ttwwoo oorr tthhrreeee ppoolliiccee ccaarrss,,
aanndd aa mmoobbiillee uunniitt ttrruucckk ffrroomm tthhee llooccaall tteelleevviissiioonn
oouuttlleett.. TThheerree iiss nnooiissee,, aanndd cchhaatttteerriinngg aass qquueessttiioonnss aarree
aasskkeedd aanndd aannsswweerrss ggiivveenn,, aanndd tthhee ssoouunnddss ooff ttrraaffffiicc,, aanndd
ooff tthhee tteelleevviissiioonn eeqquuiippmmeenntt bbeeiinngg mmoovveedd iinnttoo tthhee
ccoouurrtthhoouussee,, ffoorr oonn--tthhee--sscceennee rreeppoorrttiinngg,, aanndd tthhee sstteerrnn
vvooiicceess ooff ppoolliicceemmeenn ttrryyiinngg ttoo kkeeeepp ppeeooppllee bbaacckk.. TThhee
sscceennee hhaass aa bbrriigghhtt ggllaarree aabboouutt iitt,, tthhaatt qquuaalliittyy ooff
ssuuddddeenn lliigghhtt tthhrroowwnn oonn aa ffeeaarrffuull ddaarrkknneessss..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112222..
CCLLOOSSEERR AANNGGLLEE OONN SSTTEEPPSS OOFF CCOOUURRTTHHOOUUSSEE
AA PPOOLLIICCEEMMAANN ttrryyiinngg ttoo mmaakkee wwaayy ffoorr tthhee tteelleevviissiioonn mmeenn,,
mmuutttteerriinngg ""kkeeeepp bbaacckk,,"" eettcc..,, ttoo tthhee ssppeeccttaattoorrss.. AA
TTEELLEEVVIISSIIOONN MMAANN,, ccaarrrryyiinngg aa ppiieeccee ooff eeqquuiippmmeenntt ggooeess
tthhrroouugghh ddoooorr,, aanndd CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS hhiimm iinnttoo tthhee ccoouurrtthhoouussee
vveessttiibbuullee..
HHeerree,, ttoooo,, tthheerree iiss aa ccrroowwdd,, ccoommppoosseedd ooff PPoolliicceemmeenn,,
RReeppoorrtteerrss,, TTeelleevviissiioonn MMeenn.. TThhee TTeelleevviissiioonn MMeenn wwee hhaavvee
bbeeeenn ffoolllloowwiinngg ssttooppss bbeessiiddee aa PPoolliicceemmaann..
TTEELLEEVVIISSIIOONN MMAANN
((IInnddiiccaattiinngg tthhee ffrroonntt
ddoooorr hhee hhaass jjuusstt ccoommee
iinn tthhrroouugghh))
YYoouu tthhiinnkk tthheeyy''llll ttaakkee hhiimm oouutt tthhaatt
wwaayy??
PPOOLLIICCEEMMAANN
((LLooookkiinngg aatt wwaaiittiinngg
ccrroowwdd,, sshhrruuggggiinngg))
PPrroobbaabbllyy hhaavvee ttoo..
((AA rruueeffuull ssmmiillee))
BBeessiiddeess,, tthhee ttaaxxppaayyeerrss hhaattee iitt wwhheenn
ssoommeetthhiinngg ggeettss sslliippppeedd oouutt tthhee bbaacckk
ddoooorr oonn tthheemm!!
OOvveerr tthhiiss eexxcchhaannggee,, tthhee bbuuzzzz ooff ootthheerr vvooiicceess,, tthhee
mmoovveemmeenntt ooff mmeenn.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS OONN,, ddoowwnn tthhee ccoorrrriiddoorr,,
ggeettss ttoo tthhee ddoooorr ooff tthhee ooffffiiccee ooff tthhee CChhiieeff ooff PPoolliiccee
jjuusstt aass aa yyoouunngg ffeellllooww wwiitthh aa ccaarrttoonn bbooxx ffiilllleedd wwiitthh
ppaappeerr ccoonnttaaiinneerrss ooff sseenntt--oouutt--ffoorr ccooffffeeee rreeaacchheess tthhiiss
ddoooorr.. CCAAMMEERRAA HHOOLLDDSS aass tthhee CCOOFFFFEEEE BBOOYY ppaauusseess aa mmoommeenntt,,
tthheenn ggooeess iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. OOFFFFIICCEE OOFF TTHHEE CCHHIIEEFF OOFF PPOOLLIICCEE -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
LLiillaa iiss sseeaatteedd iinn aa cchhaaiirr,, SSaamm ssttaannddiinngg cclloossee bbyy.. AA bbiitt
aappaarrtt ffrroomm tthheemm,, wwee sseeee SShheerriiffff CChhaammbbeerrss,, iinn qquuiieett
ccoonnffeerreennccee wwiitthh tthhee CCHHIIEEFF OOFF PPOOLLIICCEE,, tthhee CCOOUUNNTTYY SSHHEERRIIFFFF,,
tthhee DDIISSTTRRIICCTT AATTTTOORRNNEEYY..
TThhee CCooffffeeee BBooyy ssttaannddss iinn tthhee ddoooorrwwaayy.. SSaamm ggooeess ttoo hhiimm,,
ttaakkeess aa ccoonnttaaiinneerr ooff ccooffffeeee ffrroomm tthhee bbooxx,, ccaarrrriieess iitt ttoo
LLiillaa,, cchheecckkiinngg tthhee nnoottaattiioonn oonn tthhee lliidd aass hhee ggooeess..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112233..
MMEEDD.. CCLLOOSSEE OONN SSAAMM AANNDD LLIILLAA
SSAAMM
((qquuiieettllyy))
IItt''ss rreegguullaarr.. OOkkaayy??
LLIILLAA
((rruueeffuullllyy))
II ccoouulldd ssttaanndd ssoommeetthhiinngg rreegguullaarr..
SSaamm ssmmiilleess eennccoouurraaggiinnggllyy,, hhaannddss hheerr tthhee ccooffffeeee.. SShheerriiffff
CChhaammbbeerrss EENNTTEERRSS SSHHOOTT,, ggiivveess SSaamm aa ccoonnttaaiinneerr ooff ccooffffeeee hhee
hhaass bbrroouugghhtt ffoorr hhiimm.. SSaamm ttaakkeess iitt,, nnooddss aa tthhaannkk yyoouu..
FFoorr aa mmoommeenntt nnoo oonnee ssppeeaakkss.. LLiillaa llooookkss bbaaddllyy sshhaakkeenn,,
SSaamm ddiisshheevveelleedd,, bbuutt ccoonnttaaiinneedd..
CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
YYoouu ttwwoo ccaann ggoo oonn hhoommee iiff yyoouu lliikkee..
((aa ssyymmppaatthheettiicc llooookk aatt
LLiillaa))
MMaakkiinngg tthhaatt ssttaatteemmeenntt wwaass eennoouugghh
ffoorr oonnee nniigghhtt..
SSAAMM
((ttoo LLiillaa))
WWaanntt ttoo??
LLIILLAA
NNoo.. II''mm aallll rriigghhtt.. II''llll ffeeeell
bbeetttteerr wwhheenn aallll tthhiiss iiss eexxppllaaiinneedd
...... iiff iitt ccaann bbee..
SSaamm llooookkss aa qquueessttiioonn aatt SShheerriiffff CChhaammbbeerrss.. CChhaammbbeerrss
sshhrruuggss ddoouubbttffuullllyy..
CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
IIff aannyybbooddyy ggeettss aannyy aannsswweerrss,, iitt''llll
bbee tthhee ffeellllooww ttaallkkiinngg ttoo hhiimm nnooww
...... tthhee PPssyycchhiiaattrriisstt.. EEvveenn II
ccoouullddnn''tt rreeaacchh NNoorrmmaann ...... aanndd hhee
kknnoowwss mmee..
((ttoo LLiillaa))
YYoouu wwaarrmm eennoouugghh,, MMiissss??
LLiillaa iiss aabboouutt ttoo aannsswweerr,, wwhheenn sshhee sseeeess ssoommeeoonnee ccoommee iinnttoo
tthhee rroooomm aanndd rriisseess aannxxiioouussllyy.. SSaamm aanndd SShheerriiffff CChhaammbbeerrss
ttuurrnn,, ffoollllooww hheerr ggaazzee..
IINNTT.. OOFFFFIICCEE OOFF CCHHIIEEFF OOFF PPOOLLIICCEE -- FFUULLLL SSHHOOTT
AA yyoouunngg mmaann wwiitthh aa sseerriioouuss,, ffrroowwnniinngg ffaaccee hhaass jjuusstt ccoommee
iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm.. HHee iiss DDRR.. SSIIMMOONN,, tthhee PPssyycchhiiaattrriisstt..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112244..
HHee ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddeesskk wwhheerree tthhee bbooxx ooff ccooffffeeee ccoonnttaaiinneerrss
hhaass bbeeeenn ppllaacceedd,, ttaakkeess uupp aa ccoonnttaaiinneerr..
DDIISSTTRRIICCTT AATTTTOORRNNEEYY
DDiidd hhee ttaallkk ttoo yyoouu??
SSIIMMOONN
NNoo.. II ggoott tthhee wwhhoollee ssttoorryy ...... bbuutt
nnoott ffrroomm NNoorrmmaann.. II ggoott iitt ffrroomm ......
hhiiss mmootthheerr..
EEvveerryyoonnee ggaazzeess aatt hhiimm,, mmyyssttiiffiieedd.. HHee ssppeeaakkss aass hhee
rreemmoovveess lliidd ffrroomm ccooffffeeee ccoonnttaaiinneerr..
SSIIMMOONN
NNoorrmmaann BBaatteess nnoo lloonnggeerr eexxiissttss.. HHee
oonnllyy hhaallff--eexxiisstteedd ttoo bbeeggiinn wwiitthh ......
nnooww,, tthhee ootthheerr hhaallff hhaass ttaakkeenn oovveerr..
PPrroobbaabbllyy ffoorr aallll ttiimmee..
LLIILLAA
((WWiitthh ddiiffffiiccuullttyy))
DDiidd hhee kkiillll mmyy ssiisstteerr??
SSIIMMOONN
YYeess ...... aanndd nnoo..
DDIISSTTRRIICCTT AATTTTOORRNNEEYY
LLooookk,, iiff yyoouu''rree ttrryyiinngg ttoo llaayy aa lloott
ooff ppssyycchhiiaattrriicc ggrroouunnddwwoorrkk ffoorr ssoommee
ssoorrtt ooff pplleeaa tthhiiss ffeellllooww wwoouulldd lliikkee
ttoo ccoopp ......
SSIIMMOONN
AA ppssyycchhiiaattrriisstt ddooeessnn''tt llaayy tthhee
ggrroouunnddwwoorrkk ...... hhee mmeerreellyy ttrriieess ttoo
eexxppllaaiinn iitt..
LLIILLAA
BBuutt mmyy ssiisstteerr iiss ......
SSIIMMOONN
YYeess.. II''mm ssoorrrryy..
((ttoo CChhaammbbeerrss))
TThhee PPrriivvaattee IInnvveessttiiggaattoorr,, ttoooo.. IIff
yyoouu ddrraagg tthhaatt sswwaammpp ssoommeewwhheerree iinn
tthhee vviicciinniittyy ooff tthhee mmootteell ......
((TToo tthhee CChhiieeff ooff
PPoolliiccee))
HHaavvee yyoouu aannyy uunnssoollvveedd mmiissssiinngg
ppeerrssoonnss ccaasseess oonn yyoouurr bbooookkss??
CCHHIIEEFF OOFF PPOOLLIICCEE
YYeess.. TTwwoo..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112255..
SSIIMMOONN
YYoouunngg ggiirrllss??
CCHHIIEEFF OOFF PPOOLLIICCEE
((nnooddss,, aassttoouunnddeedd,,
tthheenn::))
DDiidd hhee ccoonnffeessss ttoo ......
SSIIMMOONN
((iinntteerrrruuppttiinngg))
AAss II ssaaiidd,, tthhee mmootthheerr ......
((PPaauusseess,, ggooeess oonn
aaffrreesshh))
TToo uunnddeerrssttaanndd iitt,, aass II uunnddeerrssttoooodd
iitt hheeaarriinngg iitt ffrroomm tthhee mmootthheerr ......
TThhaatt iiss,, ffrroomm tthhee mmootthheerr--hhaallff ooff
NNoorrmmaann''ss mmiinndd,, yyoouu hhaavvee ttoo ggoo bbaacckk
tteenn yyeeaarrss ...... ttoo tthhee ttiimmee wwhheenn
NNoorrmmaann mmuurrddeerreedd hhiiss mmootthheerr aanndd hheerr
lloovveerr..
((AA ppaauussee,, tthheenn aass nnoo
oonnee iinntteerrrruuppttss))
HHee wwaass aallrreeaaddyy ddaannggeerroouussllyy
ddiissttuurrbbeedd,, hhaadd bbeeeenn eevveerr ssiinnccee hhiiss
ffaatthheerr ddiieedd.. HHiiss mmootthheerr wwaass aa
cclliinnggiinngg,, ddeemmaannddiinngg wwoommaann ...... aanndd
ffoorr yyeeaarrss tthhee ttwwoo ooff tthheemm lliivveedd aass
iiff tthheerree wwaass nnoo oonnee eellssee iinn tthhee
wwoorrlldd.. TThheenn sshhee mmeett aa mmaann aanndd iitt
sseeeemmeedd ttoo NNoorrmmaann sshhee ""tthhrreeww hhiimm
oovveerr"" ffoorr tthhiiss mmaann.. TThhaatt ppuusshheedd
hhiimm oovveerr tthhee tthhiinn lliinnee ...... aanndd hhee
kkiilllleedd tthheemm bbootthh.. MMaattrriicciiddee iiss
pprroobbaabbllyy tthhee mmoosstt uunnbbeeaarraabbllee ccrriimmee
ooff aallll ...... aanndd mmoosstt uunnbbeeaarraabbllee ttoo
tthhee ssoonn wwhhoo ccoommmmiitt iitt.. SSoo hhee hhaadd
ttoo eerraassee tthhee ccrriimmee,, aatt lleeaasstt iinn hhiiss
oowwnn mmiinndd..
((AA ppaauussee))
HHee ssttoollee hheerr ccoorrppssee ...... aanndd aa
wweeiigghhtteedd ccooffffiinn wwaass bbuurriieedd.. HHee hhiidd
tthhee bbooddyy iinn tthhee ffrruuiitt cceellllaarr,, eevveenn
""ttrreeaatteedd"" iitt ttoo kkeeeepp iitt aass wweellll aass
iitt wwoouulldd kkeeeepp.. AAnndd tthhaatt ssttiillll
wwaassnn''tt eennoouugghh.. SShhee wwaass tthheerree,, bbuutt
sshhee wwaass aa ccoorrppssee.. SSoo hhee bbeeggaann ttoo
tthhiinnkk aanndd ssppeeaakk ffoorr hheerr,, ggaavvee hheerr
hhaallff hhiiss lliiffee,, ssoo ttoo ssppeeaakk.. AAtt
ttiimmeess hhee ccoouulldd bbee bbootthh
ppeerrssoonnaalliittiieess,, ccaarrrryy oonn
ccoonnvveerrssaattiioonnss ...... aatt ootthheerr ttiimmeess,,
tthhee mmootthheerr--hhaallff ttooookk oovveerr
ccoommpplleetteellyy..
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112266..
SSIIMMOONN ((ccoonntt''dd))
HHee wwaass nneevveerr aallll NNoorrmmaann,, bbuutt hhee wwaass
oofftteenn oonnllyy mmootthheerr.. AAnndd bbeeccaauussee hhee
wwaass ssoo ppaatthhoollooggiiccaallllyy jjeeaalloouuss ooff
hheerr,, hhee aassssuummeedd sshhee wwaass aass jjeeaalloouuss
ooff hhiimm.. TThheerreeffoorree,, iiff hhee ffeelltt aa
ssttrroonngg aattttrraaccttiioonn ttoo aannyy ootthheerr
wwoommaann,, tthhee mmootthheerr ssiiddee ooff hhiimm wwoouulldd
ggoo wwiilldd..
((TToo LLiillaa))
WWhheenn NNoorrmmaann mmeett yyoouurr ssiisstteerr,, hhee wwaass
ttoouucchheedd bbyy hheerr ...... aanndd aarroouusseedd bbyy
hheerr.. HHee wwaanntteedd hheerr.. AAnndd tthhiiss sseett
ooffff hhiiss ""jjeeaalloouuss mmootthheerr"" aanndd ......
""mmootthheerr kkiilllleedd tthhee ggiirrll.."" AAfftteerr
tthhee mmuurrddeerr,, NNoorrmmaann rreettuurrnneedd aass iiff
ffrroomm aa ddeeeepp sslleeeepp ...... aanndd lliikkee aa
dduuttiiffuull ssoonn,, ccoovveerreedd uupp aallll ttrraacceess
ooff tthhee ccrriimmee hhee wwaass ccoonnvviinncceedd hhiiss
mmootthheerr hhaadd ccoommmmiitttteedd..
SSAAMM
WWhhyy wwaass hhee ...... ddrreesssseedd lliikkee tthhaatt??
DDIISSTTRRIICCTT AATTTTOORRNNEEYY
HHee''ss aa ttrraannssvveessttiittee!!
SSIIMMOONN
NNoott eexxaaccttllyy.. AA mmaann wwhhoo ddrreesssseess iinn
wwoommaann''ss ccllootthhiinngg iinn oorrddeerr ttoo
aacchhiieevvee aa sseexxuuaall cchhaannggee ...... oorr
ssaattiissffaaccttiioonn ...... iiss aa ttrraannssvveessttiittee..
BBuutt iinn NNoorrmmaann''ss ccaassee,, hhee wwaass ssiimmppllyy
ddooiinngg eevveerryytthhiinngg ppoossssiibbllee ttoo kkeeeepp
aalliivvee tthhee iilllluussiioonn ooff hhiiss mmootthheerr
bbeeiinngg aalliivvee.. AAnndd wwhheenneevveerr rreeaalliittyy
ccaammee ttoooo cclloossee,, wwhheenn ddaannggeerr oorr
ddeessiirree tthhrreeaatteenneedd tthhaatt iilllluussiioonn,,
hhee''dd ddrreessss uupp,, eevveenn ttoo aa cchheeaapp wwiigg
hhee bbrroouugghhtt,, aanndd hhee''dd wwaallkk aabboouutt tthhee
hhoouussee,, ssiitt iinn hheerr cchhaaiirr,, ssppeeaakk iinn
hheerr vvooiiccee ...... HHee ttrriieedd ttoo bbee hhiiss
mmootthheerr..
((AA ssaadd ssmmiillee))
AAnndd nnooww hhee iiss..
((AA ppaauussee))
TThhaatt''ss wwhhaatt II mmeeaanntt wwhheenn II ssaaiidd II
ggoott tthhee ssttoorryy ffrroomm tthhee mmootthheerr.. SShhee
tthhiinnkkss NNoorrmmaann hhaass bbeeeenn ttaakkeenn aawwaayy
...... bbeeccaauussee ooff hhiiss ccrriimmeess..
((mmoorree))
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112277..
SSIIMMOONN ((ccoonntt''dd))
SShhee iinnssiissttss sshhee ddiidd nnootthhiinngg,, tthhaatt
NNoorrmmaann ccoommmmiitttteedd aallll tthhee mmuurrddeerrss
jjuusstt ttoo kkeeeepp hheerr ffrroomm bbeeiinngg
ddiissccoovveerreedd.. SShhee eevveenn ssmmiilleedd aa bbiitt
ccooqquueettttiisshhllyy aass sshhee ssaaiidd tthhaatt.. OOff
ccoouurrssee,, sshhee ffeeeellss bbaaddllyy aabboouutt iitt
...... bbuutt aallssoo ssoommeewwhhaatt rreelliieevveedd ttoo
bbee,, aass sshhee ppuutt iitt,, ffrreeee ooff NNoorrmmaann,,
aatt llaasstt..
((AA ppaauussee))
WWhheenn tthhee mmiinndd hhoouusseess ttwwoo
ppeerrssoonnaalliittiieess,, tthheerree iiss aallwwaayyss aa
bbaattttllee.. IInn NNoorrmmaann''ss ccaassee,, tthhee
bbaattttllee iiss oovveerr ...... aanndd tthhee ddoommiinnaanntt
ppeerrssoonnaalliittyy hhaass wwoonn..
LLiillaa bbeeggiinnss ttoo wweeeepp ssooffttllyy,, ffoorr MMaarryy,, ffoorr AArrbbooggaasstt,, ffoorr
NNoorrmmaann,, ffoorr aallll tthhee ddeessttrrooyyeedd hhuummaann bbeeiinnggss ooff tthhiiss
wwoorrlldd.. SSaamm bbeennddss bbeessiiddee hheerr,, ppuuttss hhiiss aarrmm aabboouutt hheerr,,
ccoommffoorrttss hheerr..
CCHHAAMMBBEERRSS
((TToo SSiimmoonn))
AAnndd tthhee ffoorrttyy tthhoouussaanndd ddoollllaarrss??
WWhhoo ggoott tthhaatt??
SSIIMMOONN
TThhee sswwaammpp.. TThheessee wweerree mmuurrddeerrss ooff
ppaassssiioonn,, nnoott pprrooffiitt..
AA PPOOLLIICCEE GGUUAARRDD ppuuttss hhiiss hheeaadd iinn tthhee ddoooorr,, ssppeeaakkss,, iinn aa
nneeaarr--wwhhiissppeerr,, ttoo tthhee CChhiieeff ooff PPoolliiccee.. TThhee GGuuaarrdd iiss
ccaarrrryyiinngg aa ffoollddeedd bbllaannkkeett oovveerr hhiiss aarrmm..
PPOOLLIICCEE GGUUAARRDD
HHee ffeeeellss aa lliittttllee cchhiillll ...... ccaann II
bbrriinngg hhiimm tthhiiss bbllaannkkeett??
TThhee CChhiieeff ooff PPoolliiccee nnooddss.. TThhee GGuuaarrdd ggooeess aawwaayy,, aanndd
CCAAMMEERRAA FFOOLLLLOOWWSS hhiimm oouutt ooff tthhee rroooomm aanndd oouutt iinnttoo tthhee
hhaallllwwaayy.. GGuuaarrdd mmoovveess tthhrroouugghh tthhee wwaaiittiinngg mmeenn,, hheeaaddiinngg
ddoowwnn tthhee ccoorrrriiddoorr..
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. AANNOOTTHHEERR CCOORRRRIIDDOORR IINN CCOOUURRTTHHOOUUSSEE
AA nnaarrrroowweerr ccoorrrriiddoorr iinn tthhee rreeaarr ooff tthhee bbuuiillddiinngg.. IInn
ff..gg.. ooff sshhoott,, wwee sseeee aa ddoooorr,, tthhee ttoopp hhaallff ooff wwhhiicchh iiss
wwiirree--ccoovveerreedd ggllaassss.. AA GGUUAARRDD iinn uunniiffoorrmm iiss ppoosstteedd bbyy tthhee
ddoooorr,, llooookkiinngg rreepprroovviinnggllyy aatt tthhee ttwwoo oorr tthhrreeee ppeeooppllee
ttrryyiinngg ttoo ggeett aa ggllaannccee iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112288..
TThhee PPoolliiccee GGuuaarrdd,, ccaarrrryyiinngg tthhee bbllaannkkeett,, ccoommeess ddoowwnn tthhiiss
ccoorrrriiddoorr,, ggooeess ttoo tthhee ddoooorr.. CCAAMMEERRAA MMOOVVEESS CCLLOOSSEE.. TThhee
uunniiffoorrmmeedd GGuuaarrdd ooppeennss tthhee ddoooorr,, aalllloowwss tthhee mmaann ttoo ggoo iinn..
SShhoott iiss RRAAKKEEDD ssoo tthhaatt wwee ccaann nnoott sseeee iinnttoo tthhee rroooomm..
AAfftteerr aa mmoommeenntt,, tthhee GGuuaarrdd ccoommeess oouutt aanndd tthhee uunniiffoorrmmeedd
GGuuaarrdd cclloosseess aanndd lloocckkss tthhee ddoooorr aanndd wwee
CCUUTT TTOO::
IINNTT.. NNOORRMMAANN''SS DDEETTEENNTTIIOONN RROOOOMM -- ((NNIIGGHHTT))
TThhee wwaallllss aarree wwhhiittee aanndd ppllaaiinn.. TThheerree iiss nnoo wwiinnddooww..
TThheerree iiss nnoo ffuurrnniittuurree eexxcceepptt tthhee ssttrraaiigghhtt--bbaacckk cchhaaiirr iinn
wwhhiicchh NNoorrmmaann ssiittss,, iinn tthhee cceenntteerr ooff tthhee rroooomm.. TThhee rroooomm
hhaass aa qquuaalliittyy ooff nnoo--wwhheerreenneessss,, ooff ccaallmm sseeppaarraattiioonn ffrroomm
tthhee wwoorrlldd..
TThhee PPoolliiccee GGuuaarrdd hhaass ppllaacceedd tthhee bbllaannkkeett oonn NNoorrmmaann''ss
kknneeeess.. NNoorrmmaann,, aass wwee ccoommee uuppoonn hhiimm,, iiss lliiffttiinngg tthhee
bbllaannkkeett,, uunnffoollddiinngg iitt.. HHiiss ffaaccee,, aalltthhoouugghh wwiitthhoouutt
mmaakkeeuupp aanndd wwiitthhoouutt tthhee ssuurrrroouunnddiinngg ssooffttnneessss ooff tthhee wwiigg,,
hhaass aa cceerrttaaiinn ffeemmiinniinniittyy aabboouutt iitt,, aa ssooffttnneessss aabboouutt tthhee
mmoouutthh aanndd aa kkiinndd ooff aarrcchh wwoommaannlliinneessss aabboouutt tthhee bbrroowwss..
CCaallmmllyy,, NNoorrmmaann ppllaacceess tthhee bbllaannkkeett aabboouutt hhiiss sshhoouullddeerrss,,
aass iiff iitt wweerree aa ccaasshhmmeerree sshhaawwll.. CCAAMMEERRAA RREEMMAAIINNSS iinn aa
ppoossiittiioonn ssoo tthhaatt oouurr vviieeww ooff NNoorrmmaann iiss aa FFUULLLL OONNEE.. WWhheenn
tthhee sshhaawwll iiss iinn ppoossiittiioonn,, aanndd NNoorrmmaann iiss sseettttlleedd,, wwee
HHEEAARR,, OOVVEERR SSHHOOTT,, tthhee vvooiiccee ooff hhiiss mmootthheerr,, ccoommiinngg ffrroomm
tthhee ccaallmm ooff hhiiss tthhoouugghhttss..
MMOOTTHHEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE ((OO..SS..))
IItt''ss ssaadd ...... wwhheenn aa mmootthheerr hhaass ttoo
ssppeeaakk tthhee wwoorrddss tthhaatt ccoonnddeemmnn hheerr
oowwnn ssoonn ...... bbuutt II ccoouullddnn''tt aallllooww
tthheemm ttoo bbeelliieevvee tthhaatt II wwoouulldd ccoommmmiitt
mmuurrddeerr..
((AA ppaauussee))
TThheeyy''llll ppuutt hhiimm aawwaayy nnooww ...... aass II
sshhoouulldd hhaavvee ...... yyeeaarrss aaggoo.. HHee wwaass
aallwwaayyss ...... bbaadd.. AAnndd iinn tthhee eenndd,, hhee
iinntteennddeedd ttoo tteellll tthheemm II kkiilllllleedd
tthhoossee ggiirrllss ...... aanndd tthhaatt mmaann.. AAss
iiff II ccoouulldd ddoo aannyytthhiinngg eexxcceepptt jjuusstt
ssiitt aanndd ssttaarree ...... lliikkee oonnee ooff hhiiss
ssttuuffffeedd bbiirrddss..
((AA ppaauussee))
WWeellll,, tthheeyy kknnooww II ccaann''tt eevveenn mmoovvee
aa ffiinnggeerr.. AAnndd II wwoonn''tt.. II''llll jjuusstt
ssiitt hheerree aanndd bbee qquuiieett.. JJuusstt iinn
ccaassee tthheeyy ddoo ...... ssuussppeecctt mmee..
AA ffllyy bbuuzzzzeess cclloossee,, aanndd tthheenn ccoonnttiinnuueess bbuuzzzziinngg aanndd
ffllyyiinngg aabboouutt NNoorrmmaann''ss ffaaccee..
PPSSYYCCHHOO RReevviisseedd DDeecceemmbbeerr 11,, 11995599 112299..
MMOOTTHHEERR''SS VVOOIICCEE ((VV..OO..))
TThheeyy''rree pprroobbaabbllyy wwaattcchhiinngg mmee..
WWeellll,, lleett tthheemm.. LLeett tthheemm sseeee wwhhaatt
kkiinndd ooff aa ppeerrssoonn II aamm..
((AA ppaauussee,, aass tthhee ffllyy
lliigghhttss oonn NNoorrmmaann''ss
hhaanndd))
II''mm nnoott ggooiinngg ttoo sswwaatt tthhaatt ffllyy.. II
hhooppee tthheeyy aarree wwaattcchhiinngg.. TThheeyy''llll
sseeee ...... tthheeyy''llll sseeee ...... aanndd tthheeyy''llll
kknnooww ...... aanndd tthheeyy''llll ssaayy ...... ''wwhhyy,,
sshhee wwoouullddnn''tt eevveenn hhaarrmm aa ffllyy ......''
NNoorrmmaann ccoonnttiinnuueess ttoo ggaazzee aahheeaadd iinnttoo nnootthhiinngg.. SScceennee
bbeeggiinnss ttoo DDIISSSSOOLLVVEE SSLLOOWWLLYY ttoo::
TTHHEE SSWWAAMMPP
AAss EENNDD TTIITTLLEESS FFAADDEE IINN,, wwee sseeee tthhee sswwaammpp,, tthhee cchhaaiinn ooff aa
ttooww--ttrruucckk.. TThhee cchhaaiinn iiss aattttaacchheedd ttoo MMaarryy''ss ccaarr.. TThhee
ccaarr iiss ccoommiinngg oouutt ooff tthhee sswwaammpp..
FFAADDEE OOUUTT
TTHHEE EENNDD
